CHAPTER I.
Then the wyld thorowe the woodes went,
On every syde shear;
Grea-hordes thorowe the greves glent
For to kill thear deer.
Chzvy Chase
.
The
bright, warm sunshine of a July morning was pouring
its full stream of vivifying lustre over a wide expanse of wild,
open country, in one of the south-eastern counties of Ireland.
For miles and miles over which the eye extended, not a sign
of a human habitation, or of man's handiwork, was visible;
unless these were to be found in the existence of a long range
of young oak woodland, which lay to the north-east, stretching
for several miles continuously along the low horizon in that
quarter, with something that might have been either a
mist-wreath
,
or a column of blue smoke floating lazily in the pure
atmosphere above it. The foreground of this desolate, but
lovely landscape, was formed by a wide, brawling stream,
which almost merited the name of a river, and which here
issuing from an abrupt, rocky cleft or chasm, in the
round-headed
moorland hills, spread itself out over a broader bed,
flowing rapidly in bright whirls and eddies upon a bottom of
glittering pebbles, with here and there a great boulder heaving
its dark, mossy head above the surface, and hundreds of
silver-sided
,
yellow-finned trouts, flashing up like meteors from
the depths, and breaking the smooth ripples in pursuit of
their insect prey.
The banks of this beautiful stream were fringed on the
farther
side by a feathery coppice of aspen, birch and alders,
with here and there a doddered oak overgrown with the
broad-leaved Irish ivy; or a dark holly brake, relieving by
their evergreen foliage the lighter verdure of the deciduous
trees around them. Above this screen of brushwood, the
moorlands rose in a long expanse of gently-swelling,
heath-clad
ridges, now glowing with the purple bloom of the sweet
heather and the mountain thyme, knoll above knoll, with deep
hollows intervening, like the seas and troughs of a storm-tossed
ocean, until afar off in the dim distance they were bounded to
the westward by the blue towering heights of the great
mountain
of Slieyh-Bay.
It was perhaps ten of the clock, though there was little
chance that the hour of God's day should be proclaimed in
that delicious solitude by the iron tongue of man's machinery;
where not a sound had been heard since the peep of dawn,
except
the rippling music of the stream, the low sigh of the soft
west wind among the aspen leaves, the busy hum of the bees
from the heather blossoms, and the occasional crow of the
gallant
goreock from his station on the crest of you sunny hillock.
No lack was there, however, of animal life to gladden the
tranquillity of that lone moorlands cenery; the water-ousel, with
his broad white gorget, now took his stand on the summit of
some dripping stone, now dived into the clear stream, on the
gravelly floor of which he might be seen a moment afterward
running as briskly to an fro as if he had not three feet of water
glancing above his head; the kingfisher shot down the channel,
gleaming like a winged turquoise in the sunshine; the
whiskered
otter prowled along the pebbly margin, and plunged, and
emerged again, with a five-pound brook-trout quivering in his
iron jaws; and, at length, while the hoarse summons of the
heath-cock sank into silence, and the ousel and the kingfisher
cowered beneath the shelter of the caverned bank, a magnificent
grey gosshawk came gliding down from his mountain eyrie on
his balanced pinions, and after wheeling hither and thither for a
little space, alighted on the bare stag-horned crest of an old oak
beside the stream, and ever and anen renewed the terrors of
the feathered tremblers of the wold by his shrill, shivering
cry.
But now another sound arose, faint and far, swelling up from
the westward, on the wings of the gentle wind; a strange,
confused
,
yet harmonious murmur. For a long time it continued
rising and falling with the rise and fall of the breeze, scarcely
distinguishable above the tinkling music of the river, and the
fitful cadences of the air among the tree-tops, unless it were by
something indescribable, save to those who have heard it, of
wild, spirit-stirring, yet half-discordant music.
Still, however, it came nigher and more nigh, pealing up to
the ear, had there been any human ear to listen it, until the
shrill, sharp, savage trebles, and the deeper ringing bass-notes of
a full pack of stag-hounds, running upon a breast-high scent,
became distinctly audible. The falcon, which, up to this time
had set motionless, as if she had been a portion of the
weatherbeaten
oak, upon her airy perch, now spread her broad vans
to the breeze, and darted away like an arrow from the bow,
soaring up, up, into the empyrean, until she was almost beyond
the ken of human vision, a mere speck in the azure firmament.
The otter, which alone of the living things had maintained its
ground in the falcon's presence, grumbling and hissing, cat-like,
over its scaly prey, now raised its round head, erected its ears,
and listened anxiously to the blended din which still rang
nearer and nearer, until the echoes of the neighboring hills
began to reverberate the cry, and the coppice itself, under the
verge of which it lay, seemed to thrill and reply to the cheery
crash of that dog-music.
Then launching itself into the glittering waters it oared its
way with its webbed feet, and steered itself with its muscular
tail down the glancing shallows, until having gained the deeps,
it dived in the mid pool, and arose no more above the surface,
until it had gained the shelter of its secluded holt beneath the
tortuous roots of the water-loving willows.
A moment or two afterwards a brood of well-grown
moor-fowl
came whirring along the wind from beyond the heathery
knolls among which they had been flushed by the
staghounds
;
and, crossing the bed of the river and its little valley,
skimmed out of sight beyond the southern eminences. Ere
this, the tongue of every several hound was distinguishable
from its mate's; and the nice ear of a practised hunter could
have perceived with certainty which of the pack were
foremost
on the traces of the quarry; and now the brushwood of
the coppice began indeed to crash audibly to the ear, and
quiver visibly to the eye, as if torn asunder by the passage of
many bodies in swift motion.
A deep, hoarse croak was next heard; and, a moment later,
a large raven, grizzled about the head with age, sailed over
the low tree-tops, and perched itself secure and well satisfied
on the very scathed oak-branch from which the gosshawk had
so recently departed; then, almost ere its wings were folded,
a noble stag, a royal hart of ten, as a forester would have
termed him, with cupped antlers, broke from the underwood,
almost as black from the effects of toil and sweat as the
ill-omened
bird above himand after hesitating for an instant on
the brink, plunged into the shallow river, dashing the spray
high into the air, and, bounding with a sure foot over the
slippery
and treacherous pebbles, rushed up the channel, until, as
the headmost hounds appeared on the farther side, he turned
to bay in a deep narrow cove or recess of the rocks, where
both his fianks were protected by the abrupt crags, while for
the front, his own broad and branching antlers seemed to be
guard enough against a host of foes.
And need there was enough that the staunch quarry should
be so guarded; for, yelling with redoubled zeal and fury as
they ran from the scent into view, hound after hound plunged
down the precipitous descent, and stemmed the rapid current
in pursuit, until full twenty couple of black or brindled
talbots
were raving at close quarters around the royal hart,
hemming
him in on every side, yet daunted by his bold aspect,
and the fierce raking thrusts of his terrible brow antlers upon
their gallant game.
Once or twice some bolder hound than his fellows would
dash in with a shrill, snarling bay; but the pack hung aloof,
and at each fresh assault the brave adventurer fell back
gored by the horns or battered by the hoofs of the stag, till
after each assault all seemed reluctant to attack again, and
well content to bay and clamor at safe distance.
Meanwhile the stag, recovering gradually from his
exhaustion
as the fresh air blew full and inspiritingly into his
wide-expanded
nostrils, and the cool waters laved his
foam-embossed
flanks and panting breast refreshingly, wasted no efforts
upon enemies which evidently dared not charge him home,
but watched them with a wary eye, and lowered antlers only,
and seemed to be abiding his time when he should burst
through their clamorous circle, and trust once again to the
fleetness of his well-tried foot.
But at the very point of time when he seemed to be almost
in the act of bounding over their heads, and betaking himself
once again to the broad moorlands, the gallop of a horse at full
speed came charging up the rocky bank; and, almost
simultaneously
with the sound, a gallant stood and a gay rider
emerged from the coppice, and stood out, drawn in clear
relief against the glowing sky, upon the verge of a tall crag
opposite.
The horse was sorely blown, however; and the declivity
from the crag on which he stood into the channel of the brook
was so steep and abrupt, that, had he been in the full vigor of
his unwearied speed and strength, it would have tasked his
powers fearfully to try the descent over those slippery
limestone
ledges.
But as his rider cleared the covert, and saw the tumultuous
and confused group almost beneath his feet, he pulled hard
upon the bridle, and rising erect in his stirrups, uttered a
long, clear whoop of joyous exultation; and then, without so
much as pausing to collect his breath, raised to his lips the
ivory-tipped bugle which hung at his right side, and blew the
well-known cadences of the mort, till wood and rock and
mountain rang, and a faint answering halloo, and a far distant
bugle-blast, responded to his note of triumph.
He was a tall and powerful young man, of some twenty-six
or twenty-seven years, with a singularly dark complexion, fine
black eyes, features of a keen, aquiline outline, and long,
curled love-locks of the same hue with his eyes and
strongly-pencilled
brows, floating down over the collar of his doublet.
He wore no hair upon his facealthough that was the day of
imperials and Vandyke beards, almost as much as it was of
silken scarfs, and gilded spurs, and belted swords on the hip of
every one claiming to be a gentleman by birth and lineage
except a small, dark moustache on his short, well-formed upper
lip; but his dress, though evidently fashioned with especial
regard to the hunting-field, was both elaborate and costly. It
consisted of a rich, half-military coat of bullet-proof buff
leather, lined and slashed with tawney silk, and adorned with
silver loops and fringes. His falling collar was of fine
cambric
,
profusely frilled with the richest Flanders lace, as were
the cuffs of his sleeves, and the knees of his buff breeches,
though in the latter instance this costly decoration was
concealed
by the large tops of his heavy riding boots. He had
shoulder-knots, and a scarf of rich, grass-green satin, and the
band of his broad-brimmed, steeple-crowned beaver was of
the same color and material, all tagged and fringed with silver.
A short buck-handled hunting-knife, or hanger, with a
double-edged
straight blade, hung from his scarf, and was the only
weapon which he bore about his person, though the butts of a
pair of silver-mounted pistols peered from the holsters at his
saddle-bow; and the bugle, which he had just winded so
skilfully and well, was suspended from a silver chain crossing
the scarf and his left shoulder.
He made no pause, after the answer of his comrades
reached his ear, but, seeing the nature of the ground, and its
impracticable character for the surest-footed horse, sprang
from his saddle in hot haste, flung his bridle-rein over the
gnarled bough of an oak stump, and unsheathing his bright,
keen blade, sprang down the rocks with the light steady foot
of a practised cragsman. A minute, at the utmost, had not
passed between the first appearance of the young cavalier on
the scene of action and his springing, weapon in hand, down
the craggy pass. The hounds, animated by his halloo and his
bugle blast, had in the meantime rushed upon the hart with
greater fierceness than they had shown beforeand two or
three had even fixed their faugs upon his muscular and glossy
limbs. But these were beaten off, trampled or maimed, in
less time than it has taken to describe it; and one, a superb
jet-black bloodhound, of the true Talbot breed, crook-kneed
and dew-lipped, like Thessalian bulls, which had fastened on
his neck, narrowly missing the jugular vein, was dashed down
by a single blow of the keen cloven hoof, and the next instant
transfixed and unseamed from the brisket to the
shoulderblade
,
by the brow antlers of the infuriate stag.
At the instant when the young man leaped from the last
step of the limestone ledges into the clear cold water, which
was so deep where he entered it that it took him to the
mid-thing
and so swift, that, strong as he was and muscular, it
needed all his powers and agility to stem it, the fierce animal
had disembarrassed itself of all its four-footed assailants, and
now made at its human enemy with a front of resolute
defiance
,
and a countenance which, merely animal and brutish
as it was, seemed to express the mingled sentiments of mortal
agony, despair, and resolution.
But, nothing daunted or irresolute, the youth rushed on to
meet him, while the hounds, rallying again at the sight and
presence of their master, bayed fiercely round his flanks and
in his rear, although they dared not yet again to tackle him.
Just as they were closing in the mortal strifefor be it known
that a stag at bay is no easy or contemptible antagonist, and a
thrust from his antlers no child's playthe quick sharp clatter
of a horse's hoofs upon the rocky ground came up against the
wind from the south-eastward, in a direction exactly opposite
to the approach of the still distant hunters; and it might have
been at once conjectured by the eager youth that aid was at
hand, had he needed it, if the ears of his mind had not been
closed by the excitement of immediate peril to be met, and
the mad ardor of the chase.
But, though he saw it not, a fresh spectator, if not actor, was
brought upon the scene of strife, in the shape of a tall, gaunt,
thin-flanked man, with singularly broad shoulders, and wiry,
muscular limbs, mounted upon a lean, ewe-necked, spur-galled
garron, wretchedly accoutred with a rope bridle, and a
tattered
saddle, the wooden tree and straw stuffing of which were
clearly visible through the worm-eaten canvass covering.
The countenance of the new comer was that of a man of
some fifty-five or sixty years, harsh, resolute, and seemingly
indicative
of a character unchanged by time or hardship, and
singularly unprepossessing, while it was purely Irish in its
aspect
and characteristics. The hair had been as black as the
raven's wing, but was now grizzled, and as similar in color as
in texture to the short bristly clothing of a badger's backfor
it was clipped close after the fashion of the Puritans, who,
though as yet they had gained little foothold on the west side
of St. George's Channel, were absolute masters in England
having a few months before perpetrated the unjust and cruel
murder of one, almost the best of men, if he were also
almost the weakest and the worst of kings. The brow was
broad, furrowed, and almost knotted by the corrugation of its
muscles; but, it receded villanously above the shaggy
iron-grey
eyebrows, which overhung like pent-houses the deep
cavernous
hollows from the depths of which twinkled with a quick,
malignant light a pair of small, dark, snake-like eyes, of which
the sharp intelligence was the only redeeming feature. The
nose was coarse, broad, and turned upward; and the wide,
thin-lipped
,
compressed mouth gave token of no quality of mind,
unless it were iron resolution; while the square massive jaws
and bull neck below were more than usually deceptive in their
prognostics, if they did not indicate the cruelty and fierceness
of the animal they most resembledthe base and brutal
bulldog
.
This odious-looking and repulsive personage was dressed in
a plain, close-fitting doublet of black serge, belted about his
middle by a broad strap of untanned calf-skin, from which swung
at his side a long steel-hilted and steel-scabbarded straight
blade, or tuck, as it was then termed, which was the favorite
weapon of the Parliamentariansand that which, in the hard
hands of the Ironsides, had done such fatal execution on the
heights of Naseby, and the red moor of Marston. He wore
a steeple-crowned black hat, with neither band nor feather,
and his garb was completed by a pair of rusty leather breeches
and gigantic riding-boots with funnel-shaped tops extending
to the middle of his thigh. He had no pistols at his
saddle-bow
,
for it was evident at once that the beast on which he
was temporarily mounted was no more a soldier's charger
than the wretched pad which barely covered its galled back
was a soldier's demipique; but he had a long dudgeon
dagger
thrust through his girdle at the left side, and a short, heavy
flint-locked musquetoonat that time a scarce and much
valued
weaponslung across his shoulder from the left hand to
the right haunch.
As soon as the Puritan, for such he seemed to be, (though
Puritan Irishmen were no common articles in those days,)
came in sight of the animated group, composed of the man,
the deer, and the hounds, crowded together in the narrow
gorge of the stream between the steep and savage banksfit
scene for so mad and desperate an encounterhe pulled his
wretched horse short up with an exertion of muscular force,
which almost threw him on his haunches, brought down the
muzzle of his piece under his right elbow, and with a quick
movement of the left hand released the buckle which confined
it on his breast, so that, within a second or two of his first
appearance
on the stage, he had his weapon in his hand, posted
and cocked, and ready for prompt action.
And well it was for the young hunter that his promptitude
was both active and deliberate, for not a minute had elapsed
before that military promptitude saved him from instant death.
He had not seen or heard, as I have stated, the approach of
the stranger; and had he seen him, it is little likely he would
have deigned to honor him with more than a moment's notice
for he was not only repulsive at first sight, even to a stranger's
eye, but was one who towhat the young hunter evidently was
a noble and a royalist, was likely to be individually and
peculiarly
odious. But, ignorant of the presence of any witness
to his fiery rashness, with a repeated whoop, he dashed at the
charging stag, which met him nothing loth or fearful. As the
maddened and desperate beast closed his eyes, and stooped his
head to strike with his terrible brow antlers, as is the habit of
his breed, the young man bounded lightly to one side,
intending
to evade the charge, and raising his keen weapon as he
leaped, with the purpose of severing his hamstring as he
passed
him. But, though he leaped actively, and struck with a
true hand, directed by a quick, sure eye, and steadied by a
resolute
and fearless heart, he counted for the nonce without his
host. And yet, as it was clear to see, it was to him no new or
untried manuvre, but one which had been put in practice
many times, and until now, ever found available.
But such a feat of agility is one thing to practise with the
good solid greensward under the booted foot, and no denser
medium through which to spring than the elastic and
intrindant
air, and with the slippery limestone boulders of the river's
bed from which to spring, and on which to descendand the
rushing volume of a stream running ten miles an hour, boiling
and whirling round the limbs.
He sprang lightly, it is true, and alighted surely; but glass
itself
,
or ice, were not more slippery than the water-worn and
polished pebbles on which he landed from his quick bound;
his feet flew from under him, and he fell headlong backward
directly across the track of the charging stag.
Well was it for him then that he were a garment surer
proof than the ordinary Lincoln green of the hunter's frock;
for the full thrust of the brow antler caught his right shoulder
as he fell, and though the tough elk-skin of his stont buff coat
turned it aside, that it pierced him, not as surely as it would
otherwise, from side to side, the force of the blow was so great
that it fairly raised him into the air, and hurled him a yard
farther forward than the spot where he would have fallen.
Then with a fiend-like burst of yells, the savage hounds
rushed in, and seizing the infuriate deer by the ears, the
throat, the fore-shoulder,tore him down bodily into the brook,
full on top of the young huntsman, biting, goring, trampling,
and bleeding,now below, now above the surface of the
flashing
and tortured waterand for a minute all was horrible and
blind confusion.
But, once again the royal hart shook of his savage foos,
and with a wild strange cryhalf bray, half bellow, reared
himself erect on his hind legs, rampant in glorious triumph,
and tossed his horned frontlet to the skies, preparatory,
as he deemed, doubtless, to swift and sure escape.
No escape was there for him, however. For, whether
wisely
,
friendly, or no, who shall say?since at that moment the
peril seemed at least to be over; but certainly with swift,
instinctive
coolness, and most fatal execution, the stranger
discharged
his musquetoonand ere he could perceive the result
of his quick aim, cast the piece from his hand, leaped down
from the saddle, and drawing his long tuck, dashed to the
river's edge.
But the instinctive aim had proved deadly, and the heavy
fall had taken effect precisely where the matador directs the
deadly thrust of his fine blade in the Spanish bull-ringright
at the juncture of the skull and spineproducing
instantaneous
death, and hurling the great stag, lifeless, upon the
body of the stunned and half-drowned cavalier.
The stranger rested not content with the good or evil which
he had done already; but plunged into the water, and dragged
out the young gentleman in less time than it has taken to
describe
,
and while the dogs tore and mangled the carcass of the
dead hart unheeded, applied himself actively and skilfully to
restore the suspended animation of the cavalierthough there
was a strange expression in his face, which seemed to portend
no good or kindly feeling to the sufferer.
Be that, however, as it may, his efforts were ere long
successful
,
and the cavalier opened his eyes, at first with a vague
and bewildered expression, which brightened in an instant, as
they fell upon those hard, repulsive features, into a glance of
mingled enmity and horror.
He started half up, and strove to regain his feet, while his
right hand was moved with an instinctive impulse to the place
where his sword should have hungwhile he exclaimed, in
accents
of fierce energy:
You here! you! you!Hugh O'Neil!
Even I, Dermot! replied the other, quite unmoved, and
apparently unconscious of the feelings which possessed the
other. And, whatsoever ill I have done else in my day, the
Lord be thanked, I have this good deed to boast, that I have
saved the great O'Brien!
Ha! answered the other, as he staggered feebly to his
feet, and gazed about him uncertainly, as if scarce conscious
yet what had befallen him. Ha! would that you had slain
me rather! True! true!you have saved me!
The gloomy tone and yet gloomier expression of his fine
features, as he spoke, showed that his words came straight
from his heart, and were true to the very letter. But if he
did indeed regret the obligation under which he was placed
to one who seemed so hateful to him as the stranger, he was
soon in a position in some sort to requite, if not efface it;
for at this moment, the earth was shaken by the clang and
clatter
of a dozen horses at full gallopand with a wild, fierce
shout the retainers of the great O'Brien, as his rescuer had
called him, came tearing over stock and stone to the spot, and
in an instant's time, five or six brandished blades were
glittering
above the stranger's head, and as many pistols were cocked
and levelled within a hand's-breadth of his resolute, unaltered
features.
But with a strange, wan, bitter smile, the O'Brien waved his
hand on high, and exclaimed:
Hold! hold! Evil betide! He has saved my life, and must
not lose his own, were he fiend himself, as he is blacker and
more hideous!
CHAPTER II.
Unthread the rude eye of rebellion,
And welcome home again discarded faith.
Shakspeare
.
At
the words of the young cavalier, the points and
muzzles
of the threatening weapons were lowered, it is true; but
the pistol-locks were not uncocked, nor were the swords put
up into their seabbards. The brows, too, which looked of late
so balefully upon the stranger, still gloomed upon him darkly,
while a deep angry murmur passed from lip to lip of the wild
vassals of the great O'Brien.
Bold as he was, the grim-visaged soldier gazed around him
with an anxious eye on the lowering countenances and ready
weapons of the clansmen, and turned from them to note the
expression of their leader's noble features.
Must I speak twice? cried Dermot, in answer, it would
seem, to this mute appeal, or is the life of the O'Brien so small
a matter in the eyes of his kindred, that they would pay the
saving of it with the blood of the savior? And then, be thy
name what it may, fear nothing! The word of the O'Brien is
pledged for thy safety; and thou art as safe as if thou hadst
tasted of my bread and salt, and wert standing on my
hearth-stone
.
Ireland is changed somewhat since I left her, replied the
otherwho, if he had indeed been alarmed, had ceased to feel
any apprehension, as in truth he had no farther cause; for at
the words of the youthful chief, every weapon was returned to
the sheath or the girdle, and many of the company applied
themselves to couple up the bloodhounds, to drag the carcass
of the hart royal from the stream, and to fetch their chieftain's
horse across the water by an easy ford a little way below the
scene of action. Sorely changed, I may say, since I left her.
For in my day something more than mere safety had been the
return
for a life preserved, even by an enemymuch more by a
kinsman and a friend. There were such words in old Erin as
gratitude and guerdon, whatever there may be in the new.
If thou wouldst have reward, O'Neil, answered the young
man, his countenance lighting up with a quick, eager lustre;
if any price or gift can wipe out this ungrateful debt of
gratitude
,
name it, and have it, were it half my curldom. For the
rest, no enemy of the king is a friend to O'Brien!no apostate
from his God is Dermot's kinsman! Name thy reward, and
take it, I say, Hugh O'Neil! And then, if thou be wise, as men
2
say thou art, thou wilt remove thyself as speedily as may be
from this neighborhood. The air of Wexford is not wholesome,
I have heard men say, for heretics or regicides; and sith thou
hast saved my life, how thanklessly soever, I would not have it
said thou hadst lost thine at my people's hands; which might well
be, I trow, were my back once turned.
I would have reward, O'Brien, since I may not have
gratitude
.
But, I tell thee, fair cousin; seeing a great earl's life,
such as thine, is of no small value, so do I look for no small
guerdon.
Cousin me notfor cousin am I none of thine, O'Neil;
nor cousin will be called; for the rest, name thy pricethe
price of blood; in truth and deed art thou a second Judas!
Name thy price, I say, man, and thou shalt have it, be it what
it may; but I deemed not that even thou hadst been so
base-minded
!
And were I even as thou callest me, a second Judas,
replied
O'Neil, with a downcast visage, full of self-humiliation
and self-abasement, thou art wise, Dermot, and knowest that
even
he
repented!
And when he did so, answered O'Brien, with a flashing
glance of fiery scorn illuminating his dark features, I have
heard that `he went and hanged himself,' as I dare say thou wilt,
when thy time of repentance cometh. But never did I hear or
read that he carried back his infamy to be a shame to his
tribesmen
,
or his penitence to be a plea for guerdon!
And would it then be thy advice, O'Brien, to one who,
having perchance sinned deeply, had seen the error of his
ways, and been touched to his inmost soul by grace, that he
should go and hang himself, like Judas?
Methought that we spoke of guerdonof the price of
blood; answered O'Brien, with unchanged contempt in both
voice and mannerand not of advice or atonement. If of the
first, I say, as I said before, ask and receive! If of the latter, I
am a soldiernot a preacher. Your new friends, I have
heard tell, are both!and doubtless, Major General Jones,
commander
for the saints in Dublin, will give you good and ghostly
counsel! But look to it, in seeking his advice, however; for
Ormond is without the walls, and will be apt to solve your
doubts, if he lay hold on you, by giving you a rope at King
Charles' expense, in reward of your trusty services!
Faith, I am in a bad way, then, replied O'Neil, with a
grim smile. For sure am I, that Jones, the Purtan, will do
the same if he lay hold on me, whatever Ormond, the Catholic,
may do!
In a bad way thou art then! said O'Brien, coolly; and
very likely to be hanged, one way or other. For not Ormond
only, but any true believer from Fair Head to Cape Clear,
will bestow a cord on thee for old acquaintance, so surely as thy
name is Hugh O'Neil! Had it not been for my stumble in
the river, and the bullet from thy musquetoon, I had done so
myself; and thou hadst now been wavering in the wind, from
yon oak tree-top, to feed that very raven which sits there, biding
for the breaking of the deer. Speak, therefore, once for all!
What wilt thou have of me? Thy presence is as a shadow in
the sunlight, to the eyes of honest men; thy very breath is
poison to my nostrils! Take what reward thou wilt, and get
thee gone. I loathe the very sight of thee, not the less that I
owe thee a life!
A long pause followed, during which the young earl looked
upon the other with that air of half-scornful, half-loathing
curiosity
with which men are wont to regard some insignificant,
but venomous and hateful reptile; while O'Neil gazed
steadfastly
,
but gloomily, on the turf at his feet, beating the earth
with his heel, as if he either felt indeed, or affected to feel,
both anxiety and apprehension.
Then, after some two or three minutes had elapsed, O'Brien
turned half on his heel, and called aloud to one of his
attendant
sspeaking
now no longer in English, but in the Erse
tongue:
Ho! Murtogh Beg! he cried, bring hither the red
stallion
;
and thou, Phadraigh, hold my stirrup. If he have lost
his tongue, I cannot wait till he recover it. We have full
twenty miles to ride home; and I am damaged somewhat by
that brow antler. I know not but I have a rib or two broken.
You, cousin Con O'Brien, and all, save you, Florence
Desmond
,
see to the breaking of the hart, and entering the young
houns. Bran and his brother did good work all day, and led
the hunt the last half-hour. Follow me home as quickly as
you may; I must, I fear, ride slowly. Take heed, above all
things, that none of the men harm him. Our honor is at stake!
Let not one of them tarry in the rear, or their skenes will be
at wild work presently. And you, sir, he continued, turning to
O'Neil, and addressing him in English; since you will not tell
me what reward you claim, take that! And with the word he
threw a heavy purse, well filled with French gold, at his
recreant
kinsman's feet. And then, if you have any regard for
your neck, the sooner your foot is off the shore of Ireland
altogether
,
or within the walls of Dublin, the better for your chance
of saving it! Come with me, noble Desmond.
And as he spoke, he turned away disdainfully, without giving
the slightest heed to the eager vehemence with which O'Neil
stepped forward to address him, set his foot in the stirrup, and
grasping the mane of his fine bay blood-horse with his right
hand, raised himself painfully, and not without an effort, to his
demipique.
But at that moment, stimulated by the urgent necessity of
making himself heard now or never, the Puritan, if Puritan
he were, sprang forward, utterly neglecting the well-filled
purse on which he set the heel of his heavy boot in advancing
and standing right in the road, so that O'Brien could scarce
ride on without overthrowing him:
Hold! he criedhold!in tones that bespoke the
intensity
of his feelingsDermot O'Brien, hold! As you value
your plighted wordas you value the honor of your house
as you would not be termed, of all who name your name,
through unnumbered ages, the first ungrateful, the
one
man-sworn
O'Brienhold! I say, and hear me!
I may not do else, thus adjured, answered the youthful
earl; yet little do I give heed to thy warning. But be brief,
Hugh O'Neil; for it is no slight loathing which I conquer, in
holding any parley with one like thee!
I will be brief, O'Brien. Only hear me.
Come near me, Con O'Brien; and you too, cousins James
and Ulick; and you, Florence Desmond, cried Dermot,
casting
his eyes hastily over the circle of his followersmost of
whom were of his own clan and kindred. Come nearer to
my stirrup. If I must needs converse with a traitor to his
king, his country, and his church, it must be before witnesses.
And you, my men, call the pack to your heels and break the
deer in the corrie yonder, where the clamor shall not reach us.
Now, sir, what would you of us?
Protection from my foesa life for a life! replied the
other, gloomily.
Thou hast it. I have given thee already the assurance.
No man of mine dare harm thee for his life!
It is not from thy men that I fear harm, O'Brien; nor
against them that I crave protection.
Against whom, then? If thou hast face to ask that I,
whose house's honor you have stained by your apostacywhose
faith you have foreswornwhose friends and fellow-soldiers
you have consigned to the dungeons or the scaffolds of your
Parliamentthat I should shield you from the indignation of
your countrymen, the sentence of your Churchit cannot be!
it is too much! Life were too dearly bought at such a
bargain
.
I seek no aid against my countrymenand with my Church
I am reconciled.
A double traitor, ha! O'Brien interrupted him again, in
accents of tenfold scorn.
At least, retorted Hugh O'Neil, no less proudly than the
other, there is no nobleness nor much manhood in taunting
one who is unable to reply, or in treading upon one who is
down.
That is true, though the fiend himself had said it,
muttered
the earl; and so get on with thee; I will interrupt thee
no more.
I will make no long tale, nor utter any protestation,
replied
the other, gravely, but not oversubmissively. Enough,
that if I have erred, I have repented of my error; and seek
nay, have sought, to amend it. I have seen license where I
looked for liberty; I have found persecution where I looked
for toleration; and when I found at last that the whole force
of Cromwell and his iron army were about to be turned against
my native land, I and a few bold spirits resistedmutinied,
they call it! But his iron will and indomitable energy was
too much for us. He crushed us at a blow; the others were
all slain on the field, or slaughtered on the scaffold; I alone
have escaped by the speed of my horse and the fidelity of a
few trusty friends. I am here with a price on my head; I am
come to die for Irelandthe Church has absolved and
pardoned
me. Will you be sterner than the Church?
This plain, unvarnished narrative did more, as is oftentimes
the case, than eloquence or sophistry, to win the patient
hearing
and forbearance of his listeners; and it was evident that
his twice-repeated assertion, that he was reconciled to the
Church, had produced a considerable effect upon several of
the gentlemen who stood around, and had even touched the
firmer and less credulous spirit of the earl himself.
And when fell all this out? the latter asked, after a pause,
in which he seemed to ponder deeply; and, above all, what
proof have you for the truth of your assertions? You are
known for a shrewd wit, Hugh O'Neil, and a right subtle
tongue. We can take nought of hearsay here for truth.
At Basford it fell out, nigh Salisbury. There he
surprised
us, and shot half-a-dozen in cold blood; and for the
rest, this proclamation, and this copy of the Mercury, will
vouch for the truth of what I say.
And with the words, he drew forth from the pocket of his
rusty doublet two documents; the one, a large printed
proclamation
,
in the name of the Commonwealth of England,
offering
a reward of three hundred pounds for the person of the
arch-mutineer, recanted Papist rebel, and relapsed malignant,
Hugh O'Neil, late adjutant and captain of the Lord
General's
third regiment of Ironsides, to be delivered alive or dead
to the first civil magistrate or military commandant of the
united Commonwealth; and the other, an old copy of one of
the newspapers of that day, much soiled and rent, but still
legible
.
This contained a full account of the review of the army
destined for Ireland, in Hyde Park, on the 9th of May; of the
discontent of the soldiers, as there manifested; of the
subsequent
arrest of Lilburne, surnamed Trouble-worldnot as
it would seem without very righteous cause, as the pious
editor remarked; the outbreaks of the mutineers in
Oxfordshire
and Wiltshire; and of the vigorous suppression of the
rebellion, and the execution of the ringleaders at Basford, by
the merciless vigor of Cromwell.
In this, also, Hugh O'Neil was mentioned as one of the prin
cipal leaders, as having been reconciled to the Church by a
proclaimed priest, a worshipper of the Beast, who, despite the
ordinances of the Parliament, had tarried in concealment, and
wrought his iniquities in secret through the land, tempting
Israel
to sin, and the children of Israel to follow strange gods
even as the priests of Baal did in the days of Jehosaphat, the
son of Nebat.
This Hugh O'Neil, it went on to say, had escaped from the
pursuit of the dragoons by the speed of his horse, and had lain
hid for some days, as it was afterwards learnt, among the ruins
of Stonehengea fitting place, in very sooth, the holy
editor remarked, was the blood-stained ruin of a heathenish
high place to be the refuge and asylum of the worshipper of
Antichrist, but was now believed to have made good his es
cape to the neighboring island, where no doubt, he would be
heard of soon amongst the bloodiest persecutors of the Saints,
and staunchest upholders of the son of the Late Man.
After this statement, it proceeded to launch into a fierce
diatribe
against all Papists and Baal-worshippers and followers of
the Beastcautioning the elect people of the Lord to beware
of them, even if they should profess to enter into the
communion
of the saints, as whited sepulchres and wolves in sheep's
clothing, seeking confidence only in order to betray;
blasphemers
and ungodly, who, without, are of mild speech and
innocent seeming, but within are ravening wolves.
Over these documents, Dermot O'Brien ran his eye quickly,
but observantly; and in less time than it has taken to describe
the mass of mingled facts and commentaries, had extracted the
truth, and skimmed over the hypocritical canting verbiage,
which last he did with a bitter, but sarcastic smile.
These papers, both of them, he said, after a pause,
handing
them, as he spoke, to the eldest of his cousins, Con O'Brien,
for his perusal, bear date of the sixth day of June. This day
is the twentieth of July. Strange that we have not heard of
this sooner.
Not strange at all, replied O'Neil, seeing that an
embargo
has been laid on all the ports of England until after the
sailing of the General with his great army, destined to
subjugate
the land, and put every Papist to the sword who shall be
found with weapons in his hand.
And when shall that sail? asked O'Brien, half-tauntingly.
Right glad shall I be to see that same great army landed
here in Ireland. Methinks my Lord of Ormond will render a
right good account of it; and the same sword to which the
worshippers of the Beast are devoted, may, by our Lady's
grace, be dyed red in the life-blood of the Saints. When shall
Saint Cromwell sail, I prithee?
He should have sailed ere thishe should have sailed on
the fifteenth day of July, but that the winds opposed him.
And how came you hither then?
I escaped very hardly through the North Countries into
Scotland, and thence across the Straits by a row-galley, from
Port Patrick to the Island of Magee. Thereafter, as best I
might, I journeyed southward, hoping to find you with the
Lord of Ormond, before Dublin. But you were not there
when I reached the camp.
Have you been in the camp, O'Neil?and how are you
not there in safety?
I was in safety while there was a camp, but
There
was
a camp. In our Lady's name! what mean you?
Speak! man, speak!
The night before the last, I entered the camp before
Dublin
,
with a safe conduct from our good father Mac Odeghan, who
reconciled me three months since in Cheshire, to the earl, and
thought to tarry there until your joining with your people,
which they told me should be ere many days. But with the
dawn yestermorning, Jones broke into our quarters with his
whole garrison, five thousand strong, drove in the outposts or
ere the alarm was given; and before the earl was in his boots,
or his men under arms, had cut the host in two parts, and
wheeling to the left, doubled it up upon the river and destroyed
it. Four thousand men were slain, twenty-five hundred
prisoners
,
at the least, and the earl is in full retreat upon Tredagh.
The siege of Dublin is raised, as surely as you sit there silent
and astounded; within a week Cromwell will be upon us with
eighteen thousand menthe flower of that victorious army
which has ridden over the generous and noble valor of the
English cavaliers, and the dogged resolution of the Scottish
covenanters, unscathed and unbroken. Within a week, the
country will be swept far and near by the merciless dragoons,
and unsparing Ironsides, to whom our people are as the
Philistines
,
and the children of Ammon to the Israelites of old,
heathen
to be hewn down unsparingly, and their slaughter held
good service to the Lord. Safety will be to none but those
who band together in strongholds, and trust for defence to the
mortal sword. Dermot O'Brien, I will serve you well. Will
you afford me shelter, a home, a name, protection?
Can these things be? cried the young earl, perfectly
crushed for the moment, and thunderstruck by those dread
tidings.
By all my hopes of pardon!by all my trust in God!
exclaimed
O'Neil, solemnly.
In which God, O'Neil? asked Dermot, again speaking
with a sneer; for involuntary suspicion crept into his mind
whenever
he heard his apostate kinsman quote the Bible, or allude to
the religion from which he had once fallen away: the God
of our fathers, or the God of the Saints, as you call them?
Hugh O'Neil, how can you ask us to believe you?
What should it profit me to lie to youa lie, if it be one,
which must be discovered with to-morrow's sun?
I know not. Thou wert ever politic and astute, Hugh;
and as I now bethink me, even in thy childhood, given somewhat
to lie!and yet, as thou sayest, what should it profit thee?
For by my soul, if a lie it be, and by to-morrow's dawn I
will
know it, thy carcass shall swing living from the scathed pine
upon the summit of Slievh Buy, until the ravens shall devour
thy false heart-strings. Wilt thou abide the trial? Bethink
thee!Thou hast time; I owe thee still my life. If thou be
guilty, take thy purse, for thine it is, and get thee gone. Three
days' grace shalt thou have and law, ere I or mine pursue thee!
Go with us if thou wilt; but by all that I hold most dear and
most holy, if thou
have
lied to us, the doom which I have said
is thine to-morrow!
I will abide it! I will go with thee!and if I have spoken
truly?
It shall be with thee as thou wilt. Soh! silence there!
silence those bugle-notes! This is no time for minstrelsy or
glee! If this be true that he hath told, we may be called ere
long to sound the mort for Ireland's freedom! To horse, my
men!to horse, and home in silence!
CHAPTER III.
Day set on Norham's castled steep,
And Tweed's fair river, broad and deep
And Cheviot's mountains lone.
Scott
.
No farther words were spoken after the last commands of
the O'Brien had found their way to the ears of his attentive
and obedient vassals. The quartering of the deera ceremony
in those days still observed with much of the old feudal pomp
was left to the wild foxes and wolvesfor there were wolves
yet in Ireland at that timeand to the ravens of the wild
moorland
hills; the bloodhounds, which had received already their
share of the spoil, were coupled up half-surly and insatiate;
girths were tightened, and weapons looked to with some
care, and the little party got to horse and proceeded on their
homeward route, with graver faces and less buoyant hearts than
they had ridden forth in the morning.
The young Earl of Thomondfor such was the true title of the
young gallant chief who was generally known among his
countrymen
as the great O'Brienrode perhaps a hundred yards
in advance of his retainers, between the two elder and most
trusted of his comrades, his cousin, Con O'Brien, and the
gentleman
whom he had addressed as Florence Desmondand to
whose counsel and suggestions he appeared to pay unusual
deference.
This latter, unlike his kinsman, the younger O'Brien, who
was little more than a fine-spirited young cavalier, was a man
somewhat advanced toward the middle age, though not so
much so as to have lost anything either of physical or mental
vigor; and was one whom, from a more casual glance, a
stranger
would have pronounced to be acquainted with the world,
both of courts and camps; and so, in truth, he had been.
In age, he was not, perhaps, so mature as he appeared,
having
been worn considerably by the fatigues of war, and
exposure
to all kinds of weather; and, though he looked a man of
forty years, he had not, probably, passed his thirty-second
summer
.
In person he was very tall, measuring considerably over
six feet in height, admirably built, and broad-shouldered in
proportion to his stature; otherwise he was thin-flanked, and so
slender, although deep-chested, that he might well have been
called thin, had not the round and starting muscles of his limbs
shown clearly that it was the fatty portions of the human frame
alone which had in him been kept down by toil and activity,
while all the rest was hardened into brawn and sinew.
In a word, he was one of those rare specimens of human
perfection
,
whose stature and proportions are so admirably adjusted,
that their preeminence of size is unobserved, until it is
measured
by comparison with some near standard; and then the
observer starts to find that he whom he has taken for an ordinary
man, is in truth a Hercules in power, though almost an Antinous
in grace and symmetry.
He was not, like his kindred and companions, dark-haired
and dark-complexioned, at least, originally; though now his
skin, on the face, neck, and hands, where it had been changed
by the weather, was scorched to more than gipsy swarthiness
from exposure to hotter suns than light the mist-wreathed shores
of the green Island.
His brow, however, where the brim of his beaver, or the
peak of his casque, which with him had been the more usual
head-gear, had kept off the sunbeams, was as smooth and as
white as a lady's forehead; and his eyes were of that deep
steel-grey
which is so rarely found but in persons of peculiar
temperament
and superior qualities. The color of his hair, as it
had been of old, was no longer easily discernible; for it was
now so streaked with lines of wintry grey, and was worn so
thin by the pressure of the helmet, that it resembled more in
hue the mane of the roan courser which he rode than the
love-looks
of a cavalier. It had been once, however, of the deepest
and richest chestnut that ever decked the head of mortal man,
and as remarkable for its luxuriance and soft wavy flow, as for
the splendor of its coloring, and the play of light and shadow
on its almost metallic masses. The only point in which this
fine tint was still perceivable was the pair of heavy drooping
moustaches which he wore after the Spanish fashion,
concealing
the whole of his upper lip; all the rest of his face being close
shaved, contrary to the fashion of the dayat least, in France
and England.
His other features, though fine and nobly-formed, were not
such as would have led any one to call Florence Desmond a
handsome man; and yet there was a changeful play of
expression
over those strongly-marked lineaments, which could not fail
both to attract and rivet the attention. The ordinary character
of his face, when in repose, was grave and solemn
thoughtfulness
,
approaching at times to what might be called heaviness
of aspect; and never, at any time, even in the most violent
action, the most eager and thrilling excitement, did his high,
haughty countenance exhibit that glow of physical and
passionate
enthusiasm which kindles in the veins of the young and
ardent. At the most moving instants, whether of action or
deliberation, the quickest expression that ever lighted up his
aspect was a sort of sharp, hawk-like keenness, purely mental
in its character; and at such moments his thoughts seemed to
rush with instinctive rapidity, and his deeds almost to anticipate
his own volition.
His manners were calm, grave and dignified, almost to
coldness
;
and tinctured with a dignity of air and gait, perhaps
derived
from the Spaniards among whom he had served long,
and with great distinction, which led superficial observers
to believe him intolerably haughty. In speech, unless when
greatly moved, he was somewhat slow, sparing of words, terse,
never trite, though often sententious; but when moved, his
elequence was as impetuous and copious as the mountain
torrent
as
penetrating as the subtle lightning.
Such, in brief, was the appearance, such the exterior
character
,
of a man who had already played a great part on the
great theatre of the world, then crowded with the actors of one
of its mightiest dramas. Scarely a country, not a quarter of
the globe, in which his sword had not been drawn. Banished
by his religion from his native land, he had taken service with
the Spaniards, and learned the art of war in the best school of
tactics, and the finest armies then in Europe; nor had he quitted
them until the horrors and barbarities in the Low Countries had
disgusted him with the standards of the Don; though not till
he had fought beneath them against the Moors at Oran and
Ceata, and against the Buccaneers beyond the Line, on the
coasts of the American terra firma. Again in the Morea, and
on the Asiatic mainland, he had crossed swords with the
Janizaries
and Spahis under the winged lion of St. Mark; and
in a word, with the exception of the British isles, in which his
sword had never seen the light, there was no European
country
in which the name of Florence Desmond was not known as
a man both of counsel and of action.
The dress of this distinguished soldier was very different
from that worn by any of his fellow-hunters, being entirely
foreign, both in cut and materials. It consisted of a
close-fitting
just au corps
of plain black velvet, with jet buttons, but
without lace or ornament of any kind, loose breeches of the
same fabric, with a row of jet buttons down the seam, and
heavy riding-boots of Cordovan leather, with large Spanish
spurs of bright steel. His hat was a regular sombrero, with
one long drooping feather; and the only weapon which he
wore was the old-fashioned Toledo rapier, above four feet in
length, with a steel basket-hilt and scabbard.
With regard to the other gentlemen who composed the
party, it is needless to say more, than that they were, without
an exception, fine-looking, active youths, clad in the usual
attire
of the British cavalier of that day, and well skilled in his
usual accomplishments. High-spirited and brave, they were
of course, for they were Irish gentlemen, and nurtured from
their cradles upward, above the reach of any low idea or
sordid
consideration; but it must be said likewise that there was
no more distinctive force or originality of character among
these nobly-born and nobly-nurtured striplings, than between
these heroes of neid, whom the Mantuan poet has
contented
himself with specifying as Gyas the strong and strong
Cloanthus; and even this distinction was lacking among
these; for, save O'Neil, the stranger, and their chieftain's guest,
Florence Desmond, there was not one man present from Con,
his father's brother's son, down to Phadraigh, the dog-keeper,
whose name was not O'Brien.
Immediately in the rear of the earl, but about a hundred
yards behind him, rode a couple of stout, well-armed men,
faithful retainers both, and clansmen, whose duty it was to
wait especially upon his person, and to look after his safety in
those times of treachery and bloodshed. After these again
followed three persons, of whom Hugh O'Neil was in the
centre
,
between two of the earl's younger cousins, Ulick and
James O'Brien, both of whom were thoroughly upon their
guard, seeming to look upon their apostate, and now, as he
said, repentant kinsman, rather in the light of a prisoner than
of a guest. For they interchanged no words with him of any
kind, while they kept a quick watch upon his every
movement
;
so that, although no personal restraint was put upon
him, and he retained his weapons, even to the musquetoon,
which he had reloaded since it had done such good service, he
would have found it no easy matter to escape, had he desired
to do so, from the party.
It did not appear, however, that he entertained any such
idea; for he jogged along quite contentedly, spurring the
miserable garron he bestrode to its best pace, in order to
compel it to keep up with the high-bred and gallant coursers,
which, despite of their morning's gallop, fretted and chafed
against the bit, as if they had not run a mile. After a while,
he drew out a short, dingy pipe, from the pocket of his
doublet
,
crammed it with Virginia tobacco, and, striking a light by
means of a flint and steel, which he produced from the same
receptacle, began to smoke as assiduously as if his life had
depended on the maintenance of a dense volume of white
smoke about his ill-conditioned features. This, which is now
almost a national habit and peculiarity of the Irish, especially
of the lower orders, was at that time almost unknown in that
country; nor was it prevalent, to any great degree then,
among the cavaliers of the neighboring Island; although with
the Puritans and Parliamentarians, most of whom were of the
middle classes, it was very general; and as O'Neil resorted to
it, probably as much to kill the time, which hung heavily on
his hands in his social solitude, and to keep up the
appearance
of recklessness and hardihood, the gentlemen of the
company
drew themselves up in their stirrups even more stiffly
than before, and casting at one another contemptuous glances,
began to snuff the air, as if it were polluted, muttering, loud
enough to be clearly heard, plain maledictions on the
low-breeding
of the heretic apostate; and alluding to it as a trick
which he had caught in the barrack-rooms of the Ironsides, or
the conventicle of Praise God Barebones.
Little, however, did the object of their animadversions
appear
to care for them or their insulting comments. His end
was gained, when he had obtained permission, how ungraciously
soever it were given, to follow the O'Brien to his castle; and
that accomplished, like a true philosopher, he took no heed for
what he could not remedy, and affected not to observe what
in reality made the blood boil in his veins.
It needed many hours of riding to bring them to the demesnes
of the O'Brien, so intricate and circuitous were the passes
through those wild moorland hills, and so difficult was the
nature of the ground through which the wild horse-track led,
never allowing them to move faster than a trot, and frequently
keeping them at a foot's pace. But if their progress was slow
and wearisome, so delicious was the soft summer weather, and
so lovely the wild, romantic scenery through which they rode,
that had not the minds of all the leaders of the party been
preoccupied by anxious and gloomy thoughts, the journey
would have been one of unmixed pleasure.
The nearer they approached to the grand mountain masses
of Slievh-Buy, the bolder became the whole face of the
country
,
the more steep and abrupt the successive hills which they
had to scale, the more deep and shadowy the glens which were
threaded by their winding road. The open, rolling expanse
of the heathery moors was changed for a very labyrinth of
knolls and craggy ridges, feathered some half-way to the
summit
with fine hanging woods, but bare above, and crowned
with naked piles of scarred and splintered rock. The
intervening
hollows were no longer smoothly sloping vales, with
broad trout-streams wandering through their gentle laps, but,
at first, deep-wooded glens with brawling brooks foaning and
chafing over fall and rapid, and then precipitous rock-walled
ravines, watered by actual torrents, all alike, trout-stream,
brook and torrent, working their devious way westward to
join the distant Slaney.
Meantime Slievh Buy itself, which showed from the spot
where the stag was slain in the forenoon, only as a huge
perpendicular
wall of cerulean shadow looming up grand and
massive against the lustrous morning sky, now glimmered out
resplendent, as the waning sunbeams fell on it, mellowed only
3
by the soft mountain haze, in its true character. Its salient
butteresses of living rock stood out in bread relief, while its
dim gorges and ravines, umbragcous with dense forest,
gloomed
in their purple shadows. Here, seen at intervals on the
bare steeps, and lost again to view in the woody hollows, a
long, sharp streak of silvery radiance would indicate the swift
deseent of a mountain cataract; and there, against the sky, a
giant pine would rise conspicuous and sharp, so towering was
its stature, even at that far distance.
Often, as they advanced, and became more and more
entangled
in the passes, the road, after climbing some precipitous
ridge, would descend at so sharp an angle as compelled the
cavaliers to dismount and lead their good steeds by the bridle,
into the channel of some black, whirling torrent, walled on
the farther side by sheer ramparts of rock, and affording
neither space for a track, however narrow, in the bottom, nor
any egress on the farther side from the abyss. In these
defiles
no
less than four of which occurred before they arrived
at the base of the great mountain ridgethe party plunged
unhesitatingly
into the waters, and rode for a considerable
distance
in
one instance above half a mileeither up or down the
channeloften more than bolly-deep, and always with much
difficulty and some danger, so slippery was the pebbly bed,
and so strong the stream, before the roadif road it could be
calledagain emerged on the farther side.
At the last and longest of these passes, up which the active
Irish horses scrambled with splash and bound, climbing a
rough, shelving rapid, down which the arrowy waters foamed
as if down a giant staireasealthough no mortal form was
seen, nor any sign of human life, the party of O'Brien was
thrice hailed from the summits of the cliffs, or from some
crevices in their black treeless sides, by a wild, shrill yell,
which seemed to syllable articulate words in some strange
language, and to each of which the earl replied by a single
not
on his bugle-horn, after which no farther sound was
heard, nor any opposition offered to their progress. It did
not fail, however, to occur to the shrewd mind of O'Neil,
acute by nature, and sharpened by the study of all resources
of the military art, that this occurred in each case at points of
the defile where the windings of the channel, and the
commanding
elevation of the crags, would have exposed the party
to be cut up by a cross-fire from front, rear, and both flanks
at once, should an active enemy be in possession of the two
sides at once of the ravine. Nor did he doubt, in the least,
that this was the case; and that out-lying bands of the kernes
of the O'Brien clan were scattered throughout all the lower
ranges of the hill country, with an especial view to the
defence
of the passes which led to one of the great fastnesses of
that powerful family.
As these thoughts passed through the mind of the dark and
wily renegade, bold as he was, and accustomed to rely for the
defence of his head on the strongth and sleight of his own
hand, he could not so control his feelings, but that he turned
somewhat pale, when he considered how many times that
very morning he might have passed within point-blank range
either of ball or arrowfot bows were still, even to that day,
the primitive weapons of some of that wild peopleof those
who, had they recognised, would have slain him with less
mercy than they would have shown to the felon-wolf, before
he had obtained the unwilling safeguard of the O'Brien's
company.
One of the youths who rode beside his bridle-rein noted the
change which blanched his features; and, looking full in his
face with a sneering smile, said, with a bitter emphasis and a
slight foreign accent:
It is no easy thing for an enemy to enter the O'Brien's
country. Voices are not heard unless hands are nigh, and
willing hands find ready weapons.
I know both the O'Brien, and the O'Brien's country!
was the short, stern reply; for the man was not alarmed, but
startled only, and had manned himself on the instant.
It is well for you you do! answered the other. For
then you know, that if it be hard for a foe to enter, it is yet
harder for a spy to quit! For the traitor, every heather-bush
holds a musket or a skene, every oak-tree a halter, every
cairn a grave!
Best take heed then that you find them not a subject, or a
tenant! answered O'Neil, with a grim smile. For me, I
neither heed your counsels, fear your menaces, nor seek your
friendship! Go, boy, talk with your equals; when I reck to
converse, it will be with your betters!
My betters! exclaimed the fiery Celt, his hot blood
flushing
to his brow in crimson. Thou converse with my betters!
Seek them in Heaven, then, or, where thou art more like to
journey, in the depths of
Hold! interrupted the calm, grave voice of the great
O'Brien, who, attracted by the loud tones and impassioned
accents
of the angry speakers, had turned just in time to anticipate
a eatastrophe; for the blade of a long, keen knife was already
glittering and brandished high in the hand of the clansman.
Hold your hand!for shame! would you strike a hostage,
and him under safe conduct? Go to the rear, sirrah, and give
up your arms to my brother Ulick, until you know better how
to use them. And you, O'Neil, spur your horse hitherward;
and if you be wise, as men say you are, keep a shut mouth
and a humble tongue. There be none here who leve theenone
who do not suspectmany who hate thee! But my word is
plighted for thy safety, and thou art safe for this night, from any
mortal power to harm thee.
The clansman, hot as he was, and fiery, thus rebuked by his
great chief, had not a word to offer in reply. The flush faded
out from his burning brow; the spark diod in his passionate
eye; he sheathed his skene on the instant, and, drawing it
from his girdle, together with the sword which he unhooked
from the hangers, delivered them, deeply humiliated, to his
cousin. This done, he reined his charger up till all the party
had passed him by, even the lowest menials with the laggards
of the pack, and fell in gloomily, the last of the train.
Meantime, O'Neil spurred up his wretched garron sharply,
and making his way between the horses of the two armed
vaseals
,
came up immediately behind the chief. But, unlike the
youthful clansman, he took the rebuke bitterly and almost
haughtily, muttering as he rode along: Hostage!hostage,
forsooth! This comes, I trow, of saving a man's lifeand that
man a kinsman too! But as he came within close ear-shot of
the earl, he ceased his low muttering, raised his voice to its
natural pitch, and said boldly:
Safe for this night, my lord earl! And is that the extent
of your power, or of your will only, I beseech you? And shall
I
not
be safe to-morrow? For if the latter be your meaning,
I will see if a clean pair of heels may not preserve my head a
little longer than your gratitude seems likely to respect it.
Little would your heels, or your hand either, as you well
know, O'Neil, avail you! For were I but to frown on you
and shake my head, or to turn my bridle-rein and leave you,
three minutes would, I trew, be long measure of your life.
Irish skenes make sharp work, and that very presently. For
the rest, you know the terms; it your tidings be true,
protection
at least, if we may not give friendship! If false, a halter!
For to-night, therefore, you are safe as a hostage, and every
bostage is a guest; so be our guest to-night, O'Neillet
tomorrow
bring with it, as it may, life or death, joy or sorrow.
Good faith! if it rest on that alone, full small concern have
I, replied O'Neil, for what I have told you is but the
simple
truth, and the more you search it out, the surer you shall
find it.
There was so singular an expression of triumph and exultation
in his voice, as he referred to the certainty of his ill-omened
tidings, that the young earl felt all his former apprehensions
and suspicions of the man returning on him unabated, or rather
with increased force; although a few minutes before, he had
been strongly inclined to put some faith not only in the tale of
which he was the bearer, but in the truth of his repentance,
and return to the faith of his fathers.
He now fixed his eye upon his face coldly and sternly, and
shook his head with a dubious air, as he said in a low, sad
voice:
Alas! O'Neil, alas! for the days that are gone, before thy
delinquency first took from me that best and most fleeting of
humanity's delusionsman's mutual trust in man! I wish even
now to think of thee as of one erring, yet not lost. And lo! as
if to rebuke my misplaced confidence, comes that dark sneer
upon thy lip, that tone of triumphant joy in thy voice, speaking
of things most ruinous to the cause which thou now callest thine.
Thine eye is enkindled even now with the
wolfish-bloodthirst
of the Puritan gladiator; thy voice exulteth as thou wert
enraptured at the success of the savage, Independent Jones
How, then, may I trust thee?
Good cousin, mine, and great Earl O'Brien, answered the
other, without showing the least emotion at the half-affectionate
expostulation of his kinsman, whose generous nature, all averse
naturally from suspicion, recoiled from the doubts which were
so odious and repugnant to its frank spiritwere you ever
in such pleasant circumstance, as to know that it depended solely
whether you should break your fast to-morrow upon
grousepie
and malvoisie, or dance a coranto in mid air, with your
neck instead of your heels, quivering on the tight-rope, upon
the truth or falsity of a reported story, methinks you would be
somewhat apt to make merry at the knowledge that an inch
or two will not be added to your stature, by the lengthening
of your neck before daylighteven if that knowledge were
purchased by the certainty of what were otherwise unmissed
disaster. How say you, my fair kinsman?
That I trust I shall be dead in very earnest, or ere the
certainty
of ruin to my country and my king should lead me to
rejoice. I thinkI hopeI should be found more willing to
die, even upon the gallows-tree, assured that they were
prosperous
and safe, than to owe my escape from that foul and
disgraceful
doom, to the certainty of their destruction. But who
can say that he knows himself? Perchance, Hugh O'Neil, I
have wronged thee!
You have wronged me, Dermot, answered the other, his
face lightening up somewhat at this sudden and unexpected
alteration in the earl's tone. You have greatly wronged me,
for I protest
Protest nothing, Hugh! the young nobleman gravely
interrupted
him. I never have known any good to come of
protestations; and for the rest, if I have wronged thee as thou
sayest, thou art an injured man; and injured virtue should be
not loud but silent. But new a truce to this! Thou art my
guest for the night at least; and if the morning shall prove thy
tidings true, and that thou hast in all sincerity returned to the
true faith, from which an evil hour and a false villain's tongue
seduced theein all sincerity returned to the service of thy
country and thy king, never was erring son so welcomed home
to the hearth stone of his father's house as thou shalt be to
the clansmen of thy mother's race; never were such rejoicings
raised for one thought dead, and suddenly found living, as shall
be raised for thee, my cousin. And lo! even as I speak, the
turrets of my father's house! May it be an omen!
An omen! replied O'Neil, enthusiastically, a good, a
glorious omen!in omen that I shall sin no more, and thou
learn again to trust thy kinsman, never again to be deceived.
And as he spoke, he extended his hand cordially, and in the
warmth and ferver of his high and noble heart, Dermot O'Brien
grasped it, and wrung it cordially, in the full sight of all his
half-astonished, yet rejoicing vassals. For the Irish heart is a
strange, fitful instrument, easily played upon and awakened to
the softest and most touching melodies, easily, alas! jangled to
the saddest and most stormy discords. And now, as the
clansmen
beheld their chieftain, whom they almost worshipped as
the best and noblest of mankind, grasping the hand of the
repentant
renegade, they deemed, in the simplicity of their honest
impulsive souls, that all was surely right, now that the earl had
pardoned him; and brandishing their arms aloft, they gave vent
to their wild joy and transport in a long burst of triumphant
yells and shouts, full of that thrilling frenzy which marks all
outburstswhether gay or gloomy, whether fierce or fondof
the feelings of the yet unreclaimed and unconquered Celtish
races.
It was a lovely scene, and a grand spectacle combined. The
setting sun poured its broad golden light over the animated
moving group, horses and men, and noble hounds with all
accessories
of glancing arms, and waving plumes, and gay vestures,
glittering in the foreground; for they had just ascended to the
brow of a steep, bare-topped hill, across which the road ran in
full view of the glowing heavens, and thus caught every ray
of light that streamed nearly level from the westward.
Below the brow on which they stood, the ground fell away
in a long slope, covered with rich woods, to the verge of a broad
tract of lovely meadow-land, all clad in the unchanged emerald
verdure which is especially the characteristic of that
soft-climed
and fertile island. Through this sweet lap of dewy
meadows, now checkered with bright lights and broad blue
shadows, projected from the leafy knolls and clumps of
scattered
trees, a wide and noble river rolled slowly to the
southward
,
the largest tributary of the majestic Slaney.
Beyond this, ridge above ridge, and forest above forest,
uprose the lower heights of the great mountain of Slievh Buy,
and above these again preeminent, and seeming to stand almost
midway between the base and the cloud-capt summit of the
huge mountain, upon a vast bare ledge of precipitous crags,
fronting the westering sun, with its long lines of sweeping
walls, its massive turrets, and its vast keep, towering above all
like an earth-born giant, shone out from the dark woods around,
and behind it, the old baronial castle, time honored home of
the O'Briens, glorious in the red lustre of the dying sunset.
The banner of the king waved high above its topmost tower;
and higher, higher yet, above the banner-staff and glittering
blazonryabove the misty pinnacles of the huge hillyea! and
almost above the golden clouds, which hovered like a glory
round its peak, there soared on balanced wings, distinctly seen,
although so far aloof against the glowing sky, a solitary eagle.
O'Brien's quick eye caught it on the instant, and pointing
upward
with his right hand, a proud gesture, and a flashing eye,
as the majestic bird rose higher yet and higher, he exclaimed,
as if in allusion to the last words of O'Neil:
Is that too an omen?
Even as he spoke, the sun sank behind the western hill, the
royal banner fluttered for an instant, and was slowly lowered,
while the evening gun boomed from the battlements; and in
that very point of time the eagle swooped, plunged like an
arrow
downward through pure air and cold grey mist, and was
lost to the sight in less than a second, amid the purple shadows
which enwrapped the colossal outlines of Slievh Buy.
Alas! for the self-deceiving heart of man!whether of these
two was the omenwhether the lie of the false prophet!
No word more spake O'Brien. Perhaps the contrast touched
his imaginative mind. He gave his horse the spur, and galloped
down into the smooth valley at the top of his pace, followed
by all his train, eager to gain the castle, or ere the last glimpse
of daylight should desert them.
CHAPTER IV.
A perfect woman nobly planned,
To warn, to comfort, and command;
And yet a spirit still, and bright,
With something of an angel light.
Wordsworth
.
The
sun had long set before the little cavalcade, crossing
the valley and the broad river by the old stone bridge, arrived
at the base of the main mountain of Slievh-Buy. After
passing
the great stream, two several glens, each with its foaming
tributary, had been traversed; and now a third, darker, deeper,
and more difficult than any which had yet been encountered;
and as they descended into its black and abrupt ravine, the
waning light which was fast fading in the western sky
deserted
them entirely, and it was only by the deep and angry roar
of waters that they could judge of the force and volume of
the torrent into which they were about to plunge.
The road leading downward into this darksome gulf was
scarped and hewn by the pick and chisel, out of the solid rock
which walled the chasm, and descended by three steep traverses
from the summit of the crags to the level of the stream; but its
soil, which was evidently artificial, was soft though firm, and
afforded a good foot-hold to the hoofs of the active and
surefooted
Irish horses. As they rode down into the lower gloom,
it grew not only palpably obscure at every step, but so damp
and cold from the thick mist-wreaths and spray of the torrent,
that O'Neil's teeth chattered audibly in his jaws, and his hand
shivered, so that he could scarcely hold his horse. They
reached the bottom, and a broad black pool lay before them,
with a few wreaths of foam floating round and round in its
whirling eddies, and embossing its dark surface, like spume
flakes on the glossy hide of a coal-black charger; while at a
short distance upward, to the right hand, stood erect, though
wavering to and fro in the darkness, and momently changing
its aspect, what looked at first like a gigantic sheeted phantom,
but what was in reality the great descending column of the
mountain
cataract, whose roar they had heard for the last half-hour.
Downward to the left hand, nothing could be perceived, but
the salient angles of the perpendicular walls of the ravine
their bases lost in the blackness of what seemed a fathomless
abyss, whence rose the hoarse voice of the tortured river
raving
in impotent rage against the obstacles which barred its
headlong way.
Even by day it was a fearful pass; at night it was most
perilous
;
and unable to judge the depth of the sullen forward, or
even to distinguish the mouth of the mountain road on the
farther
brink, he must have been a rash and reckless man who
would have attempted to ride it at that hour, and in that fading
light. Dermot O'Brien himself, to whom every turn and pass
in those hills was familiar from his boyhood, drew his rein
doubtfully, and paused at the brink of the ford; until one or
two of the kernes, who had ridden in the rear with the hounds,
dismounted, and came running down the road to the master's
stirrup.
Torlogh, said he, addressing the first comer, a wild,
shock-headed
varlet, having his hair hanging in
glibbes
or knotled
elf-locks over his shouldersand wearing the old national
costume
of the shirt of saffron-dyed linen, with a coarse scarf or
mantle of groen woollen stuff above itTorlogh, the waters
are up, I think, since morning. There must have been rain in
the hills since we crossed at daybreak. I cannot see the
guidestone
on the other side, and I doubt it is not passable!
He spoke in the Erse tongue, and in the same his vassal
answered
him, in a few brief accents, during the utterance of
which, he cast off his cloak and his brogues of untanned hide,
and made himself ready to plunge into the stream.
O'Brien remonstrated and half forbade him, but the wild
vassal would hear no denial, but stepped fearlessly into the
water, which, before he was ten feet distant from the bank,
took him up nearly to the arm-pits.
It has risen! he exclaimed. Hold back, my lord, it is
very strongit is
But ere he had completed the sentence, he was swept off his
legs by the force of the stream, and whirled down the channel,
striking out powerfully, and swimming high and strongly, till
they lost sight of him in the deep shadows.
Come back! shouted O'Brien, greatly moved at his peril.
Come back, I command you, Torlogh! You were insane to
try itand I scarce less so to permit the trial. Come back, I
say! I will not have your blood on my headand you my
foster
brother!
But the other man, who had accompanied Torlogh to the
brink, and had been carefully examining the state of the water,
now raised his voice and shouted as loudly as he could:
Hold over, Torlogh, boyhold over! Four stout strokes
more will stem it! And then turning to the earl, who was not
well pleased at hearing his orders countermanded thus,To
turn back would be sure death, if it please you! he said.
Before he could face the eddy he would be swept over the
black boar's back, and plunged into the hell-kettle, down below
there! The current is strongest on this bank, and will set him
over!
The earl made no reply; but his heart was very full, and his
anxiety was almost irrepressible; for the man was a favorite,
both as a faithful and favored follower, and as the son of the
woman by whom he had been himself nurseda connection
which was considered at that time, and in that country, as
second
only to a close blood relationship.
To all it was a minute of extreme and torturing suspense,
and every one listened as if his life depended on his ears, for
the least sign that should tell of the swimmer's whereabout. It
was but a minute, however; for the stream was not twenty-five
yards over, although the peculiarity of its scenery, the
indistinctness
of the light, and the exaggerated idea of its
importance
derived from its arrowy rush, and deep melancholy
roar, caused the bystanderseven those who knew the place
to over-estimate the time, and perhaps the peril.
Within a minute, however, a wild, cheery shout was raised
on the other verge, announcing the safe landing of the hardy
clansman, at a point some twenty or thirty paces lower down
the stream than that where they stood, and a second or two
afterwards
,
a bright spark of light was seen opposite, and then a
clear glancing blaze as he kindled a splinter of dry bog pine
stores of which lay piled in the clefts of the ravineand waved
it above his head.
Here is the white mark stone! he shouted, but its head
only is above the foam. Tarry, awhile, and stir not for your
lives, until I light a beacon up that shall guide you. I think
too, he added, that the stream is lowering even now.
That is good counsel, anywise! said the old man who had
shouted before, and who was no other than the O'Brien's chief
huntsman, and Torlogh's paternal uncle. He will soon build
a pile of bog pine, that will make the pass as light as noonday;
and the stream is lowering too, for a certainty. It has shrunk
half a foot since I stood here. Look you, my lord!this black
stone was covered but now!and with the word he struck the
massy top of a black boulder with his hunting pole,and
now the water is six inches below it!
By this time the light on the farther shore began to increase
in size and volume, and to send up long wavering gleams
which kindled all the fantastic crags, and the wreathed roots of
the old fir trees, which grasped their flanks in coils like those
of giant serpents, and showed the dark figure of the clansman
flitting about his pyre, collecting fuel, and heaping it with an
unsparing hand, until the strong glow rushed up, roaring and
shooting out strange rocket-like jets of flame, and bright flakes
of fire among the volumes of white smoke. Then a broad
wake of light furrowed the ripples of the stream to the very
feet of the little party, and the clear glare illuminated the
whole gorge, playing upon the swarthy features and bright
arms of the clansmen, and bringing out the rocky pass above
them in strong relief, and rendering the whole ravine, in truth,
as the old huntsman had said, as bright as at noonday.
Bravely done, Torlogh! Bravely done in faith! cried the
earl. Now we may, indeed, cross over safely; and by my
faith, the torrent has shrunk in its bed a foot since we reached
it. A little higher up, O'Neil!a little higher up, I say! he
added, riding a little way up the bank toward the cataract,
before
entering the water. So shall you have space to allow
for the drift of the brook, which is still strong and deep. Keep
your nag's head well to the current, and steer for the gravel
shoal thereten feet or so on this side the beacon.
Then, without farther words, the brave young lord spurred his
strong charger down into the channel; and though the horse
was reluctant to face the whirl and rush of the eddy, he
managed
him with such consummate skill and power, that after a
floundering plunge and a few violent bounds, half-galloping,
half-swimming, he took ground on the farther bank, and
carried
his rider gallantly acrossthe foremost man of all his
trainin less than ten seconds after he had entered the ford.
Convinced that there was now no real danger more, and
stimulated
by the energy and example of their chief, the whole
band plunged in together in a compact body, and stemming
the stream, and breaking its current by the opposition of so
large and powerful a mass, easily struggled through it, and
gained the other side without accidenteven to the miserable
garron of O'Neil, which was rather pushed across by the
impetus
of the stronger chargers than by any efforts of its own;
and which had scarcely ascended the gravelly ascent before it
stood stock still, now utterly exhausted, and positively refused
to move a pace under any application of the spur or thong.
This difficulty was, however, speedily remediedone of the
vassals being dismounted, and O'Neil installed in his saddle;
and without farther delay, by the light of Torlogh's brands, on
which a reinforcement had been heaped before starting, they
climbed onward up a long scarped pass, traverse above
traverse
,
like those on the other side, toward the castle of the
great earlthe lights of which were now seen glistening above
their heads, among the foliage of the great trees which
surrounded
it. The length of the pass, however, and the
steepness
of the ascent, prevented them making very rapid progress;
and the keen eyes of Hugh O'Neil soon assured him that the
length and steepness of the way would be the least of the
impediments
to be encountered by an assailing force in an
attempt
on that stronghold; for he could see that every traverse
was now commanded by a breastwork constructed on the top,
as well as by crenelies worked in the face of the rocks, the
latter communicating probably with caverned galleries
quarried
in the hill, whence the whole road could be swept by a
direct, plunging fire. In addition to this, they passed three
fortalices, constructed at the re-entering angles of three distinct
traverses, whose massive arches of masonry, battlemented
and flanked by round towers, each provided with a double
portcullis of hammered iron, crossed the gorge from side to
side, and must necessarily be stormed one by one, under a
terrible
cross fire, before the castle itself could be approached.
These formidable outworks were now, however, all
undefended
the
watch-towers untenanted, the portcullises drawn
up, and the great iron-studded portals standing unbarred and
wide open. There were no signs of decay, however, or
neglect
;
on the contrary, the masonry was all sharp and clean,
and seemed to have been pointed recently; the iron-work
was free from rust, and over the two upper arches some
pieces of ordnance of heavy calibre appeared to have been
mounted newly, and were provided each with its pyramid of
shot piled beside it.
After passing the last of these gates, they landed on a small
level esplanade of rocky soil, studded by a few enormous
pinetrees
,
which stood, however, so far apart as to afford no shelter
to an enemy from the guns of the main fortalice.
This rose on an abrupt knoll of rock above the tops of the
highest of these trees, divided from the esplanade by a vast dry
ditch, hewn in the rock to a depth of fifty feet, and an equal
widtha veritable work of giantsisolating the castle altogether
from the main hill. For it was situated on a small, craggy
peninsula
,
the isthmus of which was cut across by this ditch,
jutting
out from a lower spur of Slievh-Buy, and facing the main
mountain, from which it was severed by the same torrent which
they had passed below, flowing at the foot of precipices
inaccessible
even to the foot of the wild goat.
A grand old Norman pile it was, built evidently by the
invaders
of the Isle, soon after their first landing, to curb the
bellicose
and fiery natives, whom their superior arms and iron
disciplise
had but enabled them half to subdue. But more
fortunate
than many of its sister fortresses, which had even then
fallen
into ruinsome by neglect and the fallen fortunes of their
owners, some by the devastating tooth of time, and some beneath
the dint of Elizabeth's artillery in the great rebellion of Tyrone
and O'Neilthis noble place of strength, known as the
Red-Rock
Castle of O'Brien, still towered sublime and perfect upon
its earth-fast base, and overlooked leagues and leagues of the
surrounding country from the proud eminence upon which it
was perched like an eagle's eyry.
It had consisted, in the first instance, like all Norman holds,
of one huge central keep, or dungeon, a tall square tower, with
small octagonal turrets, one at every angle, buttressed and
bartizaned, crenelled and machicolated, according to the
utmost
science of that day, for the vantage of all the weapons then
invented. This keep, perched on a central knoll, and
domineering
all the lower defences, consisting of a strong single rampart
with many flanking towers, a castellated gate-house and
drawbridge
over the ditch, had been originally the sole dwelling
within the circuit of the walls; but with the growth of time,
the wants and luxuries of men had grown likewise, and
building
after building had been added in accordance with the milder
tastes of the times, till the whole area within the gates was
filled with noble and commodions buildings, suited rather, as
they seemed, for the court of a sovereign prince than for the
dwelling of any private subject, however high or mighty.
By this time it was as dark as it ever is on a summer's night
in the British islands. The moon had not yet risen, and the
faint glimmer of the twinkling stars was intercepted on one
side by the great pine trees which I have mentioned, and on
the other by the towering masses of the huge mountain chain,
on a spur of which the fortalice of the great earl was situated.
It was evident, however, already, that the clank of their
horses' hoofs had been heard in the castle, and that the party
was both looked for and expected; for lights were appearing
and disappearing in all the windows of the main building, and
a bustle of footsteps and hurried voices was audible in the
court-yard, hurrying toward the gate-house.
Before O'Brien had time to raise his bugle to his lips, which
he did as soon as he drew up his horse near the verge of the
dry ditch, upon what would be the glacis of a modern fortress,
a torch was displayed above the gates, and a loud voice was
heard challenging the new comers.
It is I! cried the earl, I, the O'Brien! Down bridge and
up gatesfor if you within be not tired with waiting supper, I
am without, I assure you.
A loud shout was the answer, and an eager hum of welcome;
and in a moment afterwards the creaking of the hinges and the
clash of the heavy chains announced the lowering of the
drawbridge
,
which soon extended its frail and narrow length across
the deep black fosse, and echoed hollowly beneath the hoofs of
the horses as they entered.
The gates were thrown wide open, and a broad glare of red
light was thrown far out into the bosom of the darkness, from
the yawning porch, for all the interior court was blazing with
4
links and cressets, in the hands of a numerous assemblage of
wild-looking clansmen and vassals; and beyond this the great
doors of the castle stood wide apart, the focus of a clear
illumination
with several figures, male and fomale, drawn sharp and
distinct
in relief against the instrous back-ground.
The earl fell back a pace or two as the company rode into the
court, and spoke a word with his younger kinsmen whom he
had previously addressed as Con and Ulick, in the Erse tongue,
which he seemed to suppose that O'Neil had never understood,
or forgottenfor it was evident from the glance of his eye and
the gesture of his hand, that it was of him he was speaking.
Keep him back, he said, or take him aside with you to
the stables or the kennelor I care not where; but I would not
that my mother or Ellinor should see him till they are
prepared
;
and I would fain speak also with Father Daly. Do you
mark me, cousins?
Had I my will, answered Ulick, quickly, I would have
him aside, and that right speedily, into the castle dungeon, there
to abide antil we shall have learned what he iswhether rebel,
spy, traitor, or renegadoand then, in any count, a short shrift
and a long rope. Either way, he has earned it!
Hush, Ulick, hush!and remember, if he were the devil, he
has saved my life this very day. Then raising his voice, and
touching his horse with the spur, he pricked on to the side of
O'Neil, who had paused irresolute, when he found that his
entertainer
and protector was behind him, well knowing that he
was like to find small favor in the eyes of the retainers. Ride
round with my cousins, O'Neil, to the stables, and bestow your
steed, he said, and then join us in the hall. It is meet that
I announce your coming, ere you meet the eyes that will be
upon you when you enter. You, Florence, tarry with me.
I would two words with you. Away to the stables and the
kennels, all of you, he added, addressing the loiterers, and
give the gentlemen light to bestow their steeds. You,
Hardress
,
call me the seneschal, and come back with a torch.
The page, to whom he spoke the last words, a handsome
boy in a green velvet
justau corps
, and plumed bonnet in his
hand, who had held his lord's stirrup as he dismounted, gave
up the charger to a groom, and hurried away, leaving the
O'Brien alone with Colonel Desmond, under the arch of the
gate-house, with no other person near him but two or three
porters and underwardens, who were busy lowering the gates
and securing the portcullis.
This is all vastly disagreeable, Florence, said the earl
and he now used the French language, which he spoke with
the fluency of a nativeand very doubtful also. I do not
half believe his tidings; and yet I think he dare not attempt
such deceit, nor can I see his motives.
I
do
believe his tidings, Dermot, answered his friend;
though no man can say what may or may not be his motives;
and as for daring, I believe the want of courage is the only vice
O'Neil was never charged with. But I assure you, as I said
before
,
I do believe his tidings.
The more reason for preeaution, then, said the earl,
thoughtfully. But, true or false, it will never do to leave the
outworks open any longer.
By this time the page, Hardress O'Brien, a distant kinsman of
the earl's, had returned, and with him came a venerable old
white-headed man, of great height, and of a frame still powerful
and robust, in spite of his advanced years.
There are strange tidings on the wind, McCarthy, said
Dermot to the old follower of his house, who had once been
the page of his grandsire, and after that his father's
bannerman
and avenger when he fell at Edgehill fight; strange
and ill tidings; and though I doubt their truth, I would have all
the gates of the pass closed, and watches duly set this very
night, and constantly hereafter, and all the ordnance loaded.
Whom will you set in command?
I will go down myself to the low port, my lord, with ten
men. Dennis McMorrough and old Shamus More can take
the other wards, each with five of the people. I will see all
secure within an hour. But what is this they tell me, good my
lord--that the black traitor, Hugh O'Neil, is in the castle court,
and not in chains, nor ordered for the dungeon?
Tis even so, McCarthy. Had it not been for him, I had
been slain this day, or sorely wounded
I would you had been sorely wounded rather than owe
escape
to him. From being nigh slain, had there been any chance
of that, he would not have stirred hand or foot to save you
unless
for some base end. But, surely, surely, you will not suffer
him to tarry bere with your noble
Hush!not a word of that, not a breath, a hint, as you love
me, McCarthy. Here he must tarry, for this night at least;
and mark mefor my word is pledged and my honor at stake
for itin safety and in honor too! But fear nought for me,
McCarthy; my eyes are open, and I will watch and judge; and
if he think to deceive, on his own head be the consequence.
He vows that he is reconciled to the church, and has returned
to the standard of the king.
The Lord forbid that I should fight by his side under it,
replied the old man, doggedly. But it is yours to command,
noble earl, and mine to obey. Good night to your lordship; all
shall be safe shut and ward set within the hour. Ho, Shamus
More, and you, Dennis Mac Morrough, turn me out twenty men
of the warden's guard, with torch and pike, within ten minutes.
You hear, Florence, said O'Brien, turning toward his
friend, and speaking in a melancholy tone, with a dark brow
and downcast expressionyou hearthe same from every
one!
I looked to hear nought else, answered the colonel, from
gerrulous old superstitious veterans, like good McCarthy, and
young, over-boiling hot-heads, like cousin Con and cousin Ulick.
But I did look to hear something very different from the lips of
a man of the world, a man of action, and a man of connsel, like
yourself, my noble friend. This fellow is a miscreantgranted!
A traitor, and it may be a murderer! Well, we know it, and
are upon our guard! Shrewdly suspected of false dealing
toward your honorable father, we will watch, and may detect
him! In all this I see nought for apprehension. That he has
his own ends to accomplish in coming hither, I doubt not;
and from the character and known disposition of the man, it is
most like that those ends are evil. Still he is in our power,
and I see no cause for alarm, though much for watchfulness,
much for suspicion. Whither do your doubts point, my lord?
for sure I am that they point to something tangible.
Not very tangible, good friend. Yet I will tell you. He
was ever a favorite of Father Hyland Daly, and his most chosen
pupil. Even after his infamous apostacy I have heard the priest
sigh when others cursed him; and sure I am he will now receive
him as a penitent, and welcome him back with open arms.
Then you know, Desmond, how strange and paramount an
interest
this Daly has with my mother, and even with my own
sweet Eily
You cannot fear him
there
, O'Bricn, returned his friend.
If she were capable of swerving newnay, of hesitating but
one instantthe tenth part of one thinking-timeI should say,
let her go, and well gone! But that is impossible; you cannot,
I repeat, fear that.
It is indeed impossible; and I do not fear
that
, if by
that
,
you would say her good faith, her absolute affection, or her
unstained
honor. But his hypocrisy, his machinations, his
fiendish
subtlety, and unmatched ingenuity in falsehood, I do dread,
and I confess it. Right certain am I that the tidings of my
approaching
marriage have had far more to do with his coming
hither, than any mutiny of Ironsides in Hyde Park, or sally
of Jones from Dublin, or sailing of the arch fiend Cromwell
whom may the Lord confound!from Liverpool or London.
Why, then, in the name of all that is wonderful, did you
allow him to come in hither, if you think of him thus?
He saved my life, Florence Desmond.
And therefore would you put a dagger in his hand to
destroy
your happiness? That deed was an act of ordinary
impulse
,
done probably without reflection, on the spur of the
moment
certainly
without danger to himself. It was what you or
I would have done for the meanest kern in the land, without
an instant's thought about the matter. There is a monstrous
deal too much made always about this matter of preserving a
life. I have saved fifty men's lives, in my time, from water,
from fire, from the sword, from the plague, from the halter,
and never been much thanked for it.
You would not have had me turn my back upon him.
Florence Desmond. To do so would have been to tell the
first of my followers who crossed his track when I was out of
sight, to knock him on the head, or shoot him like a houseless
dog. Neglect from me now were his death-warrant.
There is something in that, Dermot, answered Desmond,
after a moment's pause, but not very much after all; for he
knew all that when he entered the O'Brien country, before he
had dreamed of having even a chance to assist you. Nay,
morebe must have known that in all probability you would
yourself shoot him down as a traitor to the king, and an open
enemy, in case of meeting with him on the moor. In spite of
all this, he thrust himself into your way of a set purpose; and
chance so far favored him that you can scarcely shoot him now,
I great that.
But what would you do with him, were you I, Florence?
Hold him in honorable ward until we learn if his news be
false or truehold him under guard in his own chamber,
allowing
him to see no members of your household, save Con or
Ulick, and your own page, Hardress; and least of all, the priest,
for whom, between ourselves, I have a good deal less of reverence
than you haveand should have none at all, but that he is a
priest; though, in God's truth, I believe him to be little more
of that in heart than I am. He holds, it seems to me, some
most strange doctrines; though, Heaven be thanked, it is my
business only to hear, and not to judge, O'Brien.
It were the wisest way, in truth. Would God that I could
adopt it.
And what hinders?
My word. I told him I would treat him as my honorable
guest.
Even so. But not as your trusted confidant. Appoint
me as his warden. I will treat him with all honor, and may,
perchance, learn something that may serve us over the
Bordor
.
Would not that be to keep the promise to the ear, and
break it in the spirit?
Not a whitnot a whit!and lo! here he comes; at all
events, commit him to my charge until you have consulted
Eily; and hark you, tell no one else of his coming until you
have her counsel.
Be it so. You are a wise friend, Florence, and a true one.
He wrung his hand kindly, and turning on his heel, hurried
across the step towards the castle-door, which still stood open,
although all the other persons had withdrawn into the interior
of the building, on seeing that the train had all returned in
safety, except one tall, slender, female figure, who stood on the
threshold, conversing eagerly with the page, Hardress, and
looking
anxiously toward the gate, as if in quest of O'Brien.
Without another word, the young earl hastened to the
foot of the flight of tall stone steps which led to the
castle-gate
,
while Desmond took a few steps in the other direction, to
meet O'Neil and the young men who were now returning from
the stables, and already near at hand.
Is it you, Dermot? cried a sweet low voice, as he mounted
the stepsat length, you? We have tarried for you very
long, and feared that something had befallen you.
Something has happened to me, Eily, replied the earl;
but lock not so grave for that, dearest. It is nothing so very
desparate or alarmingthough certainly it is not altogether
pleasing, or such as I could have desired.
I have seen it. I knew it, from the first moment you
dismounted
,
and stood so long in deep converse with Florence,
instead of hurrying, as is your wont, to join us, on your return
home. I have been questioning Hardress this last half-hour.
Ha! Your reason, fair lady, was a good and true one; for
who would tarry, talking with a great Low Country colonel,
who might be basking in the light of your eyes, Eily? But
what said Hardressha?
Hardress either knows nothing of the matter, or is as
close-tongued
as beseems a lord's page to be, answered the girl.
Or a fair lady's either, Mistress Ellinor, replied the boy,
who was a favorite, laughing gaily. I have heard tell that
the lady's page has often more need for a close mouth than the
earl's esquire. But in truth, for this time, I knew nothing of
the matter. I only saw that a marvellous ill-looking stranger
rode into the castle with my lord's train, and so I told fair
Mistress
Ellinor.
Are you sure that he was a stranger, Hardress? asked the
earl, with a quiet and somewhat sad smile. Think, boy
have you never seen that ill-favored countenance before?
Jesu Maria! exclaimed the youth, with a sudden start, and
a motion of his hand toward the hilt of the gay dagger
which he wore at his girdlewhile a keen glance of intelligence
and recognition gleamed, like a flash of lightning, over his
handsome features. It is he!it is he! How could I ever
have forgotten? But who should have looked to see him here,
here in the Red Castle of O'Brien, unless as a prisoner, led
hither but to die? But it is he!
It is who, Hardress? cried the girl, bending her eyes
upon his face with an expression of anxiety amounting almost
to terror. Tell me, tell mewho is it? I knew that there
was something wrong.
Go to my mother, Hardress, said the earl, laying his
forefinger
on his lip, with a warning glance at the quick-witted boy,
and say to her that I beseech her to put back the supper yet
half an hour longer; for I have tidings from the city of
importance
;
and then pray his reverence to meet me in my private
study forthwith, as I must speak with him before supper. Be
quick, boy; there is no time to lose. Then to the stables and
the kennel, and tell all those who rode with me, it is my
pleasure
not one word be spoken. Now, cousin Eily, he continued,
turning to the beautiful girl, if you will give me half an hour
of your time, I will tell you what has fallen out, for I want
your counsel. Where can we be most private?
Come with me, she said quickly; come to my own
withdrawing
room. But why did you send for Father Daly, if you
would talk with me. It is not courteous, Dermot, to keep the
good father waiting.
Courteous or no, I did it purposely. I would not have his
keen eyes prying into matters prematurelyhis long ears
drinking
words which I would have him weigh before believing
or his sharp tongue asking questions which I desire not to have
answered. But come, dearest, come!
And with the words he took her by the hand and led
her up the last flight of steps within the embrazure of the
castle-door
,
and entered the great oaken hall of the fortalice, all
glittering with lights reflected from a score of clear steel
panoplies
,
and flashed back from a hundred polished weapons.
She was indeed very beautiful, and of a style of beauty
perfectly
characteristic of the isle which gave her birth.
Considerably above the middle height of women, and of a
slender and elastic figure, her whole form was so exquisitely
rounded, so fully swelling in its soft womanly outlines, that,
although her waist was but a span, her neck and delicate
throat, swan-like in its long drooping curve, and her wrist and
ancle shapely and small as a child's; the general character of
her shape was of plumpness and mature perfection, though
she was in reality scarcely advanced beyond girlhood.
Her face was of the perfect Grecian outline, and her
complexion
us pure and white as that of the fairest Saxon maiden,
though it was warmed by the glowing tints of a blood richer
and more genial than runs in the veins of people of more
northern nations. Her hair was black as the raven's wing, and
like that, shadowed with a glittering metallic lustre that glanced
in the light of the torches with a warm purple radiance; and
it was so profuse that it fell down in a flood of luxuriant
ringlets
over her dazzling shoulders, below the verge of her velvet
corsage. Her brows were of the same color, strongly defined,
and full of character; and the long lashes of her great
deep-blue
eyes, reheved by the clear hues of her transparent cheek,
showed like a fringe of glossy silk.
Her gait was beautifully easy, graceful and swimming as
the motion of bird in the air, or swan on the waterssuch
as is said to be peculiar to females of that Spanish blood which
is believed by many to flow in the veins of the noblest children
of Green Erin; and of a surety, both in birth and character,
Ellinor Desmond was of her very noblest.
Such was the girl who moved gently and tranquilly, yet
with an anxious heart and downcast eye, by the side of
the proud young earl; and so fair a specimen did they
present of young mortality that the boy Hardress gazed on
them earnestly and long, with a wistful eye, and muttered to
himself with a half-murmuring sigh, before he turned away to
obey his lord's behest:
God's benison upon their heads! Who ever saw so bright
and beautiful a pair in all Green Erin! And they are good as
they are beautiful and bright. God's benison upon them.
CHAPTER V.
And, for that right is right, to follow right
Were wisdom in the scorn of consequence.
Tennyson
.
The
apartment into which the young earl led the lady of his
lovefor such it may be admitted that she was, and one in every
way worthy of his distinctions, whether natural or socialwas
a low-roofed square room, raised a few steps above the level of
the neighboring chambers, and looking through a large
mullioned
oriel window into a small spot of garden, situated in the
very centre of the castle, and overlooked only by the
battlements
of the tall square towers which surrounded it on every
side but this by their blank and windowless walls.
It was for this reason probably that Ellinor Desmond had
selected its as her own withdrawing room, or boweras ladies
apartments were still sometimes calledand it was perhaps,
the only one in the castle fitted, from its seclusion and
conveniences
,
to be the abode of a young and delicate girl, almost
alone, in the midst of a society of rude and half civillised
clansmen
.
The entrance to it lay through an ante-chamber,
communicating
by a narrow passage, on either hand of which was a
small chamber for attendants, with the grand reception saloon
of the castle, in which the mother of the earla stern old
stately matron of the olden school, who remembered the civil
war of the great Tyrone, and the iron rule of Elizabethwas
wont to sit in cold and solitary state.
There she was not, however, as the young and handsome
pair passed through it on their way to Ellinor's bowerbeing,
in consequence of the page's message, absent upon those
hospitable
cares intent which had not as yet been devolved upon
menials. In the ante-chamber, however, there were three pretty,
gaily-attired maidens employedtwo about their
embroidery-frames
and one reading aloud to her companions some merry
French romance; for their laughter was heard, fresh and
musical
,
before the earl and his fair companion reached the door of
the room in which they sat.
They all three rose on the entrance of their lady, and
cour-tesied
gracefully, and with more of a lady-like demeanor than
we should now expect from mere servant maidens; but at
that period, when the lines of distinction between the
commonalty
and gentry were drawn so much more broadly than at
present, the personal attendants of the great and noble were for
the most part drawn from the humbler branches of their own
families, or composed of the young aspirants of other noble
lines, who scrupled not to perform what we should now deem
menial offices, until their term of servitude should fit them, in
their turn, to command others.
The former of these cases was most general with the female
portion of the household, except for ladies of the very highest
rank of nobility, who were waited upon by gentlewomen of
birth and breedingthe latter with the pages and equerries,
who rose gradually to the rank even of knighthood itselfwhen
knighthood was not a mere empty nameand were often of
birth as noble as he whose cloak they brushed, or whose spurs
they buckled to his heel.
And in the present instance, one of her pretty girls in
waiting
was a far-off cousin of her own; while the two others
werewhat was in those days and in Ireland accounted a yet
nearer connexionher foster sisters; and all three had been
brought up with their young mistress in a French convent, as
was very usual among the Catholics, both of Ireland and
Great Britain; and hence, in no small degree, the grace and
courtesy of their demeanor, and assuredly the fluent use of the
French tongue.
Without pausing, however, longer than to say a kind word
en passant
, Ellinor Desmond and her lover passed into the
little
room which formed her own peculiar sanctum, and which
communicated through a small oratory, with its lamp burning
before the sweet picture of Madonna, its
prie-dieu
, and its
velvet
hassocks, with the garden beyond.
That was a gay and cheerful little chamber, lighted up as it
was brilliantly by a flashing fire of bog-pine which blazed
brilliantly on the hearthrendered agreeable by the
cavernous
thickness of the castle walls, and its elevated site,
surrounded
by unshorn woods and dashing waters, and by the
gleam of two huge candles, home-manufactured from native
virgin wax, burning in unfique silver candelabra.
The walls were wainscoted with dark bog-oak, almost as
black as ebony, pannelled in exquisitely-wrought
compartments
,
between clustered columns and fretted ogives of the
same material in elaborate relief. The dark hues of this
woodwork were relieved, in the first place, by the exceeding
brightness of the polished surface, which reflected the lights
like a mirror; and in the second, by a number of fine cabinet
pictures, by the best masters of the English, Flemish and
Spanish
schools, all at that day nearly in their prime of perfection, set
off by massive gilded frames, one of which hung in the centre
of each compartment. The curtains which mantled the single
deep window, the draperies of the oratory, the cushions of the
large soft settees and arm-chairs, the very cloth of the round
table, strewn with books,
bijouterie
, musical instruments,
writing
materials, and articles of female fancy-workthe name of
which is legionwere of rich crimson velvet, deeply laced
and fringed with gold. A spinet, the piano-forte of that day,
and a superb Irish harp completed the furniture of the lady's
bower; but among its decorations were two or three
articles
not yet enumerated, so characteristic of the time, and so
illustrative of feminine employments in the good days of old,
that they should not be passed over without notice.
In a deep gothic niche, above the fire-placewhich was
itself a quaint, low-browed arch, richly carved, yawning above
a wide, open hearthstood a full suit of tilting armor, of the
finest Milan steel, azure, engrailed with gold, complete from
spur to plume, with the shield slung about the neck, the lance
in the gauntlet of the right hand, while that of the left rested
on the pommel of the heavy straight sword, the dagger of
mercy in the girdle, and the hammer-at-arms and battle-axe
lying crossed at the feet of the effigy.
The whole of this superb panoply was as efficient, as bright,
and in as perfect order as if it had been intended for
immediate
use; yet the fashion of the armor was obsolete; and the
use of complete suits had already passed away, even among
leaders, as inconsistent with the rapidity of modern warfare,
and of little use against musquetryof none against ordnance.
The meaning, however, of that suit in that position, and of its
careful preservation, was displayed in a gilt-lettered scroll
beneath
the alcove on which it stood. The words ran thus
quaint in device, and antique in form:
Remember Florence Desmond,
WHO FORGOT NOT
HIS COUNTRY OR HIS GOD.
These be ye arms he wore
.
His bones he near his Savlour's grave,
Rest for his soul, all Desmonds, crave.
And of this worthy, as the legend ran, no more was known
than this: that indignant at the gradual subjugation of his
countrymen to the Anglo-Normans of the neighboring isle, he
had assumed the red cross and fallen in the Holy Land, though
in what crusade, or in what era, romance and history alike fail
to record. How the arms of the patriot champion had
returned
to his native land, was no less a matter of obscurity than
the date or manner of his death; but he had been a bold man
who had expressed a doubt about the authenticity of the arms,
or the truth of the legendat least in the presence of an
O'Brien or a Desmond.
One thing was clear alonethat they hung there, religiously
preserved, not so much a monument of the hereditary
warrior's
valor and renown, as a memento of his Celtic hatred for
the rule of the stranger, with no faint inculcation of the charge,
go thou and do likewise, to his descendants of the most
remote
posterity.
This for the age and the countryperhaps I might say for
the country in all ages.
But of the difference of female occupations at that day and
in our time, the evidences were in no degree less obvious or
decisive.
Among the instruments of music, and articles of
virtu
upon
the table, many of which would make the brightest eyes glance
with eager expectation in this nineteenth century, lay a pair of
embroidered hawking-gloves, fashioned for no handsas the
delicate size showed at a glancebut those of the soft Ellinor;
a velvet pouch and belt, with the lures for the truant falcon,
peeped out from beneath some written music of the old notation,
and the leaves of an open book were kept down in lieu of
presse papier
, by a small dagger with gold hilt and scabbard,
rough with the toil of Cellini's chisel.
Then, in the chimney corner, stood a light birding-piece,
with a new-fangled wheel-lock, such as a lady's hand might
balance; on the wall, near it, hung an ivory-inlaid cross-bow,
with a quiver full of deer and bird bolts, besides a
miscellaneous
assortment of hawk's bells and jesses; silver-embossed
curbs, and shell-mounted bridle-reins, and two or three pair of
carved and gilded spurs, certainly suited for no larger heel
than that of the fair mistress of the temple which I have
entered
,
but with no sacrilegious tread.
Yet bend not your brows in scorn, gentle and delicate dames
and damsels of this present day; nor with profane tongue
stigmatise
your sister beauty of a bygone century as coarse or
masculine
,
or rude, though she did, at times, suffer the winds of
heaven to visit her unsoiled brow and glowing cheek in their
wilder frolicthough she feared not to put her courser to his
speedto launch her falcon on the track of the clanging heron,
to speed her bird-shot after the flying partridge, or her bolt
after the bounding roe; for she could bend her flexible throat
and round her snowy arms over the harp as graciously as the
must languid of you all; could warble notes as soft, and arch
her blashing neck away in feigned reluctance from the very
words she loved to listen, with an air of as artificial nature as
if she had been the pupil of the most fashionable madame in
the land. If they did break their fasts more heartily on the roast
capon or the venison pasty, and qualify their cups with
bourdeaux
or malvoisie in lieu of chocolate or congo, their bodies
were as delicately modelled, their complexions as pureaye!
and their souls as womanly and finely organisedas any in
times older or more modern, unless the pencils of Vandyke
and Lustie, the pens of Sidney Lovelace and Montrose, have
all conspired to cheat us with a fiction.
But as they were in those days, they entered the bower,
which, to their eyes, seemed courtly and decorous and refined,
as perhaps to ours it would appear picturesque, chivalrous, and
romantic: and well might it so appear, for in those days if they
thought less of pictures, and talked less of chivalry, and read
less of romance, yet assuredly there was more of all the three
crowded into every hour of their lives, in their costumes and
customs, in their actions and devotions, in their opinions and
observancesthan into a whole life of ours.
They entered; and strange playmates for a delicate and
youthful girl, a huge Irish greyhound of the old wolf-breed,
already becoming rare, and now all but extinct, reared itself
slowly up from the deer-skin on which it had been resting in
front of the glowing embers, shook itself, and yawned lazily;
and then stalking forward with a calm majesty of demeanor, not
inconsistent with its immense sizeto greet his mistress, thrust
his long shaggy muzzle into her white hand, and wagged his
long feathered stern with genuine affection.
At the same time a beautiful little long-winged merlinthe
smallest, and one of the most daring of the falcon tribewhich
had been dozing, without hood, bells, or jesses, on the top of a
high-backed arm chair, rose instantly, with a shrill quavering
cry, upon its long arrowy pinions, and darting toward her with
the speed of lightning, folded its wings as rapidly as if they had
disappeared altogether, and sat motionless on her snowy
shoulder
,
murmuring in a low tone of pleasure, and carefully
averting
its sharp talons from her skin.
See, dear one, said the young earl, pressing her hand
with a half-melancholy smile, how all things seem to love
and worship thee; how even the wildest of the fowls of air,
the fiercest of the hounds of chase, appear to change their
natures
,
to lay aside their shyness and their savage moods to do
homage to my lady. God grant that it may be so ever! And
he sighed slightly as he ceased from speaking.
Women are quick emphatically to judge, not by words
alone, but by every tone and accent of the human voice,
the feelings of the heart that inspires them, especially if it
be the heart of a man, and a man whom they love.
And Dermot O'Brien had not spoken six words before
Ellinor's
soft eyes were fixed upon his face, half doubtfully, half
sadly; but when he ended she said instantly:
Something has occurred, Dermot, of much momentI am
sure of it; and you are greatly moved and distemperedelse
you would not speak so despondently. Tell me at once; what
is it?
And patting the head of the tall greyhound, she bade him
gently
to lie down, removed the merlin from her shoulder to her
wrist, on which he sate as contentedly as if he had been on his
own familiar perch, pruning his ruffled feathers. Then seating
herself quietly, yet with an anxious expression on her features,
in a great easy chair, she motioned O'Brien to a stool before her
feet, and waited to hear his tale.
I spoke from my heart, Ellinor, replied the earl, when
5
I said God grant that it may be so ever; and you are right,
dear girl, when you believe that I am moved. I trust that I
am moved without reason. But there is now near at handaye!
under this very roofa wilder and a fiercer beast than hawk or
houndaye! than the very wolves which our ancestors were
wont to hunt over the hills of yore. Do you mark me?
I know not what or whom you mean, O'Brien. This
stranger who accompanied you home to-night?
It is no stranger, Ellinor. Would God that he were a
stranger. Think you a stranger could have moved me thus?
If not a stranger, who?speak, Dermot!
A kinsmanHugh O'Neil!
For a moment's space, the girl moved not, nor offered any
answer; but she turned deathly pale, and a visible shudder
ran through her lovely frame:
Over God's forefend! she answered at last, and then
added, but how?how?as a prisoner?
As a hostage, ora guest!
A guest! the beautiful woman interrupted him, her eyes
actually lightening with indignationa guest! Hugh O'Neil
a guest of the O'Brien! The traitorthe apostate of the loyal
and the true!or have you too become Parliamentarian,
Puritan
how
do they phrase it? Youyou and Hugh O'Neil!
I should have thought that the bones of your father would
have burst their cerementsI should have thought those arms
would have resounded on their stand, as his foot crossed the
threshold!
As she spoke the words, with a cheek again flushed and
glowing, and a raised voice, the iron hand of the effigy, to
which she pointed slipped from the pommel of the sword, and
fell, with a heavy hollow clang against the giambeaux.
Are your words prophetical? cried the young man, starting.
or is this trickery!But he lost not his presence of mind, or
readiness of action for a moment; but snatching one of the
wax candles, sprang up on a stool and proceeded to examine the
panoply whence the ominous sound had proceeded; but there
was nothing to be seen; though, as he commenced his
scrutiny
,
the old hound, which had started up at the iron clang,
lifted his nose into the air and uttered a low, long-drawn howl,
such as the superstitious of mankind construe into a
recognition
of some disembodied presence.
It was nothing, Dermot, said the girl, shaking off her own
emotion at the sight of hisFor shame! A soldier scared
by a mere empty sound!It was nothinga mere accident!
A very strange one, he replied, resuming his seat slowly.
But everything is strange now-a-days! Here, in the mere
killing of a stag, with all my hounds around me, and my men
within call, my foot must fail me, and my sword fly my hand;
and then, who of all mankind must spring out of the earth
where not an eye of man has seen him these twice five years,
as if the fiend himself had sent him, but this Hugh O'Neil, to
preserve my life; when, fifty times rather had I lost it than owe
thanks to him who, I believe itGod forgive me, almost as I
believe
in Himmurthered my father!
Good heaven!can this be so, Dermot?' exclaimed
Ellinor
,
again turning deadly pale from the mere apprehension of
her lover's peril. And did he save your life?
I would to heaven that I had lost it, rather!
Oh! say not sosay not soDermot! God pardon you
the word, and him, if it may be, some of his sins, for the deed.
I do say so, Eily, answered the young earl mournfully.
I do say so, notwithstanding; for I see not the end or object
of his coming hitherunless it be ruin and misery to us all.
But you have not yet told me wherefore or how he came
hither.
He asked it, nay insisted on it, as the guerdon for the
saving
of my life; and I could not refuse it; for he would be slain
surely for a renegade by the first of our people whom he mot
withala fate which, how richly he might merit it soever,
would scarce comport with my honor.
True, true. You could scarce do otherwise. But what
makes he in Ireland at all?
He boasts himself repentantthat is, a double traitor!
but I doubt him a spy, rather, and am almostheaven forgive
me when I shame my manhood to confess itafraid of him.
There is no shame that the bravest of mankind should fear
a serpent; and if ever there was such in the guise of man, such
is Hugh O'Neil. But tell me all, she added, or how can I
advise you?
Then, in a few concise and clear sentences, he set before
her all that had passed, not forgetting the intelligence which he
had brought, and his evident intention of doing all the service
he could for the moment to the king's cause, whatever might
be his ulterior objects.
But such an instrument? was the first right-minded
impulse
of the high, noble-hearted girl.will not so base an
instrument, even if he could be trusted, draw down dishonor
if not ruin, even upon a righteous cause?
I think so, Eilyin God's truth, I think so!
And my brother, and Florence, Dermot, what thinks he?
Even as I; and coursels that I hold him as a hostage, in
all honor, but in durance, until to-morrow shall bring forth
the truth or falsehood of his tidings. He has him in ward
even now.
Then are you better counselled than by a weak girl, such as
I. But what fear you, or what harm can he work here in
ward, if not in durance?
Past doubt, this intelligence is true, else had he not
trusted
himself here; and this proven true, we can no longer hold
him in ward even. He must be either sent in honor forth, or
dwell here in honor. Now, though this information he has
brought can in truth avail us nothingas without him we must
have heard of it ere long from Ormondhe will build much
on it in support of his future usefulness; and of his own past
millany, will weave arguments right plausible why by his
present
villanyfor I believe not in your traitor's or apostate's
penitence, the less too that he is a canting hypocritewhy he
can do good service for the king in future.
Still what fear?who will believe or trust in this double
traitor? Florance you say, has his eyes open?
Had he and I our wills, uncurbed by scrupulous honor, he
should swing at daybreak from the castle flag-staff; and I
would send his head from a culverin into the garrison of
Dublin
,
to tell them his espials.
You do not dread your mother, who has so deep cause to
distrust, to detest him?You do not fear me?
I do fear my mother, somewhat. I do fear not
you
, but
for
you, everything! I doubt not that he knows you are here
here within these wallsand that you chiefly drew him
hither
?
If you fear not
me
, fear
for
me nothing! answered the
spirited girl. The grandchild, daughter, sister of Florence
Desmond fears not what man can do unto her. Fear not for
me, O'Brien, she said, smiling cheerfully, rather to cheer her
lover than that she felt any joy herself. What better
guardian
can I have than my good gallant Fingal here, who never
leaves his mistress?Or if I need a weapon, what better than
this trusty steel,and with the word, she raised the dagger
from the book on which it laywhich has once already saved
an Irish girl's honor, and drank the blood of her foul
assailant
.
A frail weapon, Eily, he said, taking her delicate fingers
between his own, in so weak a hand as this. It would
scarcely find a traitor's heart beneath a corslet of the
Ironsides
.
Then should it find an honest and a loyal heart beneath
the velvet boddice of a lady! Still it should save my honor!
You are a brave girl, Ellinor, he replied, gazing with
passionate
admiration upon her speaking lineaments, and into her
bright eyes, kindled as they were, with high and glorious fire.
God of his mercy grant that you never be so tried!But
it is not so that I fear for you.
How then, O'Brien?Tell metell me.
The priest, Ellinor, the priest!
His reverence! she answered, pausing a moment, and
again slightly shuddering. Dermot, I think you never loved
Father Daly.
Never, Eily, indeed; not he me.
Oh, you are wrong there!you are wrong. He says he
has loved you ever, and would have served you, but you would
not from the beginning.
Tush! tush!the truth is not in him.
The truth
not
in him? said Ellinor, doubtfully, and almost
reproachfullythe truth not in Father Daly! Oh!
Heaven
forgive you, Dermot; you are sinful!
Aye, I know you believe in him, and love and fear him
fear him, perhaps, even more than you love or believe him. My
mother fears him only and entirely, loving him not at all, and
believing him thus far onlythat he can lock or unlock for her
the gates of Paradise.
And do not you believe
that
, Dermot?
No more than I believe that man can scale the crystal
battlements
of heaven, and storm the everlasting habitations of
the blessed! No, Eily; I love not the priest, nor fear the man,
ner believe his teachings; for he teaches always and ever
that Thou shalt do evil, in the hope that good may come of
it;' and I believe that a damnable, and not a Christian doctrine.
But I do fear his influence upon those whom I loveand
when I think of them, I almost hate his arts, and almost
tremble
at his power.
Does he teach that, O'Brien? asked the girl, gazing at her
lover with wide eyes of bewilderment and wonder, but never
dreaming of doubting his spoken word.
Hath he never taught it to thee?
Never! never!else had I spurned both him and his
teaching
.
`Do evil that good may come of it.' Who should do
that must claim the attributes of the Allwise; for man may see
and know the present evil, but God alone can foreknow the
consequence! Out on it! our on it!does he teach this?
He would call theo a weak vessel, replied Dernot,
scornfully
.
Too weak for the strong meats, which are not made
for babes or sucklings. But you have heard him teach this
many times, Eily.
Never!When?How?
Have you not heard him hint, with dark inuendoes, that
this very Hugh O'Nell, whom you well know he never
would condemn, or give up as altogether outcast, even when
condemned of the Church, might be still acting
ad majorem
Dei gloriam
, in betraying his king for a timein drawing his
sword against his countryeven in
seeming
to foreswear his
Godthat he might, in a word, be playing the traitor only in
order again to betray those hereafter to whom he was then be
traying others?
Ah! cried the girl, abhorrently, with a long sharp
inhalation
of her breath, rather than an articulate word, letting
her arms fall down by her sides despondently Ah!
Dermot!
You recollect, Ellinor?
I do! I doit is true. Though I thought not of it before.
And now, when this O'Neil is reconciled to the Church
is ready to play the traitor in behalf of this king whose father
he betrayed, will not the priest return to his old preaching?
will he not put all trust himself in his disciple?will he not
force all others to receive him, either by fear or by favor?
Alas! O'Brien! exclaimed Ellinor now thoroughly
alarmed, and unable to contradict the deductions which be drew
from such premisesBut is this O'Neil's story?
Not to me nor to Florence Desmond! He knows too well
that we would have scourged him till his bones were bare with
our dog-whips, had he but breathed such infamy to ears of
ours. But he is wily, and he knows his man and nover failed
since no was an urchin of ten years, to play upon the
weaknessos
of every one who crossed his path, for his own profit.
He is as sure of the priest as the soaring eagle of the lambkin;
although the serpent were the better simile; for the priest's
wisdom surpasses far his innocence.
And will his reverence believe him?
Before he shall have told a tale. Hugh's subtle craft was
ever kindred and congenial to the priest's astute wiliness; and
he did not a little by his casuistry to lend it yet a keener edge.
I tell you he will jump at the conclusion, or ere a word be
spoken; and this man's double villany shall be accounted to
him as merit, ere his defence be opened.
And thence what fear you?
Everything that is evil. The necessity of enduring this
man, knowing him to be a villain, and believing him to be a
spy; the necessity of having him ever near to usprivy to
our councilspresent in our campsa participator in our
battlesa partner in our fortunes; the peril of his betraying
all and everything to Cromwell, and we foreseeing all, yet
unable to parry anything! And above all, and worst of all,
the agonyfor it will be nothing less to meof seeing him
daily at my boardof believing him to be the controller of
yours, of my mother's destiny! By heaven! it drives me mad
to think of it!
Of my destiny! Hugh O'Neil the controller of my
destiny
!
Do you conceive it possible? Dermot O'BrienI would
dio sooner fifty deathsI had almost said die sooner, soul and
body! Do you think I have forgottenforgotten his insolence,
his violence, his crimes?Never! I saynever! never!
You know notyou cannot tell. Even here, the powers
of the Church are immense, and the artifices of the unworthy
of her sons yet more boundless.
And you believe Father Daly capable?
I think Father Daly, he interrupted her, no true priest
of our true and holy faithas I believe the only true and holy
but an ambitious, daring, worldly-minded, and unscrupulous
bad man. Ambitious and unscrupulous, not perhaps for
himself
;
but for whatever he may deem the advancement of the
Church; and by advancement, he means secular interest and
worldly power. I think him capable of sacrificing mine or my
mother's life, or your honormay, his own brother's life, or his
own sister's honer, to the winning of the stakes for which he
plays!
And yet you consort with himtake counsel with himand
in some sort obey him.
Alas! my Ellinorin this our hapless country, I must do
so, or abandon at once king and country, principle and creed,
to the Puritan invader.
But wherefore, Dermot?in the name of heaven,
wherefore
?
Because in this most wretched and distracted land, our
priesthood have becomeas nowhere elsethe demagogues,
the leaders of the popular will in matters wholly secular and
political. And neither I nor Ormondnot even great Tyrone
himself in his day of glory, can stir one inch in opposition to
their will, and hold so much oven as our own vassals in
subjecttion
,
much less lead on the men of Ireland at large to conflict
with the foe. As they inflame, or hold back lukewarm, so
will the people burn and rage, or fall away and fly. And of
this be surehe will take O'Neil's side, and magnify him if he
can, even to making him a leader; because his knavish
low-born
craft may be made the tool of the priest's high towering
and ambitions skill, where my blunt onwardness of purpose,
and Florence Desmond's soul of honor, would mock at any
indirection
,
although it were disguised by all Rome's deepest
sophistry.
I seeI understand. See, perhaps, and understand more
than you believe or expect. This is my counsel, Dermot, since
you have sought: let not the priest on any account speak
with him to night; but leave him in my brother's ward until
his truth be certain, or his falsehood without question. If the
last,
you
will deal with him; how, I desire not to think, nor be
informed. I will go forthwith and disclose all thisall your
doubtsand all my fearsfor I
do
fear now very much,
O'Brien; and for reasons which have come upon me, slowly,
but certainly, while you have been speakingto your mother.
I think I can prevail with her, in no event to receive him at
her bourd, or suffer him beneath the same roof with her. But
be that as it may, mark and receive my vow, Dermot O'Brien.
What mean you, Eily? cried the young man, half-alarmed
by the eager and wild excitsment of her manner, and the
passion
which trembled in every accent of her raised voice.
Eily, my own dear girl, what mean you?
Listen and hear, she answered with a grave, sad smile;
and with the words, she kneeled down on the hearth-stone, and
stretched out her arms toward the beautiful, calm face of the
Madonna, which seemed to look down quiet, unmoved, and
beniguant
,
upon the dark and passionate agitation of this lovely
child of earth. And you, Virgin Mother, dearest, and
holiest
,
and best beloved; and ye, saints and angels, and thou,
Heavenly Father of all those who are afflicted and oppressed,
and turn to thee for aidhear, and receive, and ratify my vow;
for in your presence, on the hearth-stone of my murthered uncle's
hall, I swear, that never, by word or deed, by sign or thought,
will I receive, or countenance, or admit to my presence,
willingly
,
this man, this Hugh O'Neil, whom I believe his
murthere
that
never, knowingly and willingly, will I sit at the
same board, or kneel at the same altar, break of the same bread,
drink of the same cup, or breathe of the same air with him,
so may ye help me at my utmost need, whom I have called to
hear my vow! And if I fail of this, so may all they whom I
most love eschew me, and more also. Amen! Amen! So be
it!
And as she spoke, she drew out the dagger which she had
concealed in her bosom, and kissed the cross again and again
fervently.
Then she arose to her feet with a serener aspect, and more
composed demeanor, and taking the earl by the hand, said, in
low, soft whisper:
Now, Dermot, are you satisfied? For if not, I swear to
you, that when you ask me, with true cause for askingand
without cause you would notwhether by day or night,
whether from the board or the altarwhether to the court or
the campto the midnight wilderness or the beleaguered city.
to a foreign land or a native grave, undoubting and
unquestioning
,
I will go with you. Your countryas the Hebrew
maiden saidshall be my country, and your God shall be mine,
for in life I know you will forget neither; and if the one
should fall and the other forsake, at least we can die for them
together. Now, Dermot, are you satisfied?
Angel! he cried, angel! Now indeed you have made
me bravenow you have made me strong. Hugh O'Neil, do
your worst! Sir priest, work your wiliest! The daring of
the one, the deceit of the otherI scorn and I defy you!
Farewell, Eily, dearest, bravest, best. Fare you well, for a
little while. I go to the priest. Lose no time, I beseech you,
but seek out my mother, and tell her all, all, everything. We
will meet anon in the great hall. Till then, once more,
farewell
!
And with the words, he turned and left the room with a
bolder port and a heart far more at ease, than he had carried
since his first meeting with his loathed and despised kinsman;
but she, as soon as he was gone, exhausted by the very
vehemence
of her late emotion, and unsustained any longer by
his exciting presence, sank back into her armed chair, covered
her face with her hands, and wept bitterly.
CHAPTER VI.
Now broach ye a pipe of malvoisie,
Bring pastles of the aoe.
Marmiox
.
Again
and again the trumpets had sent forth their brazen
summons to the guests in the Red Castle; yet, save the aged
countess and her lovely niece, none were as yet assembled in
the grand saloon.
And there, in high state, with liveried pages waiting at the
doors at the lower end of the immense tapestried apartment,
in strange contrast the one to the other, sat those two women,
silent and alone, and both, as it would seem, oppressed by deep
and anxious thought.
Had a painter been desirous of introducing into his noblest
work the type of the most perfect majesty of womanhood in
extreme age, and the ideal of female loveliness in its youthful
prime, he could not have done so with more complete effect
than by copying those ladies as they sate there, beneath the
crimson canopy, upon the elevated deas at the upper end of
the saloon, as if expecting to receive the homage of a
glittering
court.
The elder lady, not only as the wife and mother of one of
the proudest races in the island, but as in her own line and
person the descendant and direct heiress of one of the
traditionary
kings of Erin, was perhaps the hanghtiest woman in
the kingdom; yet was her haughtiness rather mental than
personal
rather
ideal and imaginary than practical or real. Her
bearing and domeanor were framed and regulated upon a
purely fanciful model; and as she was constantly representing
to her own inner self, her wrongs, her sufferings, and her
sorrows
,
as a dispossessed and discrowned sovereign, so was she
continually considering and devising how, when she should be
brought into contact with the usurping majesty of England, or
his viceroy, she should best assert her dignity, and display her
contempt of so brief a line, and ill-founded a succession.
It must not be supposed, however, that she had the slightest
idea of ever asserting, or even the desire to assert, a dignity
which her good sense assured her had departed not only from
her house, but from her people forever. The stateliness of
bearing and maintenance of personal grandeur, was but a
tribute, which she thought it necessary to pay to the hereditary
splendor of her raceand was so largely mixed with a sort of
subdued mournfulness and serene depression of spirits, that
they were thereby deprived of all that would otherwise have
been both ludicrous and absurd. As it was, the most
irrepressible
of laughers could have discovered nothing at which to
smile in the ancestral pride of that aged lady, even if she
did sit beneath a royal canopy, and did exact service of the
most profound humility, and upon the bended knee. The
rather
that the qualities of her mind and her personal
appearance
were alike adapted to the station which she asserted; and
that her presence was such as could not fail to impress a
stranger with something not far removed from awe; although
her graciousness to her dependants, and her affection for her
children, were maternally benevolent, and fond, even to
tenderness
.
She was extremely oldfar older than the ordinary term to
which human life is protracted even at the utmost; and it
seemed strange that one so aged should be the mother of a
youth still in the first prime and power of mature manhood.
But he was her last-born son, the child of her almost
decrepitude
,
as of her sorrow; for she had borne six goodly sons
before him to the great earl, his father; and, each after each,
she had seen them perish almost before her eyes, by violent
and untimely deathsfour on the battle-field, one on the stormy
ocean, and onetoo common a fate, alas! in those daysupon
the blood-stained scaffold; so that they had despaired, at one
time, of leaving any scion to uphold the honors of their race. But
in her old age she had borne this last and noblest of her boys,
Dermot O'Brien, to succeed to his father's dignities, when
he, like all his race, fell for his loyalty to his king, and his faith
in the God of his fathers, by the unsparing steel of the Puritan
usurpers of all privilege, all prorogative, all liberty.
In person, the countess was taller than the utmost height to
which women attainoverlooking all her attendants, and even
her fair niece, almost by a head and shoulders; and, indeed,
exceeding almost all the men of her clan in stature, with the
exception of her son and some of his kindred chieftains, who
were all proportioned, more or less, after the fashion of the
sons of Arak. What rendered her height more conspicuous,
was, that in despite the depredations of years, and the
remarkable
emaciation of her frame, she was still as erect and
unbending as one of the pine-trees on her native mountains of
Slievh-Buy. Years, indeed, seemed to have glided by her, as
do the keenest blasts of heaven by those giants of the
green-wood
,
shearing away the graces of their foliage, and minishing
the grandeur of their umbrage, yet leaving them erect in
unbended
hardihood, and still proof against all, save steel or fire,
or an earthquake's shock, to move them.
Her hair was as white as the untrodden snow on the loftiest
mountain-peak, and as bright, as glossy, and as glittering, as
when in her virgin beauty it shamed the wing of the wild
raven by its rich metallic lustre. It was luxuriant too, as in
her seventeenth summer, and was still braided on either side
her broad, pale, lofty forehead, in plaited bands, and raised
upon her crown in a tall, elaborate diadem of tresses,
undisguised
and undisfigured by the hideous hair-powder with
which it was the mode of that day to change even the bright
looks of youth and beauty.
Her lineaments were all high and noble; and it was evident
that even when she was at her freshest and fairest, nobility and
dignity, rather than softness or tenderness, must have been the
character of her countenance; for, although all her features
were well-formed and handsome, they were all of that style
which belongs to the keenest and most aquiline contour. Her
brows were straight, and must have been of old strongly
defined
though
now, like her hair, they were silver white; and
the eyes, which looked from beneath these, large, open, and
undazzled as the eagle's, had a clear, penetrating glance, which
seemed to pry into the very soul of whom she would
scrutinise
;
and at such time, their lustre was intense, and almost
painful to the beholder. The nose, though not prominent,
was high and curved, with large, thorough-bred nostrils, which
she had a habit of expanding, as if she would snuff the air,
when chafed or irritated by anything which she deemed little
or unworthy. Her mouth was well-shaped, although the lips
were now thin and pale, and expressing rather firmness and
resolution of character, than any more womanly feeling in their
ordinary aspect; although at times, a smile of ineffable
benevolonce
and softness would play over it, and light up all the face
into loving warmth and lustre, even as a sunset gleam will at
times irradiate a landscape, which all day long has been grave
and lowering.
The Countess O'Brienfor so she preferred to be styled,
regarding the name as older and more noble than the title
which she bore of rightwas clad suitably to her age, her
sorrows
,
and her rank, in a plain robe of heavy black silk,
covering
her person from the collar-bone to the wrists, and to the
clasps of her high-heeled shoes, perfectly plain and straight
cut, and gathered in about her waist by a black velvet
cineture
with a jet buckle. A mantelet of black velvet, sitting
closely to her shape, fell down to the ground, and extended in
a train of several yards in length behind, which was borne,
when she was in motion, by two handsome girls, who were now
seated on low stools at the foot of the deasand whose fresh,
plump prettiness offered a striking, though of course
unintentional
,
contrast to the grey-haired and attenuated majesty
of their mistress.
She had no ornament of any kind upon her person, unless
the diamond buckles in her shoes, which were then worn by
every person of any distinction, can be called such, or her
husband's signet-ring, which, notwithstanding her son's
majority
she still bore as a thumb-ring; nor did she need any
suchif the meaning of these things be to signify and render
evident personal eminence and distinctionfor if she had been
clad in the coarsest servile weeds, her native aristocracy of
bearing must have proved at once her title to hereditary honor.
Ellinor Desmond, as she sat beside her aged relative, on a
seat something less elevated than her chair of dignity, was such
as I have before described her, the fairest of a country and a
race distinguished at all times by a high style of female
loveliness
.
She had just reached that period of life when the young
female has attained the fullest and most perfect development of
every feminine charm; when every beauty of form, feature, and
expression, is in its flower and flush of luxuriant ripeness; and
before one of the graces, the delicacies, or the fresh softnesses
of youth have yielded to the touch of time, or grown hard
through contact with the world's stern realities.
She too, was attired according to her age and station, but
with a degree of taste peculiarly her own, and with more
reference to the fine models of costume afforded by the
portraits
of the fair and noble of the middle ages, than to the
frightful
fashions of puritanical austerity, or the new modes of French
frippery which were becoming current latterly among the
families
of the cavaliers.
Her long robeadmirably fitted to the soft, undulating
outlines
of a shape which had never been disfigured by the
pressure
of the rigid whalebone which rendered the corsage of a
lady of those days scarcely less iron than the corslet of her
lordwas of rich emerald-colored velvet, just edged with a
narrow stripe of gold, and gathered round her slender waist
by a golden cincture. Her fine falling shoulders and
swan-like
neck were bare in their dazzling beauty, as were her full
round arms almost to the shoulders; and she wore upon her
head a graceful wreath of the dark-leaved Irish ivy, the
berries
of which, having been gilded, glittered in fine contrast to
the black silken masses of her luxuriant ringlets.
Her dress, her attitude, and the half-mournful,
half-enthusiastic
expression which hovered like a light cloud over her
beautiful features, would have suited the poet's ideal of the
wild, melancholy muse of unhappy Erin. Nor could any one,
how little liable soever to fanciful or romantic imaginations,
have failed to feel his fancy stirred to something of a higher
flight, as his eye dwelt on that surpassing creature.
She had already possessed the countess of all the
occurrences
of the evening, as of the wishes and the apprehensions
of her lover; and had for the time succeeded in kindling the
proud spirit of their race in that aged bosom, and disposing her
to the assertion of something more than mere dignity of bearing
against the anticipated assumption of the priest. A thousand
recollections had flashed upon the mind of the countess at the
high words and energetic counsels of her niece; and she had
responded to them with a burst of truly national eloquence,
bordering almost upon invective, as the idea was forced upon
her that the dignity of her house would be insulted by having
a renegade, a traitor to his country, and an especial enemy of
her race thrust upon her as a guest, even much more as a
confident
and friend, by anything of priestly interference. And
for a while, her wonted reverence for the Church, and her
personal
respectnot all unmixed with fearfor her confessor,
yielded to the tide of lacerated and indignant feeling which
overflowed her heart at the bare thought of being urged to
receive
courteously one whom she had ever regarded as the
betrayer
and assassin of her lost lord. By degrees, however,
anxiety and apprehension began to take the place of wrath;
and it were difficult to say whether she were more resolved to
6
refuse any terms to the recreant Hugh O'Neil, or doubtful how
she should carry out her resolves.
Ellinor also was filled with gloomy apprehensions; she
know the temper and feelings of her aged relative, even to
their inmost secrets; and this knowledge it was that filled her
with anxiety; she was aware that her nature partook much in
one respect the quality of the flint:
Which, much enforced, sheweth a hasty spark,
And straight is cold again
that the hotter the stages of her first ire, the quicker it subsided
into gloom and coldness; and above all, she dreaded, and with
reason, the strange and stern interest which the priest Daly
had gained over her spirit, otherwise so haughty and
indomitable
.
Such were the causes of the deep thought and anxious gloom
in which both those noble ladies were enveloped, when, at the
third sounding of the trumpets, the great doors at the lower
end of the saloon were thrown open, and the young earl
entered
,
followed by his paternal cousins, Con and Ulick, and
having the priest Daly walking at his right hand in composed
and apparently serene humility. Many other guests,
gentlemen
,
and kinsmen of the house, entered in order, each
according
to his nearness in blood to the head of the clan, until at
least twenty persons were assembledas fair a company as
ever graced the court of a crowned sovereign, so far as
stateliness
of bearing, and completeness of manly beauty.
The young earlwho was now richly dressed in accordance
with his rankwalked into the room with a rapid and irregular
sten, very unlike his ordinary gait, which was remarkably firm
and even, as is for the most part the case with men of great
characters and fixed resolution. There was a nervous
quivering
too of his nether lip, and a bright, hectic-like spot of
burning
crimson on either of his cheek-bones, while all the rest of
his face was almost unnaturally pallid.
His right hand was employed constantly, but it would seem
unconsciously, in playing with the hilt of the highly ornamented
dagger which occupied the left side of his girdle; and by each,
the least, of these signs, Ellinor, who had raised her eyes
anxiously
on her lover's entrance, and who, perhaps, saw for the
moment nothing but his high lineaments, read, at the first
glance that he had been singularly chafed and irritated during
his prolonged interview with Father Daly.
Thence her eye wandered to the priest, and although the
man was to most eyes inscrutable, him too she perused almost
to his inmost soul, discovering secret thoughts and sentiments
kept down by an iron will, and subdued by a long course of
mental disciplinealbeit herself so young in years and so
unaccustomed
to the great world, which would probably have
escaped the observation, or baffled the judgment, of the wiser
and more worldly spirits.
For, in truth, the human heart has its instincts, is endowed
with strange and mysterious powers, with passions of
wonder-working
efficacy, which seem sometimes to create a sudden,
and as it were, self born capacity of intuition, which stands the
owner instead of experience, wisdom, logical conclusion, and
sets the veriest child of naturefor the momentabove the
subtlest disputant, the most thoughtful investigator of human
actions, and their sourcethe human soul.
The strongest and most active of these passions is love.
And almost miraculous are at times the powers of perception,
of comprehension, and almost of prophecy which it pours like
a flash of lightning into a night of blackness, over the earnest
and unselfish heart, informing what was but now Cimmerian
gloom with clearness as of the sun at noon.
And thus it was now with Ellinor Desmond. She too, like
all around her, had been more or less subdued to the
remorseless
and
as it seemedinevitable rule of his serene and
unostentatious
,
yet all-controlling despotism.
She too had regarded him as a man apart from all things
almost indeed, above them; as one whose sway over her mind
it were well nigh impious to disputeinto whose motives it
were wholly useless to enquire.
But now, at once, and as it were, by a single glance, she read
every present thought of his dark soul, and could have almost
presaged his future line of action.
He was a tall, spare man, with an exceedingly erect carriage,
so far as to the shoulders; but his neck was bowed and
stooping
,
so that his face was for the most part nearly invisible to
any one standing in front of himespecially if he were
conversing
on any topics of unusual interestat which times his
eyes would be so completely covered by his drooping lids, that
it was difficult to believe that he did not resort to this posture
from a desire to prevent his thoughts from being deciphered
through the expression of his face. At other timesespecially
when he knew himself to be unobservedhe would gaze with
a sharp, marking, and inquisirive look, into the countenances
of all around him, wandering with the speed of intuition from
face to face, and passing onward so rapidly as to avoid
detection
.
But if, by any chance, the face of the observed was
lifted suddenly, so as to meet his glance, it fell instantly, without
a sign of embarrassment or confusion, leaving the manso far
as all outward expression was concerneda blank inscrutable;
and at such times, he would usually begin to discourse upon
some fascinating abstract topic, with an eloquence of language,
a silvery sweetness of tongue, and a serene unconsciousness
of manner, which might have imposed upon the
shrewdest-minded
.
In dress and demeanor, he exhibited nothing of the clerical
profession. At that period, indeed, it would have been unsafe
to do so; and although Ignatius Daly was made of no stuff
that should shrink from any peril incurred for the real
advancement
of his order, in which was wrapped up all the selfishness,
all the ambition, all the egotistical pride of his own wily and
aspiring nature, still less was he of that temper which would
rashly front the edge of the persecutor's two-edged edicts, or
seek the barren honors of unnecessary martyrdom.
As was frequently the case with the more trusted memoers
of the order of Jesus, even in ordinary times, when concealment
of his rank or profession might tend
ad majorem Dci gloriam
,
as the phrase ran, Father Ignatius had a general dispensation
to wear the garments and the weapons of a layman; and it
was well-known that he had often wielded the latter with the
skill and prowess of a soldier,
literally
of the church militant,
rendered singularly formidable by the coldness of his impassive
temperament.
Such was the man who glided into the room with the
noiseless
and stealthy step of the prowling panther, shooting keen
glances, true to the mark as so many winged arrows, from
beneath
the long, thick lashes of his downcast lids; observing every
thing which he cared to notice; while to a casual spectator, it
would have seemed that he scarce cared to note how many
persons, much less who, were present in the saloon.
There was, evidently, a feeling of uneasiness and wonder
pervading the bosoms of all the gentlemen in the young earl's
train; for all knew that a stranger had been brought in with
the hunting party, under strange circumstances, and that he
was now in confinement, as a sort of honorable prisoner, under
the ward of Colonel Desmond. None, however, knewwith
the exception of the gentlemen and vassals who had composed
the hunting partywho this stranger was; and as these either
evaded answering any questions put to them, or replied openly,
that they were forbidden to speak out, curiosity and suspicion
were both vehemently excited, to which not a little touch of
fear was added by the character and temper of the times. The
earl's interview with the priest had not passed unmarked, and
it had transpired too that warm words had been used, and that
the O'Brien was greatly moved.
No one, however, dared to ask a question, nor was a word
spoken, until the young earl reached the foot of the deas, when
he addressed his mother in tones indicative of the deepest
respect
,
and with a bow so deep, as is usually rendered to strangers
only.
I pray your ladyship to pardon me, he said, for
keeping
you thus awaiting in what must have seemed so unmannerly
a way. But strange things have befallen us to-day, and it was
necessary that we should take counsel on them promptly.
I pardon you, my son, replied the aged lady, who had
risen to her feet as the guests entered the saloon, and advanced
to the edge of the low steps leading into the body of the
apartment
,
where the two attendant maidens extended her train,
and disposed themselves to bear it, as she should move forward.
I pardon you right willingly; and that the rather that you
have never failed of respect in the right sort before, and that I
therefore doubt not your having a sufficient cause, which you
have communicated doubtless to our excellent counsellor, and
good friend, Father Daly; although, I wonder somewhat that
my son should have sought any counsellor before his mother.
I pray you pardon me again, answered the earl, speaking
more quickly than before; but I have not sought any
counsel
of the reverend and pious fatherseeing that the matter
partook not of any ghostly nature, nor needed divine
admonitions
but
called for worldly knowledge, and something,
perchance
,
of military wisdom. I conferred with him merely to
let him know my will touching the course of conduct to be
observed by all beneath my roof, to a most strange and
unexpected
inmate.
A most unwelcome inmate, you would say, my son,
interposed
the aged lady, with a deep frown depressing her long,
straight brows, although it did not alter the grave tranquillity
of her features.
A
most
unwelcome inmate, he returned, with grave
emphasis
.
And yet he saved your life, my son, replied the priest, or
ere the countess could frame her answer; and he spoke in an
accent of the most perfect serenity, and in a voice that rang
like a soft silvery trumpet. Saved your lifeperchance sent
especially unto that end. Have you considered what it is to
call one sent of the Most High, unwelcome?
I have heard say, answered the earl quickly, and even
sharply, that
Hr
of whom we may not judge, has, at times,
in his wisdom, sent evil spirits and false prophets to whom he
would try. Would you call these welcome, right reverend sir
and father?
I would not judge, my son, returned the priest; at least
until I knew the ends which not only prove, but justify the
means.
Nor I, answered the earl; and therefore, judging of
the present from past ends, him I do call unwelcome.
Indeed, most unwelcome, said the countess, so sternly and
decidedly, that even the priest deemed it advisable to say no
farther at that time. But more of this, hereafter. Supper
awaits us, and our meat will be cold if we tarry longer. But
where is our honored guest, and trusty cousin, Florence
Desmond
?where
is your brother, Ellinor?
Colonel Desmond has of his love for us consented, mother,
to take upon himself a most unpleasant taskto be the
entertainer
,
namely, of this inmate, holding him in such honorable
ward as I dare only for the present to impose upon him, and
suffering no one to converse with him, let what may be the
color of his coat.
And as he spoke he glanced his eye slightly toward the black
velvet
just au corps
of the priest, who adhered to the color,
if not to the cut, of his order.
I knew not, interrupted Con O'Brien shortly, that there
was any coat but of one color under this honorable roof.
Methinks
,
if there be, it will not be long until a score or two of
rapiers find out of what stuff it is made.
Many turn their coats sometimes, Con, answered the
earl, with slow, stern emphasis.
And some wear black coats, our dear son would say, the
priest again interposed, who have not turned, nor are like to
turn them. Is it not so, my lord?
Even so, sir, answered O'Brien. It is
my will
that no
man, whether clerical or laywhether citizen or soldier
whether for the king or the Parliament, shall see that
personage
to-nightno, not if it were
in extremis
, even to make his
last confession.
There is little fear, my son, that such emergency shall
arisethough if it should, I think you would scarce adhere
to so impious a resolve
But I shouldstrictly, to the letter, answered the earl
steadily, while the priest went on, as if he had not heard or
noted the interruptionunless, indeed, Colonel Florence
Desmond have it in part of his trust to slay this
unwelcome
inmate
.
To do murder under trustunder the O'Brien's trust!
exclaimed the O'Brien fiercely, with his hand upon his hilt
Priest, it is well for you that you are a priest; for
otherwise
You should not shame your noble sword upon him! cried
Ellinor, taking a quick step forwardher beautiful cheeks
blazing, and her eyes flashing with fiery indignation. He
who slanders the absent, the noble, and the good, sheltering
himself behind the dark shield of Church privilege, is thrice
a coward, and ten times a knave, were he a thousand times a
priest.
Ellinor, Ellinor! exclaimed the aged countess, raising her
long, thin armpeace, peace! You have forgotten. Is this
maidenly?
As maidenly as that is priestly, she made answer. And
if I have forgotten, what has he donedaring to hint an
assassin's
stain upon a soldier, before a sister's face? Has not he
forgotten?
Most grosslymost disgracefully, answered the earl;
forgotten himself as a churchman, a gentleman, and a man
and that to a lady.
The priest raised his eyes, for the first time, fully, and looked
the countess in the face directly, with a strange meaning gaze.
That piercing, fascinating gaze was at once in itself a question
and a command.
It spoke almost as audibly, as with articulate words: And
dost thou too dare to brave me? It commanded with
imperious
power: Silence this puny opposition!
But for once the question was unansweredthe command
disobeyed; and, as he saw that his will was for the first time
frustrate, and that his power had departed, assuming an air of
the deepest humility, almost of contrition, and smiting his breast
with his hand, he exclaimed in a low, quiet tone:
Wo is me! wo is me! When the flocks go astray, surely
the leader of the flock is not guiltless. How I have sinned, I
know not; but of a very truth my sin is flagrant before heaven!
Farewell, my childrenfare ye well. My mission here is
ended
.
When confidence is gone away, utility must needs go
likewise. Heaven's blessings be about this house, and upon its
dwellers, now and evermore. Fare ye wellfare ye well for
ever!
And he turned on his heel slowly and reluctantly, expecting
in his own heart to be recalled and humbly sued for pardon,
and strode with a firm and stately step across the echoing floor,
until he reached the large arched doorway, under which he
paused and looked back upon that silent and astounded group
with an air and gesture which, though it was ill-dissembled
for a courteous, sad farewell, was in reality a sterl, prophetic
menace.
Deeply religious, however, as is the genius of the Irish
people
,
and inclined to the profoundest reverence for the priestly
character of office, the offence which he had offered to the head
of that great and noble clan, whereof all his auditors were
members, was so flagrant, and his interposition in favor of one
so odious as Hugh O'Neil so strange and suspicious, that there
was but one feeling of outraged dignity and injured
patriotism
among the company; and he was suffered to depart
without
a word or a salutation, much less an offer to recall him.
There was a moment's pause after he had left the saloon
a short, breathless interval before any one spoke or stirred; but
when he had departed, it was evident that the hearts of all
beat more lightly in their bosoms, and that a cause of restraint
at least, if not of apprehension, had been removed by the
secession
of the dark churchman.
But collecting himself in an instant, and thoroughly
reassured
by the demeanor of his subordinate chieftains, if he had
over doubted how they would incline between his patriarchal
authority and the discipline of the church, the young Earl
advanced
with much respect to the foot of the deas, and taking
his mother's hand in his own, conducted her with as much
observance
of decorum, as if she had been a crowned head, from
the state saloonone of hie cousins tendering the like service
to the fair Ellinor, and all the gentlemen of his train following
his steps according to their rank, followed in their turn by a
long retinue of feudal servitors, seneschals, stewards, esquires,
and pages, toward the grand hall, in which the evening meal
awaited them.
It was a vast apartment, floored, wainscoted and ceiled with
black bog oak, rarely sculptured, and polished, till it shone in
the light of the numerous waxen torches, blazing in silver
candlesticks and sconces, like one continuous mirror. The
great board, in the shape of a letter T, the upper or transverse
limb of which was appropriated to the members of the proper
family alene, extended down two-thirds the length of the hall,
covered with snow-white linel, for the manufacture of which
Ireland was beginning already to be noted, and laid with
plates and dishes of pewter, burnished as bright as silver, and
intermixed with flagons, cups, and tankards of the purer
metal
.
The upper board, which was occupied by the earl and
the aged countess, seated in their chairs of state, by the fair
Ellinor Desmond and the two noble youths, Con and Ulick
O'Brien, beside whom stood a vacant chair for the absent
Florence, was spread with crimson velvet, and laid with a
service of massive silver. The salt-cellar, a rare and
splendid
piece of plate, and all the drinking-cups and vessels being
either of pure gold, or so richly gilded as not readily to be
distinguished from it.
The feast was sumptuous and delicate, according to the
notions
of that day, although it was composed of dainties far too
solid and subtantial to meet our ideas of a supper. There
were huge tureens steaming with strong venison soup, vast
barons of beef, haunches and chines of the fallow deer, pasties
of red deer venison, looking like fortalices of pastry, wild fowl,
roebucks and cyenets roasted whole; and to complete the
table, the latest remnant of the feudal ages, a peacock, with his
train replaced in all its glory; its crest and claws superbly
gilded, occupying the post of honor.
And all this splendid show of edibles was accompanied by a
display of potables in no degree less masculine and potent.
Tankards of ale and mead, flagons of Malvoisie and Bourdeaux
wines, spiced wassail bowls of hippocras and pigment, and
great horns of the national beverage, the fiery usquebaugh,
circulated
,
unchecked and unreproved by the presence of the ladies.
Still, in spite of the good cheer, and the hospitable efforts of
O'Brien, the mirth of the meeting was destroyed. A cloud
bung over the spirits of allas well of those who were
conscious
of the cause of the strange events of that night, as of those
who had been merely the ignorant spectators of the scene; nor
was the spirit or harmonious feeling of the company at all
increased
by the entrance, so soon as the meats were removed, and
the ladies had withdrawn, of the old seneschal, completely armed
from gorget to spur, in an antique suit of plate armor, bearing
the keys of the three different gate-houses upon a salver, which
he deposited on the board at his lord's right hand; after which
he stood with his right hand resting upon the hilt of his great
war-sword, as if awaiting orders.
Had a bomb-shell fallen unexpected into the midst of that
fan company, it could hardly have created greater confusion
or astonishment than did that singular and warlike
apparition
at a moment when, save two or three of the immediate
kinsmen of the earl, no one anticipated aught of danger, or
had conceived the possibility of any interruption of the
evening's
revel.
Ha! Torlogh, said the O'Brien, calmly, the wards are
all made sure, then?
As sure as iron bolts and stone walls can make them, noble
earl, replied the old man quietly. I locked the gates with
mine own hand, and saw sach portcullis lowered. Trusty
men are on the watch in all the towers, and for this night all
is safe, I can assure you.
I take your assurance, Torlogh, said the earl, as if I
myself
had seen it done. It remains, however, to post some one
on the eagle tower, who will not close his eyes in sleep, that he
watch the beacon upon Claude-boy, and rouse the castle if it
blaze ere daybreak.
That post is mine, my lord, the old man answered in
a calm, low voice, but with an air of fixed determination. Mine
now
as it was in the days of yore, under the great earl, your
father.
You do not spare yourself, old Torlogh. There be younger
men enow who may watch, while you take the rest that is
needful to your years.
The cause, the cause, lord earl, will spare none of its
upholders
;
and if the leaders spare themselves, how shall the
kerns and vassals do their duty?
Well said! well said! Such is the true spirit. Our God
and our king cannot spare us, and Heaven's malison on him!
exclaimed O'Brien, starting to his feet, who seeks to spare
himself, whether for fear or favor!
Heaven's malison upon him! shouted a hundred voices;
for as the earl arose, each gentleman down the long board
sprang to his feet simultaneously, perceiving now, for the
first time, that the hour for action had arrived; and as they
arose, their rapiers flashed from their sheaths in the bright
candle-light
,
and they re-echoed, as a single man, the high words
of their chieftain; while kindling at the fire which blazed in
the bosoms of their nobles, the squires and servitors caught up
the word and gave it stirring utterance, until the tapestries
trembled, and the torches winked and quivered in the
commotion
of the atmosphere caused by that sudden clamor.
From the hall through the vestibule it passed, and into the
court-yard, and to the outer walls, the bastion, the
dungeon-keep
,
until the whole of the old fortalice was wakened with
its thousand echoes into loud and unexpected life.
A proud eye did the young earl cast around him, over that
high and gallant company, whose every heart, as he perceived
at a single glance, panted responsive to his own. He
unhooked
his long broadsword from his belt, scabbard and all, and
unsheathing the weapon with a slow, but steady gesture, cast
the sheath over his shoulder high into the air.
Not a breath was drawn, not a plume fluttered, not a cloak
rustledso deep was the anxious silence of that moment; the
empty sheath fell with a ringing rattle upon the oaken floor;
and as the echoes sank, the clear voice of O'Brien filled the
apartment as if with a real presenceso clear, so full, so
puissant
was its volume.
You have done well! he said. Gentlemen,
fellow-soldiers
,
friends! you have done well to unsheath the mortal sword.
You had done better to cast away the scabbard likewise; for
never must those swords go up again until the cause for which
we fight is conquered; the cause of our God, our country, and
our king; and if the news which I have heard this day prove
true, as well I fear it will, every sword, every arm, every heart
in Ireland will be right dearly needed. Ormond is routed,
friends, by the base roundhead Jones; the siege of Dublin is
already raised, the arch fiend Cromwell is himself upon the
seasperhaps upon the shores of Ireland already. To arms,
then, every manly hand! To arms, every loyal heart! To
arms, one and all, even of who are neither brave nor loyal, if
he would not be seized in his own house cowardly, and
butchered
like a mere sheep in the shambles. Before the sun shall
arise in the east, the truth, the whole truth, shall be known;
and if it be as I deem it is, his first rays shall see the O'Brien's
banner on the breeze, the O'Brien's foot in the stirrup, the
O'Brien's weapon in his hand. Who will not side with the
O'Brien?
Had the call been to the banquet or the dance, to the
tourney
or the chase, some might have lagged reluctantsome
might have turned aside, indolent or heedless.
It was to the battle!to the battle, against puritan hypocrisy
against democratical oppressionagainst fanatical
intolerance
and every man sought to be foremostthe very boys
the pages, scarcely children in their years, stood forth at once,
eager to be the champions of the causethe noblest cause for
which the sword was ever drawnfor that cause was divine,
was threefoldreligion, patriotism, loyalty; and who should
dare oppose them!
Again, from battlement to dungeon, the castle rang with the
exulting cheers of the true-born, the loyal Irish cavaliers; and
in the courts without, the trumpeters struck up unbidden; and
kettle-drum and bugle blast pealed far and wide through the
summer night, sending abroad the stirring strains of the Island
melody, Erin Mavourneen, Erin go bragh, mixed with the
wild hurrah and the high name of England's loved and lawful
king.
Long, long may those notes sound togetherand shame on
him who would divide themIreland for ever, and God save
the king!
CHAPTER VII.
The sentinel on Whitehall gate
Looked forth into the night,
And saw o'erhanging Richmond IIlll
The streak of blood-red light.
Then bugle's note and cannon's roar
The death-like slience broke.
Macaulay
.
It
was an hour past midnight, and the castle, with all its
inmates
,
had, as it seemed, long been steeped in silence and in
slumber. Not a sound had been heard for several hours but
the clank of the sentinols passing at intervals and repassing
over the echoing pavements. But in a lofty window near the
top of the loftiest turrets a lamp was burning clearly and
steadily
,
though now and then some large dark body would pass
between it and the casement, intercepting its lustrous rays for
a moment, and then leaving them vivid and uninterrupted as
before.
There was, then, one watcher, at least, within those ancient
walls other than the more guards of the night.
The window, whence that light streamed so far into the
night, should perhaps rather have been called a loop, so small
and narrow were its dimensions, although it was provided with
diamond-shaped panes of glass, set in a heavy leaden frame;
but it belonged to a neat and pleasant antechamber, though of
small dimensions, opening by one door upon the winding stone
staircase, and by the other into a large and handsome
apartment
,
which had no other visible entrance than through that
antechamber.
One person was alone the tenant of that antechamber, and
that one was Florence Desmond.
A bright wood fire was blazing cheerfully on the hearth,
while on the circular table before it stood a large lamp with
three burners, towering above several well-filled flagons and
two or three large Venice glasses, which by their clear
transparency
seemed to indicate that the contents of the flagons had
met with little favor from the young colonel.
Beside the glasses, and in front of a comfortable armed
chair which seemed to have been but recently thrust back from
its vicinity to the table, lay a volume of Shakspeare open at
that fine passage in the play of Trolius and Cressida, beginning
with the lines:
Time hath, my lord, a wallet at his back
Wherein he puts alms for oblivion,
A great-sized monster of iogratitude
over which Florence Desmend appeared to have been poring
very lately, and perhaps to have arisen only on some slight
suspicion, or anticipation of alarm; for his sheathed rapier, a
long straight cross-hilted Toledo blade, with an ebony hilt and
black leather scabbard, lay close to the volume, accompanied
by a brace of heavy horse-pistols. But Desmond himself stood
erect, midway between the table and the door, which led into
the inner chamber, in an attitude of the deepest and most
interested
attention.
Twice or three times before, during the course of that night
in which he had kept lonely ward over the much-suspected
hostage, he had imagined that the murmur of suppressed voices
came to his ear indistinetly from within, as of some one
conversing
with the person. But each time, when he reflected
that these apartments had been selected for the very purpose
to which they were now applied by the O'Brien, in
consequence
of the fact that they had no communication with the
other parts of the castle, except by the antechamber in which
he sat himself and the staircase leading from it, he had
banished
the idea with a smile at his own foolish fancy, and
returned
to his volume, satisfied that the lord of the castle must
he acquainted with the secrets of his own dwelling.
This fourth time, however, the conviction was so strong
upon his mind that the faint murmur which he heard in that
direction was neither, as he had before striven to believe, the
sigh of the wind among the distant tree-tops, or the chiding of
the watercourse five hundred feet below, but the blended tones
of the human voicethat he at length pushed back his chair
noiselessly, arose to his feet, and throwing off the velvet
slippers
which he had substituted for his ponderous riding boots,
approached the door of the inner room with a stop that gave out
no sound on the soft rushes with which the floor was bestrewn.
The nearer he approached, the more perfectly was he
couvinced
that his impression was correct; and he began to regret
bitterly that he had not acted on his first impulse. But he was
not a man to regret idly, when there was room for present
action
.
With his band on his dagger's hilt, he made one spring
forward, and his grasp was on the latch of the door. It turned,
yet the door yielded not, having been fastened from within by
some suddenly-devised method; for Desmond well knew that
it had no bolt nor lock on the inner side.
It resisted for one second only. The next, heavy oak as it
was, it flew open, as the cave door in the Arabian tales at the
word sesame, before the impetus of Desmond's foot.
As the strong door gave way, he could have sworn that a
light flashed for one second upon his eye; but at the same
instant
his quick ear, strangely sharpened by suspicion of
treachery
,
detected, through the clatter of the broken latch and the
clang of the flapping door, the sound of something heavy
falling
then
all was darkness, and, unless it were a dull, uncertain
rustling, all was silence also.
The next moment the strong, unpleasant odor of a suddenly
extinguished lamp became palpably sensible; and then, ere he
had time to reach his own lamp, a slight creak, as of stiff hinges
moving, and a flap, as if of waving tapestry, followed.
Still, from within that dark chamber, into which there fell
but an uncertain glimmer from Desmond's lamp, standing
within the angle of the chimney-corner, there came no positive
sound, no ungry outery at the irruption, which had been
accompanied
with enough of noise to awaken the seven sleepers.
7
Had O'Neil then escaped? That thought was almost
madness
.
He had returned to the antechamber, snatched the lamp with
his left, and a horse-pistol with his right hand, in less time than
it takes to record it, and was rushing back into the prisoner's
chamber, when a sight met his eye that arrested him, and fixed
him where he stood, motionless as a marble statue.
What was it that so blanched his cheek, and dimmed his
flashing eye? For his eye was dimmed, and his cheek
blanched on the instant.
Far off, far off on the very verge of the horizon, where by
daylight the keenest eye could not have discerned the blue line
of the low hills which there bounded the landscape from the
blue sky above them, there glimmered a faint speck of fire,
scarce brighter than the glow-worm's lamp in Junebut while
he gazed, another flashed out, nearer than the firstanother
and another.
At the same time, while in this new excitement, this new
wonder, he had well-nigh forgotten that which had at first
moved him, a step sounded close at his elbow, a hand was laid
upon his arm, and a harsh voice murmured in his ear:
Ha! Colonel Desmond?said I not the truth?or what
say those beacon-lights, unless that Dublin is relieved, and the
enemy on Irish soil?
It was the voice of Hugh O'Neil; and, as he turned his head
to the speaker, the ungainly form and hideous features, lighted
up now by a half-triumphant smile, met his eyes.
Almost bewildered, and what was most unusual in him,
surprised
not a little, Florence Desmond set down the lamp upon
the board with an unsteady hand.
And thou? he said, and thou, Hugh O'Neilwhence
comest thou?
Whence come I, noble Colonel? None should know that,
I think, better than thou who hast kept watch over me, as a
cat doth over a mouse, since supper-time. Whence come I?
why, from that chamber surely. Though how the door
came open, and the lamp-stand which was beside my bed
o'erthrown
,
I comprehend not.
And thou wert asleep, O'Neil?
Surely. What else should I bethe waking thoughts of
one sentenced to be hanged at daybreak, in case a courier's horse
should cast a shoe, or a watchman sleep at his post, and so
kindle
not his beacon, are none, I trow, so pleasant, that he should
keep late vigils.
And didst sleep through it allthrough all that clang and
clatter?
What clang and clatter? Nay, worthy Colonel, it is thou,
methinks, who art asleep and dreaming.
I tell thee, Hugh O'Neil, I heard thee in low conversation
with some one within thy chamberI forced thy door with din
enough to wake the dead; and dost tell me thou didst sleep
through it all? Besides, I heard the closing of another door,
after I had forced that one. The priestHugh O'Neilthe
priest Daly was with thee!
Was he?It must be in the spirit then, for surely in the
body he was not. But is there another door? he added, most
naturally. I lived here many years of my life, and have
played here when a boy, when these rooms were all bare and
unfurnished, many a day, and never knew of one. Then
altering
his tone a littleI have good cause of complaint, of
quarrel in all this. Thou wert my warder in all honornot
my jailor; and thus to break ope my chamber-door somewhat
exceeds a gentle warder's duty. But in these evil times,
suspicion
seems to hang o'er all men; and I suppose I must e'en
forgive youthe rather that those beacons do proclaim my
tidings truedisastrous though they beand set me free alike
from doubt and durance. Is it not so, Colonel Desmond? See,
there are seven of them now!
Moved far more by the confirmation of the fatal news
which, up to this time, he had doubted, than by any care for
O'Neil, Desmond again turned to the casementand from it,
past the possibility of doubt, beheld along the line of distant
hills, nearer and nearer from the northward, seven twinkling
stars of fire. An eighth broke out while he was gazing; but,
strange to tell, ere it had burst into full power, although at
first it seemed to blaze cheerily enough, it sank at once, as if
water had been cast upon it, and was extinguished utterly, no
more to be relumed.
Desmond gazed on O'Neil, and O'Neil on Desmond; but
neither spoke, nor made any sign of the wonder which
certainly
both felt at the time the strongest feeling of his heart.
They turned again toward the casement; and lo! in the brief
interval since the last was quenched, the next beyond it toward
Dublin had evanished likewise. The other six continued blazing
lustrously and strong, and flaring higher heavenward, perhaps
because the watchmen saw their signals unrepeated.
Perhaps
because the chain was interrupted thus; perhaps because
some intervening height cut short the view of the farther
bale-fires
from the men at the nearer stations, no nearer
alarm-fire
heralded the tidings of invasion, and all the neighboring
moors and cultured vales beneath, up to the base of huge
Slievh-Buy, lay buried in blank darkness.
But if, until now, surprise, and the quick succession of events,
had hold florence Desmond inert and inactive, he now
recovered
all the onergetic readiness of mind which had rendered
him so famous as a soldier, in both hemispheres.
He east the casement open by which he was standing,
discharged
the pistol which he held high into the air, and shouted
at the top of his voice:
Alarm!alarm! Treason!treason!
His pistol shot was answered by the discharge of harquebuss
after harquebuss, on the platforms of the rampartson the
turret-tops
at
the gate-housesfar down the hill-side, and lastly,
by the roar of a culverin on the dungeon-keep, and the jarring
clang of the great alarum-bell.
Meanwhile, with shout and gathering cry, and clash of arms,
the garrison came together in the court-yard; and within five
minutes of the discharge of Desmond's pistol, a quick step
came hurrying up the winding stair to the antechamber door,
and a well-known voice exclaimed without:
Openopen to me, Florence Desmond. It is I, O'Brien!
He drew the bolts, and admitted instantly the lord of the
castle, who started back as he entered, and saw O'Neil,
standing
,
apparently, in close conversation with Florence Desmond;
for, somehow or other, hearing that the alarm had been given
from the turret in which the former was confined, he had
connected
it indistinctly with his escapethough how that should
have occurred, he could not comprehend.
My tidings are proved true, cousin of O'Brien. Now, at
least, I may thank you for your generosity, and claim some
shew of hospitality, at least, if not of courtesy, at your hands!
exclaimed Hugh O'Neil bitterly, as his cousin's eye met his
own.
Is itcan it be possible? cried O'Brien, looking at
Desmond
for an answer; God of my fathers! Ormond beaten,
and Cromwell on the shores of Erin!
But Desmond had no hopes to give him. He shook his head,
and pointed with his hand to the open casement, and to the
ominous bale-fires, blazing red, but still unrepeated, on the far
horizon.
It
is
true! Heaven and all its saints defend us, and protect
the cause!for it shall now need their protection. Yes, sir,
he added, turning toward O'Neil, but with a frowning aspect,
and a voiceif it were possibleeven colder than he had used
to him beforeYes, sir, you
are
free, and shall be treated
henceforth with all hospitality, all courtesy. But, mark me,
Hugh O'Neil, not
trusted
. Had your heart, as you aver, been
true, been Irish, rather had you swung from the flag-staff on
this very tower on which we stand, knowing that Erin was yet
free, unsubdued, and hopeful, than sat the lord of this fair
castle
in its fairest hall, knowing her but the victim, but the slave,
but the spoil of the bloodthirsty, church-destroying Puritan.
Go, sirgo! You are free, I saybut not trusted!
You do me great wrong, cousin, replied Hugh. No
man deplores more deeply than I do the peril of our common
countryno one will fight farther to defend herno one, I may
say, loves her better!
These things proved, we will trust you; till then, not a
hand's-breadth! Deeds speak; words often, truly interpreted,
are but silence. Act, and we shall hear!
He bowed, and turned on his heel, repeating, as he did so:
You do me great wrong, nevertheless, and one day will
know it.
I hope so, said O'Brien. In the meantime, far rather
would I wrong you, wrong myself, wrong Desmond here, than
wrong Erinthan wrong the cause of our monarchof our
God! Ho! UlickCon O'Brien!
And at his call, the two young men, who had halted
half-way
up the stairs, when the earl entered the antechamber,
appeared
fully armed at the stair-head.
Look you; our cousin here,and he spoke somewhat
sneeringly
has
proved his good faith thus far; that Ormond is
undoubtedly
repulsed from Dublin, as he told us yesterday, and
the accursed Puritan upon our shores; events at which, I
must say, he seems to rejoice mightily. His truth is proved,
however, thus far, and our promise must be kept inviolate.
Henceforth he is our guest; attend him with all honor; suffer
him to go where he willto do what he will; only observing,
that he hath no command whatsoever; and suffer him to
converse
at his pleasure, with any of our friends and
Excepting always, I beseech you, Desmond interrupted
him, the good priest, Father Daly!
O'Brien looked quickly at the colonel, and reading a deep
meaning in his eye, took up his words without question or
comment
.
Excepting always Father Daly. And now, cousin Hugh,
I must needs pray you to excuse me; these gentlemen will
wait on you; but for me, I would hold counsel here awhile with
Colonel Desmond. I will join you within the hour, in the
guard-room. Ulick, he added, although we supped so late,
still we will breakfast somewhat early. See that the cooks
and butlers have all in readiness at daybreak. Not in the
grand hall of the keep, but in the great stone hall of the outer
guard-house. Now, Florence, we will speak together.
And at the signal, they were left alone. When Desmond, after
relating to him hastily his suspicions concerning the priest and
O'Neil, and the manner of his awakening, called his attention
as to a thing of far more present importance, to the fact of the
two nearer beacons having been almost simultaneously
extinguished
showed
that no effort had been made to rekindle
them, and that the line was evidently broken, although those
farther off toward Dublin were blazing brilliantly as ever.
What it may mean, he added, you should be better able
to explain than Iseeing that you must needs know all the
stations
.
The nearest that is now alight, replied O'Brien, after
examining
them carefully, with a prospective glass, as it was then
tormeda very rare implement in those daysis the Hill of
Muckla, and beyond that, Lugnaguilla Mount, and Atinmoe.
Those which you saw blaze up and then expire, are the
heights of Carysfort, and Killahurler Hill, over Arklow. The
nearer stations, which have not been lighted, are Ballyfad and
Moniseed, and the Crag of Ask, next to us in the valley.
Which went out first, the blaze on Killahurler or that on the
heights of the Carysfort?
The nearest this wayKillahurler; it scarce blazed half
a minute.
I thought so, Florence. 'Tis the loftiest hill on this side
Shranamuck above the deer-park, and so lofty that neither
Ballyfad ner Moniseed can see beyond it. Hence is the chain
of light interrupted. But we will set it going once again. Ho!
there, on guardwithout! he shouted, leaning with half his
body out of the narrow casement.
Hillo! my lordwhat ho! was shouted up from the
courtyard
.
Kindle the beacon speedilyfire-lights are blazing far and
wide on Muckla Hill, and Lugnaguilla Mount, on Atinmoe,
Kill-day
and Shranamuck. By some mischance, the fires have failed
on Carysfort, and Killahurler, and hence the vale hath lost
the tidings. Light up! I say, light upand that right speedily!
Then lowering his voice, he added, No mischance, noble
Florenceno mischance, I fear, but treason.
I am not sure of that, replied Desmond, who had
pondered
deeply, and was looking over a small rough map of the
country, which happened to hang upon the turret-wall, perhaps
as an aid to the warder, whose chamber that was in ordinary
times. I am not sure. Here runs the high-road, if I read it
right, over the very highest point of Killahurler, just where
the cross-road bears away from Arklow. How far from that
stands the beacon?
Some quarter of a mile, I think, replied O'Brien, on a
high, bare rock to the westward. But what matters it?
Again. The same road seems to skirt the lower spurs of
the heights of Carysfort. How far is that road from the
beacon
station?
Three hundred yards, or over. I know it well, because I
marked out the last six from the Hill of Muckla.
Marked them out, I fear, badly, Dermot, said the other
gravely. One question morefor I have well-nigh lost my
memory of distances, in my long absence, though the names
dwell with me like strains of old remembered music. How
many miles is it from Carysfort to Killahurler?
Six miles, by the roadperhaps seven. In a straight line,
it should be about five. I wish you would explain.
So that in case the van of a force, say some four or five
thousand strong, had reached the hill of Killahurler, its rear
might well be passing the heights of Carysfort, at the same
hour. Cousin minecousin mine, what is once done cannot
be amendedbut if it be to do again, it may well be bettered.
When next you select beacon stations, let them be in the
pathless
solitudes of hills, or on the bare expanse of moors, afar from
all great roads, out of the way of marching armies.
Why, what do you imagine, Desmond?
That a strong force of Cromwell's men are marching
hitherward
.
That the van mounting Killahurler have observed
all the country in their rear blazing with beacons, and
perceiving
how that station domineered all others, have seized the
hill just as the beacon was enkindled. Their rear have done
the same by Carysfort, and secure now against farther
spreading
of alarm, are marching with all speed hitherward. If I
am right, we shall know it ere long.
But why should such a force march hitherward? Ormond
doubtless is gone northward.
No one can say! It were sound policy, however, and
good strategy, nor unlike Cromwell's crafty foresight, to detach
force enough to hold in check these southern countiesnay,
even to capture youyourself, O'Brien, known for the most
puissant, and not least ardent or least dangerous of the king's
leaders, here in Leinster.
But scarce with such a force as four thousand or five
thousand
men.
Oh! that is mere conjecture; only thrown to account for
the space between the head and rear of the marching column.
They may be but a thousand marching by detachmentsthey
may be delayed by artillery or baggagethey may have
straggled
as
will happen in night marchesin the darkness. But
of a truth, I little doubt we shall see English troops arrayed
against these walls before noon to-morrow.
May God forefend! cried O'Brien. There are not three
days' food in the garrison for the men who are now within it;
nor two when those pour in who will pour in on the enemy's
approach.
In God's name then, O'Brien, let four-fifths of your garrison
go forth, at once, without an hour's delay, in little squads of
five and ten, under trusty men, to sweep all the country round
for ten miles, of cattle, grain, and forage. For the rest, none
but men capable of bearing arms must be admitted; and it were
well at daybreak to send forth all the women, children, and old
men who are now within. I would the countess and Ellinor
were without the walls now. In the open country even these
Puritans will not harm helpless, unarmed men, much less
women
;
but when a place is stormed, no man can say what shall
happen.
A place stormed! Think you, Florence Desmond, that
the strength of all the world could
storm
the Red Castle of the
O'Brien?
I have seen stronger places by the half stormed in two
hours by a thousand men! replied the veteran. Castle
O'Brien is a fine old feudal fortressa good irregular work,
but totally incapable of any long defence. But do not answer
me, I pray you, cousin; but rather give the orders I suggest
for victualling the castle. Then join me again here. This
is the best post of observation.
O'Brien answered nothingbut although very far from
being edified by the slighting opinion of his cousin as to the
defensibility of the time-honored keep of the O'Briens, he had
too great regard for that cousin personally, and far too high an
opinion of his military talents, knowledge, and experience, to
waste valuable time in vain debate. He descended, therefore,
at once to the court of the castle, where his voice was soon heard
issuing the necessary orders, above the clang of hoofs, and the
cash of armor and accoutrements, as party after party rode
forth from the gates as fast as they could prepare themselves
for action.
Meanwhile the beacon on the dungeon-keep blazed out
triumphantly
,
and the dark ruddy glare which it poured forth
dyed all the pavement of the court and the red freestone
buildings
of the castle with a strange lurid crimson, and flickered
on the armor of the mustering retainers in the court below,
arming them, as it were, in panoply of gold; and far without
the walls changed the green garb of summer into the sare
leaves of autumn, and gleamed upon the outworks, and cast
blacker shadows into the abyss of the ravine beneath, like
some tremendous and portentous meteor.
Ere long the stations in the plain below, catching the
meaning
of that sudden light, though it came in a different direction
from that they expected, and comprehending that, from the
castle top, perched as it was on the giddy crags of Slievh-Buy,
many points northward were in view, to themselves invisible,
lighted their bale-fires, one by one; so that the chain of signal
fires was spreading toward a common centre from both
extremities
that
common centre being the dark and still
unresponsive
beights of Killahurler.
Anxiously now did Florence Desmond watch the progress
of those blazing pyres, for on that progress depended the
frustration
,
the verification, of his fears.
The crag of Ask blazed first, and that comparatively at so
short a distance from the castle, that the keen eyes of the
watcher, assisted by his powerful glass, could mark the red
reflection
wavering and winking in the mountain loch at the
crag's foot.
Then Moniseed, in turn, kindled a broader and a brighter
blazo, for it flared upon the turret of a tributary chief, a friend
and fellow-soldier, as a namesake, of the O'Brien.
Then the fir-wooded ridge of Ballyfad replied; and for a
while Desmond was anxious, in the hope that it might be from
negligence or sleep that the watchers on Killahurler had failed
in their succession, and that, now wakened to their sense of
duty by this counter illumination, they might dispel his fears
by a late but welcome response.
But no light came upon those rugged summits, nor on the
heights of Carysfort beyond; and after watching them for
better than a quarter of an hour, he closed the perspective
glass with an ominous shake of the head, and turned into the
chamber lately occupied by the O'Neil, to examine into, and
if possible verify, the cause of his late suspicions.
To this task he applied himself with all the shrewd tact and
experience of a veteran soldier; and yet so poor had been the
art of the deceivers as compared to the keen-sightedness of him
they would have deceived, that he had not well stepped across
the threshold before all his suspicions were confirmed by the
first signs which met his eyeand which O'Neil, whether
undervaluing
the powers of his antagonist, or unable through the
darkness to perceive the tale they told, had failed to remove
before coming out into the antechamber.
The first of these was a broken dagger lying on the floor at
the opposite side of the apartment, whither it had been driven
by the violence of the blow which forced the dooras was
clearly shewn by a fragment of its glittering blade still sticking
fast in the black oak door-post above the latch which it had
been intended to confine.
The next was the fact that the lamp-stand which O'Neil had
unquestionably overturned himself as he lay in bed, the better
to conceal the flight of his nocturnal visitor, lay just where it
had fallen, far too remote from the door to have been
overturned
,
as the renegade insisted, by that concussion.
The damning proof of all consisted, however, in a white
linen handkerchief of a particularly fine fabric, such as in those
days, and especially in that country, would have been carried
by no one but by a woman or a priestwhich, if farther
assurance
had been needed, had a border of peculiar Flanders lace.
And this, with which, as a traveller, and long a dweller of the
Low Countries, he was well acquainted, he recognised at once
as having seen it that very day in the hands of the priest,
Ignatius
Daly.
Ha! muttered Desmond to himself, I have not made
the Virginia voyage all for nothing; nor must they leave so
broad a trail as this, who would escape the eyes of one who
has hunted with the best of the Appalaches! Comecome,
sir priest!we have you clear enough. It remains only to
discover whither you have flod, and by what passage.
Thus saying, he passed round the whole circuit of the
chamber
,
lifting the tapestry, and examining the oaken wall beyond it,
in the hope to discover the hinges or spring of some concealed
door. But there was none; or if there were, it was
concealed
so skilfully that it escaped his nicest scrutiny. His next
search was the floor, and here, frustrated in the first place, he
confidently expected that he should find a trap. But here he
was more decidedly at fault than before. For the chamber,
being but small, was floored with undivided planks running
from wall to wall unbroken, and as no one of these exceeded
seven or eight inches in width, it was impossible at a glance
that any aperture could be wrought in one of these, capable
of admitting the body of a man.
Then he returned to the walls, and proceeded to sound the
wainscoating round the whole circuit of the room with his
dagger's hilt; but here again his art failed him; for it
appeared
that there was a small space all around between the
woodwork and the wall, so that all alike sounded hollow to the
blow.
Baffled, but not yet balked, he paused a moment to reflect,
and then turned with a smile on his face into the other room,
and returned in an instant, bearing in his hand a small lighted
taper of fine virgin wax.
Stooping down, he applied the flame of this to the open crack
or crevice at the junction of the surbace and the floor, and thus
once again made the circuit of the chamber. The joiner's
work of those days was far less complete and elaborate than it
is now; and few doors or windows in the newest and most
gorgeous edifices but let in their currents of cold air.
Florence
Desmond was not surprised, therefore, to see his tell-tale
taper's flame flicker and flare incessantly in the draught that
rushed in through the ill-fitted wainscoating. But at length,
when he reached a spot, where, though the joint appeared no
wider than elsewhere, the flame was blown sheer out, he
laughed a silent laugh, marked the place by sticking his
poniard
erect in the floor, and then brought from the outer room
the larger lamp, which he set down on the centre-table, and
his long Toledo blade still in the scabbard.
This he now drew. It was scarcely thicker than a sheet of
paper, and of a temper so exquisite that the point and hilt
might be bent until they met, and held in one hand, with no
very great exercise of strength. Kneeling down, he thrust this
fine blade in horizontally to the crevice, at several points
before
he came to the place which he had marked, and easily
ascertained that the space between the oaken wainscoating
and the stone wall of the turret was something less than a foot
in depth. But when he reached the place indicated by the
dagger, precisely as he had expected, the whole length of the
blade passed in without finding any obstacle even at its
extremity
.
By making the blade vibrate, which he could do with
ease, he likewise ascertained that there was a cavity at that
point, far below the floor of the room; and by running the
blade laterally to and fro, he discovered that the width of this
hidden opening was precisely equal to that of one
compartment
of the pannelling.
There is no secret any longer here, he said quietly, as he
arose to his feet. Daly did visit him, and here is the secret
door from which he came. It remains only to see how it
opens. But for that time presses not. Now let us see to these
beacons, how they burn.
And with the words he again entered the antechamber, and
going to the window, smote his breast the instant he had looked
forth into the night. Alas! he exclaimed; alas!it is
too true! They are upon us, and in force!
The light on Ballyfad, which had so brightly blazed a
short half-hour before, the third light only from the castle
walls, was black as night already; while those two nigher
home, and those from Muckla Hill to Shranamuck, flared
broadly to the sky as ever.
That broad and rapidly-increasing band of blackness
indicated
past a doubt the approach of the Puritan invaders.
Desmond now hesitated not a moment, but was just rushing
down the stair to seek O'Brien, when he heard steps
ascending
and,
followed by his page, the earl stood before him.
What next, good cousin? cried O'Brien cheerfully.
The men are all gone forth, save a score of guardsmen. We
will have beef enough ere now to feed five hundred men a
twelvemonth.
We shall need it, replied Desmond gravely. I pray
you send the boy for Ulick; you have great confidence in
him?
Unlimited! Go seek him, Torlogh!
And lead him hither, but secretly; and, for your life! let
no man know where we hold council.
The boy bowed and left the room; and rapidly Desmond
shewed all that he had seen, all that he had deduced, all that
was now as clear as day. The earl too recognised the priest's
handkerchiefand it remained only to discover whither the
passage led, and what must be done to oppose the Puritans.
Ulick returned with the page; and merely telling him in
brief that the O'Neil was surely proved a traitor, and desiring
him, with Con's assistance, and such of the vassals as should be
needed, to cast him as quietly as might be into the dungeon
cell beneath the massy-more, the earl gave him his signet-ring,
dismissed the page, and turned once more to hold council with
his best adviser.
Two things were to be first determinedwhether to abide
the Puritans within the walls, or break forth and attempt to
join the ranks of Ormond.
Whether to attach the priest at once for treason, or to meet
his deep villany with a face of profound confidence.
And it was well nigh impossible to decide on either course,
so great and so nicely-balanced were the obstacles to all.
The impossibility of any long defence, and the general good
of the royal cause, calling, as it did, loudly for a concentration
of its partizans, plead loudly for an attempt to break forth and
join the duke in the north.
The number of ladies in the castle, the great age and
infirmity
of the countess, whom it were equally impossible to carry
with them or to abandon to the Puritans, seemed to make
flight impracticable, as surrender and resistance were already
hopeless.
Again, sound policy, and self-defence, and justice appeared
all alike to demand putting the priest at least in temporary
durance, until the present peril should be overpast. While on
the other hand, the difficulty of believing that, however he
might plot, and scheme, and struggle for ascendancy and
power
among his own people, a priest of the true church should
play the traitor, yielding up his own sheepfold to the wolf,
rendered
even those two clear-headed and unsuperstitious leaders
doubtful what it were best to do, in very truth and wisdom.
When policy, however, and expediency were considered, both
felt that it were to risk the very foundation of their own honor
and authority, even over the most devoted of the clan, to attempt
to lay the secular arm upon the revered person of the priest.
This point was, therefore, soon determinedto keep the
priest under strict surveillance, but to hazard no overt action
until he should so commit himself as to leave not a doubt of
his guilt.
While they were yet debating what should be done on the
greater and more momentous question, a bugle was so clearly
and so shrilly winded at the foot of the castle hill, before the
lower gate-house, that Desmond and O'Brien felt instantly
convinced that the crisis was at hand.
So still was the night, and so small the actual distance in a
direct line, although the traverses of the ascent made it both
long and tedious, that they could hear a brief parley from the
barbican, though the words they might not distinguish; and
then the creaking of the rising grate, and the clatter of the
falling
drawbridge, met their ears.
Without one word, with scarcely one glance interchanged,
they hurried down the winding stair, and reached the castle
court, just as Ulick returned, breathless, pale, and agitated, to
state that Hugh O'Neil could not be found anywhere within
the castle.
Interesting as at any other time such news would have been
to both the hearers, all thought of their own danger; all care
for the miserable traitor was merged in the absorbing,
thrilling
eagerness, with which they heard from without the walls
the cry:
Tidings from the host! A messenger from the duke!
The gates were thrown open at the word, and supported
on each side by three of the earl's men-at-arms, whose united
strength barely sufficed to keep the wretched jade from
falling
,
spur-galled, and foam-embossed, what had once been a
noble courser reeled into the court, bearing a man so spent
and exhausted that he could scarce keep his saddle.
His last breath had well-nigh been expended in that keen
bugle blast.
They lifted him from the saddle; and as they loosed their
hold upon the horse, it stumbled, rolled over, and expired
within a yard of the earl's feet; while the rider, almost
fainting
,
could not speak a word, though the fate of hundreds hung
upon his tongue, and gold, more than he ever saw or dreamed
of, would have recompensed his ready speech.
8
CHAPTER VIII.
There was a deep ravine that lay
Yet darkling in the Moslem's way;
Fit spot to make invaders rue
The many fallen before the few.
The torrents from the morning sky
Had filled the narrow chasm breast-high;
And on each side, aloft and wild,
Huge cliffs and toppling crags were piled,
The guards, with which young freedom lines
The pathways to her mountain shrines.
The Fire-Worshippers
.
Bring
him winebring him wine, exclaimed O'Brien;
see you not that he is so much exhausted that he cannot
speak! And you, the rest of you, fall back to your posts; the
morning must ere long be breaking. How wears the night
Torlogh?
It wants as yet two hours of day, my lord, replied the
page; but here is the wine.
A large goblet was poured out and handed to the messenger,
and he quaffed it as one to whose lips any liquid had been
long a strangerthen drew a long, deep breath, shook himself
till his iron brigantine rattled upon his back; and then said
these words only:
For your private ear, my lord of Thomond.
Come, Florence, said the earl; you shall pass for mine
ear this once. Lead the man to the little hall, Torlogh. And
you, Con and Ulick, make closer search for him you know of;
he
must
be within the walls of the castle.
And with the words he turned into the
corps de logis
of the
castle, and entering the little hall, which passed, in those rude
days, and that half-civilised realm, as a sort of library; for
there were a case or two of ponderous tomes against the wall,
and standish, with pens and parchment, on the board, and one
or two maps hanging upon the wainscoating, among coats of
curious antiquated armor, hunting-poles, bugle-horns,
cross-bows
and other implements of sylvan warfare hanging from
antlers of the deer and elk, and of that huge fossil stag, larger,
five-fold, than any living species of the cervine racewhich is
still found in the bogs of Ireland.
Here, flinging himself into a high-backed arm-chair, and
motioning
Colonel Desmond to another
Now then, my man, he said; you may speak freely. I
am Dermot O'Brien, Earl of Thomond; and this is Colonel
Florence Desmond, whom everybody knows, on either side,
for one of the king's truest servants, and best soldiers. What
says the Duke of Ormond?
His Grace was assailed in his quarters, the night before
the last, my lord, replied the man, after bowing lowly to the
great personages he addressed, by an unexpected sally of
the whole garrison, under the Roundhead Jones; and was so
hardly handled, in fact so much cut uplosing above three
thousand
men in killed and woundedthat he deemed it advisable
the rather that he heard the next of Cromwell's landing on
the coast with twelve thousand foot, and two thousand superb
horseto raise the siege of Dublin instantly, and to retreat
upon Tredagh; where, deeming himself now too weak to cope
with the enemy in the open field, he proposes to establish a
place d'armes
, and maintain himself until such time as he may
again gather head enough to take the initiative. Here are his
grace's cypher and sign-manual. He lacked the time to write,
beyond the words you will find there set down.
Those words wereTrust the bearer. He has my
confidence
,
and can give tidings of our movements.
Ormond
.
I know your face, it seems to me, good fellow, said
Desmond
.
Have we not met before?
And I knew yours, Colonel, from the first.
But your name? asked Desmond!
You saved my life at the taking of Breda!
Whatmy old friend, Shaun McMorris! But you are
sorely changed.
This rapier cut, my colonel, would change a fairer face
nor mine,And the poor fellow laid his finger into the cicatrix
of a deep scar that had destroyed the sight of one eye entirely,
cutting from the insertion of the eyebrow sheer down to the
jaw-bone.
Truetrue! said Florence. Dermot, you may trust this
man to the endI will avouch him.
It needs not; his credentials are all sure, said O'Brien,
who had been examining some private marks on the documents
he bore. Proceed, good fellowthese are ill-tidings, but we
looked for them. Proceedyet hold, you are aweary; sit, and
tell your tale at leisure.
Again the man bowed low, and taking a lower seat at a
respectful
distance, proceeded with his narrative of evil and
disaster
.
Well, noble sir, he said, he fell backas I told you
at once, and so speedily, that it was not until we reached
Ratoath
,
that he could halt so long as to frame his orders to his
friends and send off messengers. So it was then he sent me
to yourself, my lord, to pray that you'd join him with every
horse and man that you can make, as soon as may be. But if,
by the Lord's grace, you join him at all, it is by making a
great circuit only that you'll do it. It seems to me the whole
country's full of those Roundhead Ironsides, as they call them.
It's yestermorning they gave me chase, nigh Cloncarty, where
I crossed the Boyne, thinking that I should be far enough to
the west of them there; and by my faith, they never gave me
up till I got a fresh horse in Blessington, and so gave them the
slip. And twice since that they have beset me hardonce
nigh Rathdrum; but they were footmen only, and I got easily
away from them; and again, as I crossed Killahurler heights,
above Arklowfor there I fell into the midst of a whole army
of themcannons, and foot, and horse. Two horses I have
killed outright since I left there, beside the one that's dying in
the court-yard now, or dead; and that was given me at
Ballyfad
,
by your kinsman in the tower. But I'm here nowblessed
be the Lord!and you have the tidings better late than never.
But there's no time to lose; for if I judge aright, that army that
I saw is bound for this same place where we now sit, and will
be here ere many hours.
They are even now at Ballyfad, good friend, said
Desmond
.
So far, your tale needs no confirmation.
The man stared at him, something wildly, and then asked:
How can you know that, Colonel? They were not within
eight miles of it when I left them, and no man or horse can
have outstripped me.
We saw their coming all the way from Carysfort and
Killaburler
,
by the extinguishing of the hill lights. Ballyfad was
a-blaze an hour agone, and now it is all darkness. But why,
if the duke was assailed two nights agowere not the
beacons
kindled yesternight? Had that been done, we had ere
now been half-way hence to Tredagh, which, Heaven grant,
we may now ever see!
Forgotten, noble colonelclean forgotten in the confusion
of defeat, and te hurry of retreating.
Most lamentable and fatal forgetfulness! But look you
here, McMorris; we had this news of the duke's defeat, at high
noon yesterday, by a man and horseand a marvellous
ill-favored
horse too. How should that be?
He must have been the devil then, said the old soldier
bluntly, or a Roundhead, which is next akin to it; for he must
have come straight from the field, and through the very lines of
the enemy; and then, no one horse could have done it that ever
had his hoof shod with iron. Who was the man, Colonel?
I fancy, McMorris, replied Florence, with a grave smile,
that he is, as you say, a Roundhead, and somewhat akin to
the devil also.
Well, that is all your tidings, is it? said the earl. And
what are the duke's commands to yourself, McMorris?
To hold myself entirely at the orders of your lordship.
'Tis well! Go then now and rest and refresh yourself; we shall
have work enough for you ere long. Without thereTorlogh!
and then, as the page entered, See to this man, he added,
and then, let my cousins know I wish them here forthwith.
God of my fathers! Florence, what is to be done? he
added, as the boy left the room with the messenger. We
have sent four-fifths of the garrison abroad, and they will be
upon us ere they can return!
Go see your mother instantly, O'Brien; prevail upon her,
if you may, to leave the castle on the instant; we can convey
her by the horse-litter through the hills. Ellinor and the other
ladies must take horse. The servant girls, and all who are not
soldiers, can disperse into the country and hill villages in
safety. Then we will get to horse with all the men we may;
we can make thirty lances here. Ulick and Con must ride
forth, at all events, muster the men we have sent out, and lead
them through the passes of Slievh-Buy to Carnew and
Rathvilly
;
there let them tarry till we join them, or till they hear
that we are all cut off, as we must be. I rejoice, for my part,
that the men
are
gonefor they could not avail us aught, and
would but swell the numbers of the slain. When we rejoin
them, or when all is over, their course must be with all speed
to Tredagh. Do you approve my plan?
In all things, Florencein all things, save one. It is the
truethe only plan; yet it is naught.
And wherefore?
My mother will not leave the castle living. She swore it
when my father died. She has sworn it since an hundred times
in my hearing!
Then God have mercy on our souls!for the Puritans will
have none on our bodies!
But what then, Florencewhat is to be done, then?
Even the same. Let Ulick and Con lead the men away
to his Grace of Ormond. They cannot possibly rejoin usand
if they could, could not save us. They shall so do good
service
yet, and perchance win for the king, when we arewhere
who knoweth?
True; you are right as evertrue. I will go to my mother,
if aught may prevail with her. Give you the orders to our
cousins.
But as he spoke, the young men entered the room.
Time presses us, he said, very hard, cousins; so I will
pray you take your instructions from our good cousin Florence
here, and obey them as if they were mine own. But first,
have you found any traces of O'Neil?
None; though we have searched from the turret to the
donjonfrom the buttery to the hay-loft.
But one word more, before I leave you. You will have
to go forth, as the Colonel will direct, to join the foragets;
but first pass the word through all the men who remain, to shoot
O'Neil dead at the first encounter. He is a traitor and a spy,
past doubt. Fare you well, and God speed you!
He shook hands with them both, and a tear twinkled in his
eye, as he turned and left them. Though he said nothing, he
believed surely that his last hour was come, and that he should
never look upon those beloved faces any more.
No time was lost, and before O'Brien returned, Florence
Desmond had the satisfaction of seeing those two gallant
youths gallop down the hill beyond the outposts, accompanied
each by a single follower; and he thanked his Maker fervently,
as he followed them down the hill with his eye, in the bright
light of the new-risen morning, that they at least, were saved,
literally as brands snatched from the burning.
This was scarcely done, and all the armed men at their posts
at the outworks, with guns loaded and matches lighteda mere
warder's guard being retained in the castle, which could not be
attacked until these were carriedbefore O'Brien returned, pale,
downcast, and, as it seemed, despairingbut still resolute and
self-composed.
Desmond read at a glance all that had occurred.
Is she so resolute? he asked.
Even so resolute!
And you explained all to her?
All!
The service we might do to the king, if not cooped up
hereour duty to our country and our God calling us to
Tredagh
the
hopelessness of defencethe want of provision
the certainty of being putthe men to the sword, the women
to the last outrage?
All this, Florence Desmondmore than all this. I implored
herEllinor implored herfor Ellinor's sakeFlorence
Desmond
Brother
, he added, in a tone almost choked with
intense
agony
Brother
, you understand mefor Ellinor's sake
we implored her for once to yieldto be persuaded!
And she answered?
That they who were afraid might flee!but that she had
more faith in her God than she had fear of Cromwell. We
have but one duty now.
But one, answered Florence Desmond. The ancients
were wont to say`
Deus dementat prius quos vult perdere
.' The
madness is here of a certaintythe very madness of self-will
and proud stubbornness. May He grant that the ruin follow
not; for He alone can avert it!
Amen! answered O'Brion, fervently; and then the two
brave and high-spirited young men cast themselves into one
another's arms, and embraced each other brotherlyfor
brothers
they were, in soul, and had hoped to be brothers ere
long by a dearer, holier tie; and each felt a tear-drop trickle
down his face from the eye of his kinsman; yet neither was
ashamed for himself or for the other. For each knew that no
extremity of pain or selfish sorrow could have extracted that
sign of weaknessif it be weak to feelwhich was given
liberally, to a mutual sympathy, and to regret and fear for one
dearer and more boloved man happiness, or light, or life to
either. That moment was the last yielded to the affections.
Thenceforth their every thought was duty's.
And the first was to drive forth, in mercyfor it literally was
necessary to drive themevery unarmed man, every female,
from the castle, even to the lowest household servants. In the
cottage they were safe; in the castle, the law was then, as of
yore,
v victis
. And, had it not been for the indomitable pride
of that stern woman, she, too, and her fair niece, had been in
safety as in honor; and how much human sorrow, how much
human blood, how much human life, had been spared by hor
yielding?
Verily, pride hath much to answer for on earth, and this
among the others!
The sun rose broad and bright; and, for the first time
probably
since its battlements first looked down over the tributary
country, the castle of the O'Brien contained but two weak
women, without a servitor or handmaid, unless it were the boy
Torlogh, who was armed
cap-a-pie
, in light harness for his first
field, and thirty men-at-arms, of whom well-nigh two-thirds
were knights and gentlemen, O'Briens to a mansave Florence
Desmondand kinsmen of the earl, who moved among them
as cold but as firm as an iron statue.
And now everything had been done that military skill or human
foresight could suggest, to blunt the first attack of the Puritans,
and check them for one day at the outposts. Little more indeed
could they expect to do; for, with their diminished numbers, it
was evidently impossible to defend the ramparts of the castle,
when the esplanade should once be conquered, presenting, as
they did, an assailable front, above half-a-mile in length, to be
manned by a force of barely thirty mena number insufficient
not only to reload the guns, but even to discharge them all at
once.
It was resolved, therefore, not to attempt to reload at all, but
to fire by divisionseach division being previously pointed by
Florence Desmond's own hand, so as to bear upon the
successive
angles of the traverses which an attacking force must
pass in order to attack the gate.
This done, and a large mine, the gallery of which ran under
the rocky ditch, its chamber lying directly in front of the
drawbridge
,
being heavily charged with powder, to use as a last
resource; and the masonry of the three gate-houses on the
hill-side
having been mined and crammed with
saucissons
, as they
were then termed, or huge long bags of powderthe leaders
turned to ask of each other first. What more?and then,
Cui
bono?
And to either question, alas! the reply was but a
melancholy
shake of the head.
A few light horsemen were sent out to reconnoitre the
advance of the enemy, with orders to feel their way cautiously,
and to fall back at once, and at full speed, on recovering him.
A hasty meal was then partaken by all the defenders, silent
and sad, and in strange contrast to the fiery and enthusiastic
supper of the past evening; and then, as it was not yet eight
of the morning, and at the earliest the enemy's outposts could
not be on the ground before noon, all the garrison, with the
exception of some half-dozen sentries, to be relieved every
hour, were dismissed, with advice to get a few hours of that rest
which had been denied to them during the past nightand of
which they would stand so much in need, if they were to make
any adequate defence against the host which should be brought
against them.
Once againwas it for the last time?the chiefs were left
alone.
All is done now, O'Brien, said Florence,all that man
can do. I mean, to delay this ruin. Avert it none may but
He to whom all things are possible, and Hewith reverence
be it said!only by almost a miracle.
No, answered Dermot, quickly, all is not done! Two
thinge remain. First, that we find, and if possible, punish, this
traitor, and then that I show you a secret. Come!
Whither!
First, to find Hugh O'Neil. With him in the garrison,
all our defence may be made naught by the undoing of one
bar.
But howwhen the castle has been so searched?
By this time they had reached the private armory adjoining the
earl's own chamber, and there, arming himself completely in
a suit of the finest steel, and making his friend do likewise, he
placed a ponderous battle-axe of the thirteenth or fourteenth
century in his hand, and loaded four of the long horse-pistols of
the daytwo of which he placed in his own girdle, in addition
to the usual sword and dagger which it supported, and gave
the other two to Florence.
He then proceeded to load in the like manner, with the
utmost care, two musquetoons, which he placed in the hands
of the page, Torlogh; and nodding his head to his cousin,
Now go, he said, and force that door you wot of. Follow
the passage to the end, unless it break into two branches. If
it do, tarry at the fork, 'till I join you, or send Torlogh.
Florence nodded assent.And whither you?
To the priest's chamber. No man hath seen him since he
left the hall, at supper-time.
Can they have left the castle during the night together?
Impossible. I had the key myself of every port and
sallyport
,
except the gate of the main guard, and that was in the
hands of the seneschal. But we have little time. Away!
Follow me, Torlogh!
And through many an echoing passage, and many a
low-browed
door, he reached at length the grand staircase, climbed
it with clanking steps, and paused opposite the fine arch
leading to the apartments of the countess, before the entrance
of a suite of rooms, scarcely inferior to those in magnificence.
Here he knocked gently, then more loudly, then with all his
force. He called, he shouted to the priest, demanding entrance,
but in vain. At length, making the page set down one
musquetoon
,
cocked and prepared for action, leaning against the
wall, he bade him stand on guard with the other, and shoot
dead the first person who should show himself, unless it were
the father Dalyand to force even him to stand, at the peril of
his life.
Receiving the boy's assurance of implicit obedience, and
trusting even more to the enthusiastic tones of his voice, and
he clear light of his eye, than to mere words, he seized his
battle-axe, and demanding, for the last time, admittance,
announcing his purpose of forcing his way in, if refused, he
reared the ponderous weapon with both hands, whirled it
round his head, and dealt such a blow on the very spot where
the bolt of the massive lock shot into the staple, that it flew
wide open on the instant.
Almost he expected to see the tall form of the priest,
standing erect within the threshold, with arms uplifted, in the
act of launching the awful anathema.
But the long sunbeams, full of dusty moats, which streamed
in through all the lofty mullioned windows, fell on no living
thing. The noble room was vacant and untenanted. A
second chamber lay beyond; secured by a like door similarly
locked; and there the same scene was enacted, and with a
like result. It was the bed-chamber of Father Ignatius; but
the bed showed no signs of having been slept in the past night.
The last room of the suite was the priest's private library and
oratory, into which, since he had dwelt in the castle, no foot
save his own had ever entered.
There was something of solemnity, of mystery, almost of
sanctity, in the ideal atmosphere of this secret study, which
made the earl pause and hesitate, ere he should compel
admittance
.
But he thought of all that was at stake, and he was
firm.
He pleaded, however, and argued, and entreated earnestly,
if the father were within, that he would admit him to speak of
matters of the utmost import, and not compel him to a deed
which his heart abhorred. But no answer came. And so
absolute was the silence within, that the earl was now satisfied
that the priest had indeed fled by some secret mode of egress,
which he knew not, from the castle, in company with the
traitor, Hugh O'Neil.
Then the hereditary quick blood of his race boiled in every
vein, and flushed crimson to his face, as he exclaimed: Ha!
false priest!and dealt the blow with such force and fury,
that the strong door was dashed into shivers.
And there, at his desk, in his soft armed-chair, undisturbed
by all the din, unmoved by all the splinters of the shattered
wood which fell around him, some even on the parchment,
whereon he was then engaged in writing, sat Ignatius Daly.
He raised his head calmly, as O'Brien entered, facing the
intruder, with an aspect of perfect benignity, and only asked:
Wherefore `false priest,' my son?
O'Brien almost started, so much did the priest's coolness
stagger him at the first; but he was not a man to be deceived
by such glaring stage effect, and the next moment he almost
smiled at his own credulity.
Pardon me the rude epithet, Father, he said, I fancied,
from your silence, that you had fled the castle!
Fled the castle!and what if I had? Was I not dismissed
hence last night! Fled the castle! and to what mortal
suzerain
am I vassal, he added proudly, that I should not, when
and whither I list, go unbidden?
We will not enter into these discussions now, Father
Ignatius
,
sinceas you well know, they amount to nothing; and if
they did, this is nor place nor time for them. Nor will I
tell you, seeing you know it full as well, if not better, than I do,
that within three hours we shall be besieged by an
overwhelming
force of Puritansand within six hours, or twelve at
farthest
as
we have neither men nor means to resiststormed
by them. But I will ask you, first, seeing that the Roundheads,
when victorious by storm, not only give no quarter to men
with weapons in their hands, but none to
priests
, to children,
or to women, whether you will go forth yourself, as you still
may, in safety, and persuade my mother, the countess, as you
doubtless can, to go forth likewisewhen we may all break
ont together, and join the duke in Tredagh, where, doubtless,
we may serve our king and country better than by dying here
cooped up within four walls like condemned captives?
He spoke eagerly and rapidlyand though not rudely, with
scant reverence; and then paused for answer.
This, my son, is the first question; give us your
secondly
,
said she priest, sneeringly, if not scornfully., We will answer
you both together.
My second is thiswhere is Hugh O'Neil?
The priest laughed aloud. In all the years O'Brien had
known him, never had he heard that sound from his lips, seen
that expression on his face; and as the one was harsh, and
dissonant
,
and fiendish, so was the other hideous and unnatural
beyond description.
You do me too much credit. I am but a man, my son, and
you give to me the attributes of a god. I have been shut up
here since nine of the clock last evening, and you tell me that
I know of the coming of the Puritans. How should I know
it? Hugh O Neil, since the same hour, has been under your
own watch and ward. Did you make me his keeper, that you
should ask me of his whereabouts?
No!nor his visitor, replied the earl sternly. Yet you
did visit him last night by the secret passage which leads
hence to the turret chamber.
Is there such a passage, my son? I never heard of any
such.
Nor Inor perhaps
you
, most reverend, answered
O'Brien, detecting at once the quibble; but you
know
of it,
for you passed through it last night, and left your vestment to
bear witness of your passage.
And he threw the handkerchief scornfully on the parchment
before his face.
But a truce to all this! he added. Will you tell me
where Hugh O'Neil is? Will you persuade the countess to
go forth?will you go forth yourself, before this ruin fall
upon us?
My son, I will do none of these three things, replied the
priest, with a quiet smile.
My father, you shall do the last of these three things, and
that straightway. Without there, Torlogh!
My lord, said the boy entering, proud of his full armor,
and his loaded musquetoon.
Go summon hither Murtough, my foster-brother, and the
deaf soldier, Shamus. Carry my ring to the seneschal, and
bid him draw off all the men from the gates to the eastern
rampart, leaving the sallyports unbarred, and the keys in the
wicket locks. Hurrylife is upon your speed! Now, holy
sir, he added, I know not, and I care not very much, if I
offend the church in this or no. I have a holy duty to
perform
,
as well as thou hast, to preserve my own life so long as
God has need of it, and the lives of those good and tender
ones whom he has given in my charge. Now I believe I
cannot
do these things while thou and O'Neil are at large within
these walls. In time of siege the captain of the keep
must
be
the master, and I
will
be! Therefore thou must go forth! I
might say, if I would imitate thy duplicity, I do this thing for
thy good, and for the saving of thy precious life, lest, falling into
the hands of the Philistines, they slay thee for a priest of Baal.
I say not so. But thus: I send thee forth because I distrust
thee altogether, and hold thee both enemy and traitor. Here
come my men. The one cannot hear, the other will not heed,
anathema or excommunication. Now then, sir priest, will you
be thrust out perforce, or will you go forth willingly? If the
latter, you are in lay vestments even nowyou have arms, I
see, beside you, and you know well how to use them. Here is
gold; a horse awaits you in the court-yard. How will you
go? Decide!
If I must be compelled into the choicewillingly. But oh,
my son, my beloved son, reflect!
I have reflected. Put on your hat and cloak, most
reverend
,
and buckle on the weapons of the flesh; and fare you well
fill better times come upon us. Here, Murtough, conduct the
father to the court, you and deaf Shamus. Mount him upon
Bay Barbary: he is the gentlest of the chargers in the court;
see him beyond the outer gate-house in all honor. Fare you
well; father. Favor me by proceeding with the soldier.
My blessings on your head, my son, and on all those within
the castle!
O'Brien bowed low, but replied not, but whispered to his
foster-brother: Let him have speech with no man. Get him
forth as quickly as may be. I suspect him very grievously of
treason. Away with himyou understand me!
And obey you!
When he is forth, replace the guards, bring me the keys
hither, one and all; be resolute and speedyI await you!
Torlogh, mount guard as before; suffer none to pass you!
The men departed, leading, or rather oscorting, the priest
forth, as it would seem, in all honor; and as all the Catholic
soldiers of the lower order, on whose superstitious fears he
might have worked to the extent of inducing them to resist
their lord's commands, had been withdrawn from the gates, his
ejection was effected peaceably and speedily; and Murtough
saw him ford the stream, and ride away to the right, into the
deepast passes of the hills, before he left the gate-house. No
fear of his tarrying in the neighborhood of the fierce Puritans,
to whom, what gave him sanctity in the eyes of others would
but have marked him out, the more especially a victim to be
hunted down and slain without law or mercy.
Once gone, the soldiery were called back to their posts; and,
thanks to the version which Murtough gave of the scene which
had passed, and which the deaf man could not contradict, the
piety and foresight of the O'Brien in removing the holy man
from the peril of capture by his enemies, gave him yet another
claim on the affections of his people.
Had they but known the truth, as it stood, one-half of them
would have thrown down their arms indignant, and refused to
fight in behalf of a lord so wicked as to have preserved their
lives by such an act of profanation. Alas! unhappy land of
Erin!so brave, so generous, so sympathetic to the tear of
sorrowto the flush of noble indignation!but seemingly for
ever doomed, in all ages, barbarous or civilised, then as now,
to perpetual dissension, everlasting agitation, everlasting
sorrow
!
And all for one sole faultthe same in all times and all
countriesthat thy enthusiastic sons still yield their ears, their
souls to the deceitful, maddening teachings of those who are
too often, in the Latin poet's words, in truth
prva
jubentium!
Meanwhile, to still the tumult of his breast, to cheat the
moments
of terrible suspense, in each of which he almost
expected
to hear the shout of meeting from the court or the ramparts,
Dermot O'Brien applied himself carefully to examine the
walls of the priest's apartment, in order to discover the exit of
the secret passage, the entrance of which he had found above;
but all his researches were in vain, and he had already given
up the task in despair, and thrown himself into the chair from
which the Father Ignatius had so lately arisen, with his face
buried in his hands, and his whole soul given up to the
darkest
and most melancholy musingswhen the clang of armed
footsteps on the stairs, and the page's challenge without, roused
him from his lethargy. Starting to his feet, and with a great
effort banishing all signs of discomposure from his features
Ha! he exclaimed, as his devoted foster-brother returned,
bearing the heavy keys in his gauntletted hand, is it all
done?Is he forth?
He is forthGod speed him!
The young man's breast was lighter than it had been for
hours. With the soldier's craft and villany he felt that he
might struggle and succeed. But with the cold, apathetic,
insolent, imperious falsehood, the tergiversating tact, the
insinuating
supple wiliness of the priest, he knew it vain to
contend
.
9
Telling his faithful friend rather than follower all that
he knew and suspected of O'Neil's concealment, he posted
him in the priest's oratory, with a horse-pistol in each hand,
and strict orders to shoot the traitor dead the instant he should
issue from his hiding-place; and, reiterating his commands to
Torlogh, he hurried away to the turret, where he found
Florence
on the watch as he expected, at the very entrance of the
passage, at the mouth of which there was a double bifurcation
of four several mouths. Three of these were in a few
moments
ascertained to be mere blind turns, made in order to
deceive a pursuer, and gain a few yards start for a fugitive
in time of imminent peril. The fourth was a secret staircase,
passing round and round the outer circumference of the tower,
cut in the thickness of the tower, wall, and corresponding
exactly to the windings of the stair which occupied its centre.
At about half the height of the tower, however, at the point
where that sprang upward from the
corps de logis
, it struck
off horizontally, and passed through three chambers curiously
arranged among the rafters of the roofall which were,
however
,
vacant, nor gave any sign of having been tenanted for
years. From these another stair descended rapidly, as they
had anticipated, into the priest's chamber, which it entered, as
they easily discovered, from within, through the deep
fire-place
,
one of the jambs of which was moveable.
So far their suspicions were confirmed; but their main
object
of arresting the traitor O'Neil, whom they confidently
expected
to find lurking there, was disappointed. And, it being
manifestly useless to hunt and search out all the corners of so
vast an edifice, provided, probably, with a thousand
lurking-places
unknown to the lord of the castle, like that just
discovered
,
though perhaps only too well known to his enemies, they
gave up all hopes of detecting him, and contenting themselves
with issuing strict mandates for his summary execution to all
the soldiery, O'Brien proceeded to reveal to Florence and his
foster-brother his last secret, by which alone he hoped to
preserve
,
in extremity, the life, the honor, of his Ellinor.
After making the circuit of the walls, and satisfying
themselves
that as yet no symptom of the enemy's approach was to
be seen, and that none of the scouts were as yet in sight on
their return, the three once more descended into the great
court, and thence passing into the stable-yard, entered the
stables themselves, tenanted by at least a hundred of the finest
animals, of the choicest breeds then known and procurable,
among which were four or five magnificent Arabians, two
blacks of the tall breed of Dongola, and a beautiful flea-bitten
grey Arab, which was set apart entirely to the use of Ellinor
Desmond, than whom there was no better or more accomplished
horsewoman within the circuit of the four seas that girdle
Britain
.
The poor animals, which had been somewhat neglected since
the preceding evening, during the alarms of the morning,
whinnied and stamped with pleasure, at hearing the steps of
O'Brien and his friends. Nor was their confidence in man,
this time at least, permitted to pass unrewarded. Policy as
well as humanity required that animals, whose strength might
ere long be taxed to the uttermost, should be preserved in the
fittest state for action. But, had it not been so, the natural love
of Dermot for the horse, and his kindliness of heart, would not
have suffered him to allow them to want.
A very short time sufficed those three able and energetie
men to water all the horses, and to supply their racks and
mangers with such a store of provender and forage as would
last them for three or four days, even should it be impossible
to bestow much time upon them sooner.
This done, O'Brien unlocked an iron door at the farther end
of the stable, which led into a great dark vault, known as the
ordnance vault, and filled with old-fashioned pieces of artillery,
long since thrown aside as antiquated and unserviceable,
broken carriages, honey-combed mortars, and such like ancient
paraphernalia of warfare as were now entirely out of place in
the light of day. Many of the castle servants and sub-officers
had been in that vault from time to time, with the castellan;
all knew exactly what it contained; and, as there was no
mystery
about it, and no interest or utility in its contents, no one
thought anything about it, or cared to examine it farther. And
yet it contained a secret of the deepest import.
In the farthest angle of the vault, which was entirely
unlighted
from without, and which could only be visited by aid
of a lanthorn or flambeau, was a considerable space
unencumbered
by any heavy articles, and covered only by a pile of loose
straw and litter, upon which two or three light gun-carriages
had been stowed.
On removing these, and sweeping away the litter with a
stable broom, there appeared a large wooden platform,
strengthened by bars and heavy studs of iron, not at all unlike
the platform of a modern hay-scale. O'Brien, however, knelt
down beside, and, after a moment or two spent in searching,
with the aid of the lanthorn he had brought, pushed aside the
end of one of the iron bars, which disclosed a small keyhole,
to which he applied one of a large bunch of keys that he had
brought with him for the purpose. The wards were somewhat
rusted, but a little of the heated oil from the lamp being poured
into the lock, it yielded after a little solicitation; and with far
less difficulty than could have been expected, the platform
which was in truth a vast trap-doorwas raised by the force
of a single man inserting a common pitchfork between the
door and the framing.
It rose so rapidly indeed, when it was once set in motion,
that it was evident at once, even to the rude and
semi-educated
Murtough, as he gazed with wide eyes of wonder into
the dark abyss, that it must be actuated by some unseen
counterpoise
,
as was in fact the case.
As it arose, nothing was visible but a steep stone descent,
paved, like the rest of the vault above, with irregular
cobblestones
,
sloping gradually down into utter darkness, and
disappearing
under a grim stone arch, beyond which it turned
abruptly
to the left, and was lost to their eyes.
Both of you must explore this with me to the end, said
Dermot. But first do you step back, Florence, and bring us
two or three flambeaux; they are in the rack just within the
stable-door. Then lock the door of the ordnance vault within,
that we may not be surprised.
This was soon done; and the torches being lighted, they
passed into the arched passage, lowering the door above their
heads as easily as they had raised it. The passage, although
steep, was of a slope so regular that it could be traversed easily
by horses, and so lofty that a tall man on a war-horse could
have ridden under the vault without stooping his head or
breaking
a feather of his plume. It was dry, too, although very cold,
and the air was so pure that it was evidently ventilated by some
means of communication with the upper sky.
Twice it was interrupted by huge iron gates, which yielded
readily to some one of the keys with which the earl was
provided
;
and, after passing the second of these, it expanded into
a sort of circular hall, not now of masonry, but of natural
cavern, aided a little by the chisel and the pick, provided with
stone mangers and iron rings for fastening horses, and having
in the middle a rude draw-well and chain. The egress from
this hall was through a third gate, heavier than any of the others,
opening at the extremity of a deep-rifted mossy cave, the floor
of which was covered by the waters of the black, wild-looking
stream which roared and chafed before its entrance. Right
opposite, the farther bank of ravine rose abrupt and
precipitous
;
and, as the stream filled the gorge from bank to bank,
leaving
no space on either side for intruding footsteps, there was
no risk whatever of the cavern's being visited; and even if it
had, so dark was the recess in which the iron door was
concealed
,
that it would have defied anything short of the
deliberate
search of persons acquainted with the existence of such a
passage, and resolute to ascertain its whereabout.
This is the Wolf's Glen, as they call it, said Dermot,
pointing to the gorge to the landward of the castle; that wall
of rock is the first step of the great ridge of Slievh-Bay. A
bowshot up the river to the right, a deep ravine comes down to
it through which there runs a difficult horse-path by which to
gain the middle mountain road. You know which I mean,
Murtough.
The man nodded his head silently, in token of assent.
An hour's hard riding will bring one to the cross-roads by
the old chestnut tree with the three bodies growing into one. An
hour's more, or two at the utmost, and you shall be at Carnew,
where, before the sun sets to-night, Ulick and Con will be in
waiting, with sixty or a hundred lances. Do you mark me?
Again Murtough O'Brien nodded his assent, but that with a
half-sullen face, as who should sayI mark, but I like it not.
And you, Florence Desmond?
Thoroughly.
Let us return.
And they did so, with all speed, locking the outer door
behind
them.
Now, Murtough, said O'Brien, I do not request you, for
I know that you would refuse me, but I commandand I know
that you will obey methat you strike no blow in this strife
today
.
In the first place, you will take these keys, and lead
down to this under-ground stable herethey were standing
in it as he spokethe three black barbs of Dongola, and the
lady Ellinor's grey Arab, fully equipped and harnessed; the
three for men-at-arms, the one for the lady. Leave them with
food and provender for the day, and renew it daily. Lock all
the doors behind you as you come and go, and beware no man
sees you. Have thirty destriers saddled and bridled always,
day and night, at the stables. That done, I make you warder
of the countess and lady Ellinor: stir not from their side a
moment
,
save when you go to feed the horses, and then let the
boy Torlogh watch beside them, with his weapons cocked
and loaded; remember the villain O'Neil is at large, and who
shall guard them when we are on the ramparts? Will you
do this?
By all my hopes of Heaven, I will; though rather
tenfold
,
nay, ten hundred fold would I
Die by my side, doubtless, said O'Brien, hastily; but any
one can die. It is harder oftentimes to live; and by living
thou canst serve me; by dying, thou wonldst lose me my
last hope.
I will live or die, how and when thou commandest,
Dermot.
Never before had he presumed to call his foster-brother
by that familiar name, but when the feelings of the heart are
stirred to the utmost, all forms are forgotten. The O'Brien
felt, and hailed the emotion, and grasped the faithful being's
hand with sincere sympathy.
I knew thou wouldst, my Murtough; and therefore have I
laid this heavy trust on thee; too heavy to be laid on any less
true and trusty, less near of blood to the O'Brien.
The man's eyes glistened with delight, as he replied in tones
that were actually husky with emotion: May Heaven forget
me, if I forget your bidding, Dermot!
It is well; here be the keys, one and all. One word more.
By this pass, if it be possible, will we all escape, after we have
given these rogue Roundheads such a salvo as shall turn their
red noses pale, he said, affecting a recklessness of humor
which he was far from feeling. But if it come to the worst,
Murtough, and the walls be scaled, or the gate forced, or if thou
hearest the great mine explodewhether I be alive or dead, far
or neartake the page Torlogh, and carry off the Lady Ellinor,
by force, if needs must be, down this vault, locking every door
from first to last behind you, and ride for your lives and her
honor to Carnew.
Leaving you, leaving you, my lord, my master, and my
brother, to die unaided? Never, never!
Not so, true friend, not so. For if I be not with you to
escape with my bride, I shall be, ere then, dead in the breach
or the gateway. Murtough O'Brien, you have promised; I never
knew you break a promise. Murtough O'Brien, your
foster-brother
calls on you for aid in his worst extremity. I think you
will not fail him.
I will not, said the man doggedly. But when I have
done it, I will die!by all the saints in Heaven!
You will think better of it, Murtough. Good friend, you
will think better of it. But you have made my heart very
lightvery light, my best Murtough.
And mine, God bless you for it! added Florence
Deamond
,
in his fine deep voice, a big tear standing in his eye as
he spoke. The bitterness of death hath passed away.
And as he uttered the words, they passed from the
ordnance-vault
into the stables; and as they did so, they heard
hurried
steps, and loud voices, hastening that way, and calling for
the earlthe O'Brien.
We are in time, and no more, said he, Murtough!
remember
!and
he laid his finger on his lips hastily. Then, as
one or two of the men rushed in, eagerly seeking for himI
come, he said, I come. Look to those chargers, as I bade
you, Murtough; they must not starve, an if we are besieged.
Now, men, what is it?
Tidings of the foe, my lord, cried one.
The countess, my lord!the countess!
Great God!what of my mother?
She is dying!the Lady Ellinor
Go, go! O'Brien, exclaimed Desmond, rushing out of the
stahles. I will see to the tidings and the outposts. Fear
nothing
;
I can make them good these three hours.
They are at hand, my lord! they are close at hand. Even
now you may hear their trumpets!
And he spoke truth, for the instant they stood in the clear
court-yard the flourish of the trumpets and the clang of the
kettle-drums of the Ironsides were heard distinctly, and the
next moment the sharp and sudden roar of a culverin from the
lower gate-house showed that they were even now within shot
of ordnance.
Such was the scene in the midst of which the son was
summoned
to the death-bed of his mother; and, ere he stood beside
her, the mighty ramparts, and the solid rock itself on which
they stood, seemed to reel to the repeated crash, reverberated
by a thousand echoes of the iron artillery.
CHAPTER IX.
THE FLIGHT.
Oh, God! It is a fearful thing
To see the human soul take wing,
In any shape, in any mood;
I've seen it rushing forth in blood
I've seen it on the breaking ocean,
Strive with a swoln convulsive motion;
I've seen it on the ghastly bed
Of sindellrious with its dread;
But these were horrorsthis was woe,
Unmixed with such.
Prisoner of Chillon
.
It
was a strange and awful picture. The beautiful light of
a cahn summer morning fell in gleams of gold and purple,
of emerald and crimson glory, through the stained windows of
the castle chapel; and there, before the rails of the high altar,
at which she had been kneeling, when the shaft of the unseen
destroyer found her, lay the majestic form of the old countess,
still in the agonies of death, proud and majestic, with her head
propped on the knees of her lovely niece, who, pale as the
stone statnes of the holy saints around her, yet resolute in that
extremity of terror, ministered to the last wants of her dying
kinswoman, alone upheld by her own nobility of purpose.
One of the sacred chalices stood beside themthe readiest,
the only ready vessel
in extremis
, filled with wine brought in
haste; and just below the altar steps stood the boy Torlogh,
white as ashes, clad in complete steel, with a musquetoon on
either arm, each with its slow match burning. He dared not,
even in that dread juncture, disobey his lord, or leave them
unprotected.
And upon this appalling group looked down, from the almost
living canvass of the altar-piece, the calm, benignant face of
the painted Saviour; calm and benignant, and fraught with
love ineffable and unbounded mercy, even amidst the agonies
of that dread, slavish death upon the cross. And on that
wondrous
form, and on those almost speaking lineaments, dwelt the
fast-glazing eyes of the dying woman, drawing deep draughts of
comfort from the sight, and hope beyond the grave, confident of
immortality. And, all the while, the roar of the incessant
ordnance
,
now mingled with the thick rattle of the volleying
harquebuss
,
the clang of steel, and the shouts and shrieks of
combatants
at hand-to-hand encounter, pealed upward to the pure
and holy skies, as if the earth which He hath termed His
foot-stool
had been converted into a battle-ground for fiends.
A quick step clanged upon the chancel pavement. The
dying
woman's eyes turned to the sound:
My son!my son!
Mother!
my
mother! and he kneeled beside her, and
grasped her stiffening cold fingers, and his tears fell like fiery
rain upon her brow. A life-time rushed upon his mind, in that
most awful moment, and all things else were forgotten, as if
they had never been.
Weep not for me, my sonweep not for me. Happy am
I to die the mistress of my own unconquered castle; thrice
happy if I die
in time!
Tell me, oh, tell me, that my madness,
my proud, selfish, wicked madness, has not ruined you. Tell
me quick, for my spirit tarries only to hear thatwithout
hearing
which, I cannot pass in peacetell me, my son, that you
can yet escapethat you can save this angel from those
howling
fiends without!
She spoke with strange rapidity, and with a mighty effort,
as if she spoke at all only by a prodigious effort of the will,
and feared that her strength would fail her ere she finished.
Mother! There
is
time, and
you
Shall die happy. EllinorEllinor, your hand,and she
placed it with her dying fingers in his hand. Bless you, my
children; now you are
his
Ellinorhis
wife!
Now you are
bound to obey him, whatever he commands you! Promise
me, my child!
I promise you, my mother.
Raise meraise me, my children. I would fain die
standing
!
And they raised her erect to her feet; and she stood feebly
for an instant, gazing on the image of her Saviour, with her
poor arms outstretched toward it, as she would fly.
Kiss mekiss me, children. I am goinggoing to your
father. I will tellhimhow goodyou have beenkiss
me!
Her words came at intervals; her breath was drawn
laboriously
;
she seemed scarce conscious that they kissed her.
Then came a roar, a thousand times louder than the loudest
crash of artillerya short, breathless pause, and the rumbling
din of falling masonryanother pause, and a shriek as of
hundreds
in their agony.
She heard, but understood it not. A light came into her
eyes, and a flush on her pale cheek. She stood perfectly erect,
and her lips moved; but those two only who supported her,
her children, could mark the words they syllabled:
In time!the Lord be praised!in time!
Domine nunc
dimiitis
Her head drooped upon the shoulder of her sonshe was
dead!
Reverently he lowered her to the ground, closed those dear
eyes, and pressed a long last kiss on the white, clay-cold lips
to which he had so often clung in happy childhoodcomposed
her limbs decently, covered them with her long robe; and then,
lifting her in his strong arms over the railings of the altar,
laid her on her back at its base, with her hands folded on her
bosom, as if in the act of prayer.
There even they will not dare to harm her!
What mean you, Dermot? You will not leave her soit
were sacrilege to do so!
Not to do so were sacrilege? Heard you not her last
words? Obey!you must obey now, Ellinorhowever hard
the task! We have no time for words. Now, Murtough, he
continued, as his foster-brother entered the chapel in haste,
What meant that great explosion? For your life! Torlogh,
fetch me a lady's riding-hat and mantle of the warmestfor
your lifefly! Now, Murtough?
They burst the two lower gate-houses with petards, in a
moment. They fight more like fiends than men; and
one-third
of our best are down, they tell me! So Colonel
Desmond
drew off all the rest into the castle, but not until he had
lit a three-minute match in the
saucissons
of the third
gate-house
.
It blew up, I promise you, when there were more
than two or three hundred in and around it, so that it killed
above fifty, and maimed thrice as many. They have fallen
back to the ravine's edge, and the colonel is plying them now
with single guns, as you may hear, as fast as he can work them.
But, oh, God! my lordis that the countess?
It
was
the countess! But we must now look to the living;
we can yet bring off all who are left alive. Now, dearest, do
these garments quickly on, and securely. Wilt have to ride
for life, sweet one! Go! I will join you in an instant. Go
now with Murtoughhe will lead you. Follow them, Torlogh.
I go but to bring off the men.
She pausedlooked at him wistfullyhesitatedlooked at
the dead, and obeyed, saying only:
You
will
join me, Dermot? You would not deceive me
at such a moment!
Neither at such a moment nor at any. I go but to bring
off Florence. Go with Murtough, beloved, and do,
unquestioning
,
whatever he advises. You will have to mount Bonnibelle
at once; but not to ride till I come to you. Let Torlogh lead
a horse down with her for himself. The three blacks are for
me, Colonel Desmond, and yourself, Murtough. Keep you the
door in hand, while they at once go forward. The men will
mount in the stables, as fast as they come in, but not descend
till we come; you comprehend, Ellinor, best-beloved!and
for the first time, he clasped her to his heart, his own. Adieu!
for a little while; but for a little while adieu!
She gazed at him fondly; at the dead bitterlybut turned
and obeyed his bidding like a little child, and went her way,
confiding in his wisdom and the tried faith of the fosterer.
And he, her betrothed, the conquered castellan, the orphan
son, he kneeled one moment by the deadhe kissed once
more the ashy lips:
Forgive me, oh, my mother!forgive me, that I obey even
thy bidding! And springing to his feet, he rushed out of the
chapel, without daring to look back; and, crossing the empty
court-yard at full speed, rushed up the steps to the esplanade
of the ramparts, above the barbican and guard-house of the
castle.
There, Florence Desmond, with the sole relics of the
garrison
,
seventeen men, four of whom were wounded, was firing
single guns, with such celerity as to conceal the smallness of
their numbers, at the Puritanswho, in a mass, dispirited at
the severe check they had met with, were crowded together
on the near bank of the ravine, and seemed more than half
inclined to fall back on their main body on the farther side.
Florence saw by his friend's face, at once, that all was over,
and asked no needless questions. He saw that his noble
kinsman
was himself, in the full possession of all his noble powers;
and with a glance which said to him: I know allI need no
explanation, he added quietly:
We have suffered terribly, my lord. But we have checked
them for the moment. I think two salvos of six pieces each
would send them back across the water quicker than they
came. That gun a little lower, Shamus Beg! They have
left nearly two hundred men behind them!
Let us give them two salvos, then; but let them be of
eight guns each. Stand to your guns, my men! But hark
youas fast as you discharge your gunseight men each salvo,
break off, and make your way with all speed to the stables.
There are horses ready; choose you each man a horse. You
will find Murtough in the ordnance-vault; await us, and obey
his orders! Now to your guns! First salvo, fire, and away!
The heavy cannon roared; and, for an instant, the platform
was involved in a cloud of white smokeso dense that not a
man could see his neighbor's facedriven back by the light air
from the muzzles of the ordnance.
It cleared away; and the eight cannoneers, so promptly had
they obeyed orders, were out of sight already; while the enemy,
staggered by the heavy volley, were reeling to and fro, in
terrible
disorder, the officers vainly endeavoring to prevent the men
from recrossing the ravine, on the farther bank of which
reinforcements
,
with artillery, were seen coming up.
Let us elevate half-a-dozen guns, Florence, for those
fellows
on the farther bank, while these lads give their salve.
It was done, even while the words were speaking; and again,
at the signal, Fire, and away! the second point-blank
volley
parted; and even before the smoke-wreaths lifted, so that
they could again see the enemy, the din and tumult told them
that they were in full flight.
It lifted. Dermot and Florence were alone, except one
wounded artillerist; and the enemy were jammed in the gorge,
horse and foot, wounded and sound, living and dead, in
horrible
confusion.
Give them your gun, my lad, and away after your fellows!
They were alonethe lastvictoriousyet compelled to
fly, as if defeated. It was bitterbitter!
All is over, Florence. She is with her Maker!
Amen! replied the veteran, crossing himself devoutly.
May we so live, so die, as to join her!
Give those fellows a gun, Desmond; they are rallying!
The piece flashed and roared, and he continued:
Ellinor is in the vault, mounted ere now, with Torlogh.
Murtough O'Brien holds the door in hand. The men are ready
in the stables. Go now, good Florence; take the command. Pass
the men, one by one, down to the outer gatenot through it.
Mount you, and abide with Ellinor. Let Murtough keep the
trap for me. I will give these dogs six or eight shots in quick
succession, that they may not suspect we are retreating. At
the worst, we must have an hour's fair start. If it were not for
the traitor Hugh, who will at once admit them, we might have
six. Go, Florencego!
And you will follow me? You are not so mad to tarry,
and break all our hearts, for a vain point of honor?
Indeed, no. I promised
her
promised the deadthat I
would go. A promise to the dead is very sacred. Go, now,
Florence.
And he went. And shot after shot, in quick succession, the
last lord of the Red Castle, its last defender, and the last man on
its walls, hurled his defiance and his hate at the Puritan, the
Sassenach, invaders.
He paused to let the smoke clear off ere he should give
them the last parting blow.
To his astonishment, despite of his quick fire, they had
rallied
,
and were re-crossing the ravine. As the dropping fire of
the castle ceased, they gave a loud, triumphant shout, and
charged up the hill.
He gave his parting shot, and saw the leading files go down,
like a single manthen looked around him, amazed, for an
explanation of the mystery.
It was soon found! Upon the summit of the donjon-keep,
stood Hugh O'Neilwhere he had been concealed hitherto,
none ever knew save hewaving his helmet in the air; for
he, too, was armed
cap-a-pie;
and the proud banner of the
O'Briens was already lowered, for the first time, over a living
lord, before his foes.
But the time was not now for vengeance. Yet, as he
hurried
after his comrades, forgetful that the traitor stood three
hundred feet, at least, above him, he discharged a pistol at him,
of course harmlessly, in the first burst of indignation.
A moment brought him to the stables, and the
ordnance-vaults
,
just as the last man of the seventeen was filing into the
dark cavern; a loud cheery shout from Murtough hailed the
chieftain's coming, and, repeated from man to man, as they
filed down that gloomy passage, announced to the sad and
anxious heart below that he for whom alone it beat was safe
was close at hand.
The stable postern was safe locked behind them. The trap
was lowered, and made fastgate after gate was secured against
the pursuers. One fond, short, rapturous embrace, and
Dermot
sprang to the saddle of his unrivalled barb, and sate, almost
himself again, amid the three beings he now loved the best of
all that breathed upon the round earth's surfacehis promised
bride, her noble brother, his own gallant foster-brother. Had
she who now lay cold above on the bare altar-stones still sate
beside himnay, had she but been laid to rest beneath those
very stones, in honor and in peace, though landless lord, and
houseless castellanhe had, even so, been happy.
But leisure was not given for such thoughtshappily,
mercifully
,
was not given.
Oh! it is well for those, though at the time they believe it
not, who, in the anguishthe first crushing anguishof some
mortal sorrow, are forced by the necessities of the living to
divert their minds from the deadcompelled by the pressure of
the present to look away from the tortures of the past. Oh!
it is well for them!and harder far for those whose seemingly
more prosperous state permits them to indulge in sorrow.
Indulge
in sorrow! Who first invented that false phrase never
had knownnever
could
knowsorrow! Indulge in agony
revel in the pangs of deaththen talk of indulgence in
sorrow
!
Great was the contrast between the cold and death-like
gloom of the deep cavern from which they emerged, and the
bright, warm sunshine without; but greater was the contrast
between the hope which dawned upon their hearts, renewed
10
by the fresh air and free sunshine, and the dark gloom of
despair
which had so weighed them down during the last anxious
hours.
So deep was the glen up which their road lay, that the slant
rays of the evening sun could not so much as reach the flanks
of the precipitous rocks which walled it in, although they
played
and quivered on the green forest-leaves aloft, clothing them
with a flood of bright and peaceful glory.
The din of the conflict had sunk to rest, and not a sound
was to be heard but the rich carol of the thrushes from the
dingles among the crags, and the cooing of the cushats from
the deeper recesses of the wood.
The rushing of the stream along the course of which their
road lay drowned the trampling of their horses' feet, and the
depth of the ravine screened them from the prying eyes of
enemies above, if there were enemies, as it was too likely, on
the watch already.
At one point only of their progress could they be discovered
from any portion of the castle, and then only from the summit
of the donjon-keep. That point was where they left the
stream, and turned up the bridle-path to the left, among the
wooded ridges of Slievh-Buy; and just before they reached
this spot, O'Brien halted, and took brief council with Florence
Desmond.
The moment we begin to ascend that gorge, he said
pointing directly in front of him, we are under the fire of
three guns from the keep, until we reach yon thicket, where
the road turns, and the rocks cover it. We were best gallop
up it at full speed. Take you one side of Ellinor's rein, and I
the other. We will lead at a gallop.
Is it needful? There can be none there to fire on us; even
if any knew how or whither we have gone.
O'Neil
was
on the keep when I joined you, and saw us
all rush to the stables. To his quick mind, a hint is what a
long tale were to another. The guns are always trained on
this point, and loaded, though none but I knew wherefore. Of
this rest assured: the Puritans, ere this, are in full possession
of the keep, and are preparing, even now, to pursue us.
You are right! he replied. Would that I had him once
within fair sword-stroke. Now, my men, he continued, as he
caught his sister's bridle-rein with his right hand, follow us
at your speed. Sit firm, and hold him hard, little sister: it is
but for a moment.
The water flashed up from the stream, as they took ground,
and the fire-sparks flew from the flinty rock, amid clouds of
dust, and the rush of falling pebbles, as the fresh and fiery
horses, maddened by the spur, and burning with emulation,
one against the other, strained up the craggy pass.
It was but for a moment; yet they
were
seen, as O'Brien
had predicted, before they reached the covert of the
greenwood
.
For a loud shout hailed them, and, a second after, the
howl of a heavy shot above their heads told them that they
were safe at least from that missile, although it struck among
the crags not twenty feet above them, and split a mighty oak
to shivers.
Well-missed!well-missed! cried O'Brien, joyously.
Those fellows can no longer harm us, But, hark! he
added
for
the winding of the path they followed had now brought
them to a point nearly opposite the entrance of the cavern,
whence they had emerged, and a dull, distant, rankling roar,
sounding like subterranean thunder, came bellowing from its
depths. Hark! they are blowing the gates open with
petards
;
we shall have them at our heels ere long!
Their horses must be worn out by their night's marching,
said Murtough. They will never come within five miles of
us.
There are some eighty fresh ones in the castle stables;
better never cleft the greensward. Think you they have no
eyes to see them? They will push us very hard, he added,
quietly; but we shall beat them to Carnew: and if Con and
Ulick be there, obedient to orders, we will send them home
again howling.
Little was said for well-nigh half-an-hour after these words
the whole energies of every person of that little party being
taxed to the utmost to keep their horses at a brisk and steady
pace, rarely faster than a trot, so craggy and broken was the
ground, without suffering them to fall on the rough ascents or
precipitous declivities which varied the surface of the mountain
road; though, ever and anon a fierce and thrilling shout rose
from the rear, nigher and nigher each than the last before it,
telling that the avenger was upon their traces.
And it was beautiful to see the coolnessthe firm, intrepid
nerve with which that fair girl ruled her fiery Arabnever so
much as trembling once or turning pale, much less slackening
her hand on the rein, or averting her eyes from the track, as
those fierce and portentous cries burst from the pitiless
throats behind them.
Two or three of the soldiers, made of less manly stuff than
that delicate beauty, turned and looked back; and one met the
reward of his poltroonery; for, unsupported by the
master-hand
,
the horse went down at once, laming itself irretrievably
in the fall, and dislocating the rider's shoulder.
To aid him was impossible; to tarry with him would have
been self-destruction. He was abandoned sorrowfully to his
fate; and what that fate was they were too soon informedfor
ere they had ridden above a quarter of a mile, scaling the
heights by abrupt zig-zags, a loud shout, followed by the
sound of heavy blows, and one shrill shriek of anguish, reached
their ears.
Then, for the first time, Ellinor's lips grew white, and her
eyes reeled for a moment; but by a strong exertion she shook
off the grievous sickness which was creeping over her, and
fixed both eyes and mind on the guidance of her courser.
Brave girl! Brave Ellinor! her lover's voice murmured
in her ear; and as she raised her full dark eyes till they met
his glance of love and admiration, even in that hour of agony
she felt a short-lived thrill of rapture. Nay, but we will save
you yet, my own Ellinor!
As he uttered the words, they reached the chestnut tree of
which he had spokena landmark celebrated through the
country, and said to be as old as the invasion of Strongbow,
standing where four main roads, and no less than five
bridle-paths
,
met.
Here lies our safety! he exclaimed, drawing his rein.
Here we must part, and take different roads. You,
Murtough
,
with ten others, and the pagehis horse is the slightest
of the band:and if they follow by the track, they may take
it for the lady's palfry; ride that way through the woods, still
bearing to your right, that you join us at nightfall in Carnew.
Three more, straight forward and do likewise. Three more,
with Shamus Beg to lead them, ride right upon Rathvilly; you
will be there to-morrow. Florence, spare not your spurs nor
your horse's life. Yon is the straightest way upon Carnew.
Leave us, and bring us aid of the quickestlances!lances!
Now, Ellinor, with mewith me, beloved!
Not a word was spoken. Implicit, prompt was the
obedience
the
obedience of love, not of fearof love and of
conviction
;
for Florence would fain have staid beside his sister:
but he saw that O'Brien's counsel was the wisest, and that
therein lay their only hope of safety; and he, too, wont to lead,
obeyed. And it was their only chancefor, not ten minutes
had elapsed after they dispersed, before Hugh O'Neil, riding
the first, as guide, with some forty or fifty horse, led by a
noble-looking
youth in full armor, with a crimson scarf, and a
crimson feather in his motion, and resembling a cavalier rather
than a Puritan, came up to the spot, and were at fault for a
moment.
Then, for the first time, did the instinct of love in O'Brien
defeat the instinct of revenge in his base rival. He could not
doubt that Dermot would keep the strongest force in hand for
the protection of his betrothed; and though he noted the track
of the two barbs together, he noted it only as a
ruse de guerre
,
and smiled at its want of success, as he announced positively
that the leaders were with the stronger partyand led the
whole band off on the wrong track, at a canter.
For they had now gained the summit of the ridge, and the
rest of the way was favorable to increased rapidity, although
the descent was far too abrupt and broken to permit of putting
a horse to its speed.
Had the woods now been as thick as on the other side, the
safety of the fugitives would have been assured, for they could
see the hamlet of Carnew, not above six miles distant, in the
open country, at the foot of the mountain chain, and two miles
more would have brought them into good galloping-ground.
But before they had gone half that distance, the party led by
Murtough was compelled to cross a piece of open ground in
full view of those watchful eyes that, seeming to see nothing,
took in everything. A loud shout proved to O'Brien that his
stratagem was discovered, and an instant afterward he could
hear the horse thundering down a precipitous cross-road which
intersected that on which they were riding, about three
hundred
yards before they reached the open country.
Terrified at the sound, Ellinor would have put her horse to
the gallop; but O'Brien, cool and collected, and an admirable
judge of pacethat greatest point in horsemanship
controlled
her.
Steady, steady, dear girl! We shall cross the road ahead
of them, and that is all we need. Then we can gallop. Steady,
beloved! Let him not break his trot.
And she did not; but not to do so was a fearful trial. The
roads were now nearly parallel, scarce twenty paces
intervening
between the pursuers and the pursuedbut that twenty,
fortunately for the latter, impassable with crags and
underwood
.
Nearer and nearer drew the clang, the shouts, and now the
enemy were almost abreast of them; and now Ellinor could
discern
their helmets and the colors of the plumes, and now their
featuresthe hated features of O'Neil, inflamed with hideous
triumph.
Oh, Dermot! let me gallop!
No, no!for Heaven's sake! Steady one moment longer,
and you are safe! There is a terrible pitch there, and some of
them will go down for certain, if they try it at that pace.
But as he spoke, he loosened his sword in its sheath, cocked
both his pistols in his holsters, and drawing one with his right
hand, held it ready.
They crossed the mouth of the other road. O'Neil was not
twenty paces distant, but another rider was yet nearerso near
that he almost was stretching out his arm to seize the bridle of
O'Brienwhen, as he had foretold, the horse trod on a rolling
stone, went down as if it had been shot, and crushed its rider
under it.
Now, rideride, Ellinor!for your life, ride!
For still O'Neil came on, with fifty Puritans close at his back,
shouting, secure of triumph.
With the speed of lightning O'Brien's pistol rose to its level,
was, discharged, and horse and man, O'Neil went down to the
shot. But a proficient in all martial exercises, even in that
extremity his skill and quickness saved him. Seeing O'Brien's
pistol levelled, and foreseeing that its ball would take effect on
his own person, he made his horse to capriole, and so received
it in the chest of the animal, instead of his own heart.
But the delay was enough for O'Brien. A minute or two
were consumed before O'Neil was rehorsed; and in that
minute
or two Ellinor had gained full five hundred yards on her
pursuers, and Dermot had to spur hard ere he overtook her.
That distance saved them; for, although the Puritans still
urged the chase with determination, and were almost as well
mounted, they never could make up that gap.
Hillock and hollow vanished under their furious galloptree
rock, and bush glanced by as if they were in motion, yet still
the beautiful flea-bitten Arab tossed its proud head, snorted
with red, expanded nostril, and struggled hot against the rein,
as if it had not run a mile. And still the lovely girl sat in her
saddle, firm, graceful, easy, as if she had been a portion of that
gallant courser, swaying her supple form to suit every bound
of the springy steed, and aiding every stride by the support of
her light and airy finger.
Miles flew away with minutes, and O'Brien was beginning
to fear, knowing that Carnew was now close before them, that
his kinsmen might have failed him, and that he should find no
help when help must be had, or never.
But just at that point of time, when his heart was sinking,
the tall hat of a cavalier, with its streaming plume, rose above
the swell of ground to his left, and then a bay barb's head,
with a white blaze down its face, and then a stately horseman,
sword in hand, reining the horse along at full career.
His fresher and unwearied horse had outstripped Florence
Desmond; but he rode the second, and after him, powdering
through the dust in long array, some five and twenty spears.
They met;no time for greeting.
Onwardride onward, Ellinor! This is no sportive
tourney
for maidens to behold. On, Ellinor, away! Ride with
her, Conride, ride, I say! Soh, soh! Now, give me a
spear, gentlemen. Order your ranksupon themcharge!
For, though the Puritans had seen the rescue, confident in
the force of their superior numbers, which nearly doubled those
of their antagonists, they rode on at full speed, without so
much as closing up their ranks or ordering their front to meet
that fiery charge.
They had no lances eitherand the straggling volley of
pistols
and musquetoons which they opened irregular, so soon as
the O'Briens were within gun-shot, had no more effect to break
the onset of that compact and solid body, which charged home
like a thunderbolt, than had the rapiers of the Puritans, to
parry the couched lances of the cavaliers.
The eye of O'Brien scanned the ranks eagerly to find O'Neil,
but found him not. Although remounted, his fall had shaken
him so sorely that he fell into the rear, and when he saw the
rescue and the charge of the O'Briens, turned his horse and
fled.
Therefore, as the next highest in place, if not in hatred,
O'Brien charged his lance against the crimson-feathered leader,
who, contrary to the wont of the Puritans, was armed
cap-apie
,
and wore a helmet with a visor.
Whoever he was, he bore him like a man in the
mele
, and
even under the fatal disadvantage of sword to lance, fell not
an easy victim.
For, though O'Brien's lance struck him fairly on the gorget,
and flew to shivers, up to the very gauntlet-grasp, he still kept
his seat, and dealt Dermot a clean cut over his head-piece that
made his brain reel and his eyes flash fire. But at the same
instant his girths broke, his horse went down, and friend and
foe all passed over him.
For the Roundheads stood not an instant. Sixteen or
eighteen
went down killed or maimed in the first shock; and when
the O'Briens' lances broke, their swords flew out, not without
reason, and went up again not without revenge.
For three miles they pursued and slaughtered, till their
horses were blown and their arms weary with slaying. If any
of their foes escaped, it was by the speed of their own horses,
which, fatally for the Puritans, they had pressed into service
against their own masters.
O'Brien turned his rein the firstlove was stronger with him
than revengeand he was trotting slowly back toward the
scene of the first onslaught, when sights and sounds met his
eyes which made him put to his spurs and ride as hard as ever
he rode to meet mortal foe.
Two or three score of ragged youths, half-armed, savage,
and desperate rascals and rapparees, the disgrace of native
Irish armies, had collected about the carcasses like vultures,
plundering and poniarding the wounded. Oaths and shrieks
of egony, entreaties for mercy, and wild Irish howls were
fearfully
commingled, and not a skene but was wet with blood.
Shouting as loudly as he could, and threatening dread
vengeance
,
he came up at the gallopbut the murderers either
heard or heeded him not at all.
Just at this moment, the leader, whom he had himself
unhorsed
,
struggled up to his feet, but was instantly felled by the
blow of a club, which made his steel helmet ring like a bell;
and in an instant a brawny ruffian knelt on his chest, and the
point of a long dirk was already trying the crevices of his
gorget, when Dermot's black barb was pulled up beside the
group, and a stern voice thundered in the assassin's earthe
last he ever heard on this side eternity:
Did I not bid thee hold? Shall the O'Brien, then, speak
twice? Hold, carrion!
And ere the words were out, it was carrion to which those
words were addressedfor the full sweep of the long Toledo
blade took him on the bent neck, and severed the head sheer
from the trunk, that fell a corpse on his intended victim.
Dermot sprang from his horse. No lack of ready hands
now to hold his stirrup and to catch his rein. He stooped over
his captive, and raised him from the ground tenderly.
Now, by the Holy Virgin, if ye have murthered him, I will
hang fifty of you!
Thanks to your generosity, my lord! answered the other,
recovering himself; they have not murdered me. But it was
touch and go! I believe I speakI believe I am prisoner, to
the Earl of Thomond, he added, opening the visor of his
helmet
,
and showing the fine bold features of a handsome young
man of some six or seven and twenty years. I am Hen
I seek not, sir, O'Brien interrupted him, in mid speech,
to know more than that you are a fallen foe. I pray you, tell
me not your name, lest I be forced to act otherwise than I
would. I am the Earl of Thomond, sir, lieutenant for the
King, under his Grace of Ormond. If you were my prisoner,
sir, you are so no longer. You are free; and if this act of
mine, thus dismissing you in safety, have any power to render
this sad war less bloody, I shall hold myself rewarded.
If I have aught to say, replied the other, it shall
render
it less bloody.
I doubt you not, sir. But now, as my people's minds are
somewhat excitable and rashfor persecution, as you know,
drives wise men mad, and these poor caitiffs are not of the
wisestyou were best get back to your friends as soon as
may be. That is your horse, I think, which they have caught
there, and he does not seem to be injured. You had better
mount at once, and begone.
Your
horse, you mean, my lord. I have no claim to him,
but the worst of allthe claim of the strongest.
The best in the world! answered O'Brien, laughing.
The best in the world!
Fortune de guerre! Fortune de guerre!
mine yesterdayyours to-dayperchance mine again
to-morrow
.
But I am in earnest, sir. You were better mount, and
ride away as quickly as may be; for these irregular followers of
mine, though they now will hold your stirrup, cap in hand,
will cut your throat nevertheless skilfully for that, when once
my back is turned.
In truth, they do seem wondrous adroit cut-throats.
Therefore, avoid them, sir. Ho! Florenceho! I am
here! he shouted, seeing the colonel riding back from the
pursuit, at a little distance, and not seeming to notice him;
but the colonel still rode on, though he turned his head, and
looked at the earl for a moment.
The next minute Ulick came in sight, bloody from spur to
plumebloody with slaughteringbloody with spurringwith
a dozen veteran men-at-arms behind him.
Ho, Ulick! Find me out two trusty men to guide this
gentleman back to the outposts of the enemy, in all honor
men on whom you can rely. These scurvy fellows here would
have murdered him, after surrendering, had it not been for a
lucky chance, which brought me in, just at the nick of time.
Two men were soon selected, and the stranger mounted
but ere he went, he stooped down toward Dermot, who had
not yet remounted, and said, impressively:
We shall meet again, lord earl.
I doubt it not, sir.
Shall we shake hands on it? asked the other, in reply.
I shake no hand which hath blood of Ireland upon it.
The Puritan cast a glance toward the decapitated corpse of
the rapparce, and it seemed as if a retort were rising to his lips.
If it were so, he restrained it, bowed gravely, with a
half-melancholy
smile, saying:
I would we could have been friends; nevertheless, I
thank you for my life!I thank you!And so he rode away.
Ere long, O'Brien overtook Florence Desmond, who looked
at him steadfastly, and asked:
Know you who that was?
I may guess.
He did not tell you, then?
I would not hear him.
You did welland better in dismissing him. Speak of it
to no man. Let you and I keep counsel.
That evening they spent, almost happily, in the wretched
little hostelry at Carnew, so singularly do great perils run
great adventures passand the sense that they are still in
the midst of mighty dangers, dispose the minds of men to be
gay in despite of grief, and to snatch all the flowers from out
the keenest thorns of life.
The third night thereafter they were in safety in the walls
of Tredagh, garrisoned by a great force of Ormond's best men,
provisioned for many months, and capable, as it was believed,
of resisting any force that Cromwell could bring against it,
until it should be relieved by Ormond, who was fast gathering
head to meet the invader, and drive him, as he boasted, in
disgrace across the Irish Sea!
CHAPTER X.
THE ONSLAUGHT.
`God and the Prophet, Allah Hu!'
Up to the skies with that wild halloo!!
`For there lies the breach, and the ladders to scare,
`And your hands on your sabres, and how shall ye fail?'
Siege of Corinth
.
Ten
days had passed, and no succor had arrived; yet still,
confident in their strength and loyalty, the defenders of the
city trembled not.
O'Brien was among the number, and Florence Desmond; the
former full of high hope and glorious anticipation, the latter
gloomy and desponding. He alone, of all the royal party,
appeared to comprehend and know the genius of that
wonderful
and mighty man against whom they were so unequally
fitted.
And it was observed and noted something against the
colonel
,
that when the scurril jokes of Red-nosed Noll, the brewer,
were circulating with the loudest mirth, he ever looked the
gravest and most downcast. To all the slang of the day, and
bitterness of partizan calumny, he replied only, that he was a
consummate leader, as they would soon learn to their cost,
who now jeered at him, and a very great, if he were a very
bad, man.
Once only he was provoked into saying, when jeered for his
gravity and silence, and taunted with fear of Cromwell, that
when fools were brave, it behooved wise men to be cowards!
and thereafter they let him alone. For no one wished to
try the last conclusions with Colonel Florence Desmond.
He was, moreover, when alone with O'Brien, most solicitous
that he should send Ellinorwho had become his wife the day
after their arrival in Tredagh, being given away by the Earl
of Ormond himself, before he left the cityout of the town
before the approach of the beleaguering force, which was now,
on the first of September, close at hand.
But Ellinor was now O'Brien's wife, and having, as she
said, obeyed once, contrary to her own will, she was
determined
,
as she said, to abide now with her husband and her brother
to the last, whether they would or no.
Dermot, moreover, who had always partaken too much of the
cavalier contempt for the Roundheadscontempt most
incomprehensible
,
when we consider that the Roundheads had now,
for several years, invariably beaten themand whose ideas had
gained fresh force on that point, by the ease with which, on his
retreat from the Red Castle, he had overthrown above twice
his number with a mere handfultook sides with Ellinor, and
it was useless for the brother to say a word more on the subject.
He was, therefore, according to his wont, silent.
On the third of September, at sunset, the dark, solid columns
of the Puritans encircled the doomed city, as with a hedge of
steel. And the great red flag, with blue edgesthe ensign of
the covenantwas reflected in the bright waters of the Boyne
bright waters doomed, alas! so often to be impurpled with
the best and most loyal blood of Ireland!
That night Florence and Dermot stood together on the
battlements, and watched the ordering of the Roundhead
forces, the landing of the heavy guns, the stir and din, yet all
grave, and orderly, and stern, of martial preparation.
Within seven days, said O'Brien, joyously, on yonder
hills shall we see the flash of the noble Ormond's banners
and these canting psalm-singers shall be hurled headlong into
the sea!
Within nor seven days, nor seventy times seven, replied
Desmond, coolly, will any flag of Ormond's show within ten
miles of these walls. Nor within seventy times seven years
will you see any force, even tenfold its number, that shall hurl
back those canting psalm-singers into the sea. Those canting
psalm-singers, O'Brien, within ten days, will sweep like
entering
tide over the breaches of this doomed city; but I shall not
be here to see it. God protect those who are then here; for
I foresee such horrors as have never been wrought in a
Christian
land by Christians. The first shot fired will kill me
I know it;and I should hail that shot, were it not for the
things which I dread for those whom I love more than life
for whom I fear more than I fear death. But we will talk no
more of these things. Let us go to Ellinor.
That evening tidings were brought into the city that a
Catholic
priest, a Jesuit, had been taken by the Puritans, in lay
clothing, endeavoring to force his way into the city, had been
tried by drum-head court-martial, and hanged summarily.
Sad hope for the defenders of the city!
The next day it transpired that the priest's name was Daly,
called, as the Puritans would have it, by the idolatrous and
Canaanitish title of Ignatius, even a latter type of the arch
beast and devil, Loyola.
So they hanged him. Perhaps he deserved to be hanged;
but surely not because his name was Ignatiusnor yet because
he chose to worship his God after his own manner, and the
manner of his fathers.
The Puritans, like most people, were very averse to being
hanged themselves, but very fond of hanging other people for
exercising the same freedom which they claimedfreedom to
worship God;
videlicet
, the Catholics in Ireland, the Quakers
in Connecticut.
And so they hanged Ignatius Daly, and as I said, he certainly
deserved it, for the part he had taken in reference to the traitor,
Hugh O'Neilto whose lot, by the way, it fell to superintend
the execution of his whilom friend and tutora duty which
he performed with all the cool, sanctimonious cruelty peculiar
to the Puritan, mingled with something of the vindictive zeal
which is always seen in the renegado.
It never was known clearly whether the priest was more
dupe or knave. In some degree he was both, assuredly. But
I believe no instance is on record in all historynone, at least,
of which I am awareof a Catholic priest betraying his
church and his flock to an enemy, since the days, at least, of
Orpas of Seville. It is reasonable, therefore, and just, to
suppose
that it was the selfish thirst of power, the self-conceit of
superior wisdom, and the love of tortuous paths, in preference
to the straight road, which is so commonly attributed to the
Jesuits, and not dellberate treachery, or an intention of
wronging
his own people, that led the unhappy priest to fall so easily
into the snares of the traitor.
But my tale is drawing to a close, and sad is that close, and
bloodyalmost the bloodiest page in the gory book of human
history; and I know not if it be not quite the most horribly
hideous: for that blood was all shed, coldly, deliberately, for set
plan and purpose of malice aforethought. Therefore, not the
lapse of ages shall obliterate, nor the waters of Lethe itself
wash out, the curse of Cromwell.
Not of the times, but of the manfor the times were refined
and merciful; and it had been the boast of a contemporaneous
historian, that during all the bloody civil wars of England,
though the opposing Englishmen would slay one another
sharply enough while both sides stood to it, so soon as the one
party turned to fly, the other could not be brought to do
execution
on the flyers. Not of the man, but of the sectfor the
man was in the main merciful and sparing of blood, except
when bloodshedding was imperatively necessary to his career;
but the sect, as all sects are in turn when they are dominant
and unresisted, was bigotted, fanatical, and barbarous.
But to return to that doomed city. Day after day passed on,
quiet and calm, in the horrid hush of expectation. The sun
shone brightly on the green fields and the fair river, the fresh
and pleasant air dallied with the streamers and ensigns,
equally of morose Puritan and fiery cavalier; but the sun
showed not, and the breeze stirred not, any banner of his Grace
of Ormond, nor came there any tidings of approaching succor.
It was now the ninth of the month, the sixth since that
strange conversation had passed between Desmond and
O'Brien; and by all that was going forward in the trenches of
the enemy when the preceding night fell dark upon the earth,
it was apparent that the siege would commence in earnest with
the dawn of day.
And so in truth it was; for ere the sun was above the
horizon
,
and while the east was yet scarcely grey, the batteries of
Cromwell opened along the whole of the southern and
western
faces of the works.
On that morning, fully expecting that which was to ensue,
the earl and his brother-in-law, now that the time of action
had arrived, in better spirits and more cheerful than he had
been since the investment, went forth, lightly armed, at an
early hour, with the governor, to inspect the works.
These three were standing together, close to the flag-staff, on
which, the sun not having as yet risen, the royal colors were
not unfurled; the governor, to the right of the three, having his
hand on the ensign-staff, with Colonel Desmond, to whose
opinion he had shown, throughout, the greatest deference, next
to him, then conversing earnestly; and on the left, O'Brien,
leaning upon his brother's shoulders, and listening attentively
to every word that was passing.
O'Brien was now by far the gravest and most serious of the
threefor he remembered the strange words which Florence
Desmond seemed to have forgotten, and they weighed upon
his heart; for he loved him for his own sake very earnestly;
and in every man'scertainly in every Irishman'sheart, there
is a touch of something nearly skin to, if it be not, superstition.
While they were standing thus upon the south-western
bastion
,
the drums in the trenches of the Puritans beat to arms,
and at the same moment the great red and blue banner of the
covenant soared slowly up to the top of the staff.
Show them the royal standard, knaves! exclaimed the go
vernor, since they will have it; trumpets and kettle-drums,
God save the king!
11
And at his words, amid the splendid symphonies of brazen
instruments, up went the glorious blazonry of England's crown.
Now we shall have it! exclaimed Desmond; and ere his
lips had ceased moving, ten or a dozen flashes leaped out from
the trenches, and the smoke, driven out in dense white volumes,
rolled lazily along the plain toward the glacis.
Then came the howl and hurtling of the heavy ballsthe
crash of the masonry beneath their feet, the splintering of the
wood above their heads; for one shot had cut the massive
enaign-staff
in twain, close above the fingers of the governor; and
a dozen smote the face of the bastion, three feet or less below
the spot where they were standing.
Good faith! my lord, said the governor, an old and tried
soldier, half-smiling as he said it, but that they say two
bullets
never strike in the same place, I should propose to seek
some cooler quarters!then turning to the artillerists, who
were busy training the gunsBustle, he shouted, bustle,
knaves! Answer me this shot speedily, and see if you cannot
cut down their red rag yonder. You have a great name for a
gunner, Colonel Desmond, he added. Will you not try a
shot for God and the king? But, great heaven! what is this!
It was most strange; but, in the great excitement of that
moment even O'Brien, who was leaning on his shoulder with
their arms mutually interlaced, had not, until the governor's
words called his attention to his more than friend, perceived or
suspected what had happened.
A round shot of the heaviest size had struck him on the right
shoulder, dashing the whole of that limb to atoms, and crushing
in all the chest and side. Yet he had uttered no sound, given
no sign of that agony, save in a convalsive shudder which
Dermot
afterward remembered to have felt, though at the time he
noted it not.
He was not deadhe was sensible stillhe had still strength
to stand erect, leaning, as he did, with his left arm on his
brother's
shoulder. The shock had struck him for a moment
speechless. His lips quivered, and his eyes rolled wildly for a
moment. But as they made a movement to bear him away, he
recovered both power and voice.
No! he said firmly. No. Here!I knew it, O'Brien
did I not? And he smiled sadly.
Another roar from the ordnance of the Puritans, and again
the iron hail smote all around themand already the masonry
at the angle of the bastion began to crumble.
Governor, said the wounded man, faintly; this cannot
last. This bastion will be breached before noon to-morrow.
Retrench at once. Begin to retrench inside. Take that church
for your
point d'appui!
But I have done with battles. I am
going. Lay me in that church, Dermot, until all is over; and
as you live, conceal this thing from Ellinor until the siege is
ended.
Even as you will, Florence, brother. God be with you!
Be good to her, Dermot; but I know you will.
Ora pro
nobis!
and he signed himself with the cross
sanctissima
purissima, ora pro nobis!
A third time the dreadful roar of the ordnance burst from the
batteries of Cromwell; and as the sound reached the ears of
the dying man, the ruling passion strong in death burst forth
indomitable loyaltyloyalty and courage!
Shaking off the support of his brother's arm, he reared his
form to its full height, as proudly as though he had been
unwounded
,
tore off his steel cap, and waved it in the air toward
the lines of the enemy. God save the king! were the last
words of that true Catholic and gallant Irishman!Peace to
his ashes! Honor to his namea name that will not soon or
easily be forgotten! Peace and renown to Florence Desmond!
Little remains to tell. All that day, all the following night,
all the succeeding morning, incessant roared the cannon from
the trenchesthe cannon from the city; but the latter feebly,
inefficiently, and at length singlythe former, faster and fiercer,
and more overwhelming every moment.
The angles of the bastions, the parapets, curtain, and
counter-scarp
went down; before noon there were three wide and
yawning breaches; and against these, in three massive columns,
was the iron might of the Roundheads rolled forth.
Three separate assaults were given and repulsed at each
breach. It needs not to multiply words, for words can supply
nothing which the imagination cannot better fill. The picked
men of the bravest race on earth were fighting, hand to hand,
within a circumscribed and narrow space, with every terrible
engine and implement of destruction that human skill had then
invented. They were animated by all the strongest motives
that can inflame, invigorate, infuriate the human breast.
Political
rancorreligious fanaticismlibertyloyaltypersonal
hatredpersonal interestall motives high and holyall
motives
base and sordid. And the result was, call it what you will,
glory or crimethe result was blood and havoc, and the
disfiguring
of the Creator's image!
In the second and most desperate assault, Hugh O'Neil and
the O'Brien met in the
mele
, recognised each other, and
never unjoined handsfor each had griped the other by the
lefttill, both their swords being shattered to the hilt, they had
fought out that old feud with daggers; till the earl's blade had
divorced the foul spirit, choked almost in its flight by its own
fearful imprecations, from its dark earthly rabernacle. Double
traitordouble apostatehe had no earthly creed in which
to die sublimely loyalno heavenly faith in which to die
serenely
confident. He passed, as the good and great had passed
before himwhither we know not, and dare not enquire!
At that instant, wounded, and spent, and still confused by the
long and desperate strugglescarce conscious that the
assailants
were repulsed, so thoroughly had he been engrossed in
that breathless strife for life, and death, and vengeanceO'Brien
felt himself grappled suddenly by four or five strong men.
Overdone as he was, and exhausted and unarmed, all to his
daggerhe could at best have offered but small resistance to
those vigorous antagonists; taken by surprise, he was easily
dragged down the breachfor it seemed to be the object of
the men who had fallen on him by concert, to capture, not to
injure himand almost before he had time to think what had
occurred, he was a prisoner in the trenches of the Roundheads.
A few minutes passed, during which his brain reeled, and
his senses swam, and everything seemed indistinct and whirling
round himbrilliant with strange, prismatic gleams, and
blurred
with blood. He was weak with loss of bloodweak with
painweak with misery.
Gradually his senses, his sight returned. He was
sitting
down in an angle of Cromwell's trenches, with a knot of
grim musketeers, leaning on their matchlocks, at some dozen
paces distance, and a tall, stately figure, armed
cap-a-pie
in
bright steel, with a crimson scarf and plume, standing before,
gazing at him, from under the shade of his raised vizor, with
a smile half melancholy, half self-complacent.
Perceiving at once that he was seen and recognised, as the
light returned to O'Brien's eyes, and the color to his cheeks,
this person spoke in a frank, cheerful voice, that told of
something
chivalrous and open in the character of the man.
You would not know me, he said, the other day, lord
earl, when you did me a favor. Will you know me now, when
fortune
fortune de guerre
you knowhas put it in my power to
return it?
I know you very well, sir, answered O'Brien, as I did when
I gave you your life, if that was a favor. But if you wish to
do me one in return, just draw those fellows yonder up in file,
and give them a quick word, and me a steady volley.
Fie, sir! replied the young man sternly, and a grave,
serious shade fell over his fine open features. For
shame!for shame!a soldier, and such cowardly words!
a Christian, and such wicked words! For shame! Let me not
hear such!much less my father, if you chance to meet him;
and then he half smiled again. For he will very surely
take you at your word. But hark!they are beating again to
arms! I have no time. First, Dermot O'Brien, Earl of
Thomond
,
give me your parole of honorrescue or no rescue; you
cannot refuse me. Then tell me where I shall find Colonel
Florence Desmondand then where the countessfor I know
that you are wedded to the fair lady for whom you fought so
gallantly, and cost me so many of my best men. Do this, and
I pledge myself that you shall see them both this night in
safety.
Pledge not yourself, sir, for you cannot fulfil. You will
find Colonel Desmond even where you will find my mother
before the high altar of the first church you come to, an if
you win the town
There is no
if
.We shall win it!
I may not gainsay you, Master Henry Cromwell. I do not
mean to offend; but I know not by what title to address you.
But you have cost me very dear!at our first meeting, a dear
motherat our second, a dear brother!
At least, I have returned you life for life, as earnest of what
I will do; and if you will permit, will restore to you this night
a wife for whom alone I have captured you. Trust in me, lord
earltrust in me. You will know why to-morrow.
I will trust in you, though I know not wherefore. I give
you my parole of honorrescue or no rescue. You will find
her in the governor's lodging, in Castle-street, near to the Mill
mount; and as you deal with her, so may God do unto you, and
much more also!
Amen! replied Henry Cromwell. Amenso be it! Now
lead him to my quarters, Nicholson. Treat him with every
honor, but let him not go forth. Mount a guard over him with
loaded muskets. Let none enter in to him until I return. I
make you answerable for him with your life. Fare-you-well,
Earl of Thomond. I go to lead the assault, and if I live, I will
not fail you!
He did not fail him. Ere ten o'clock of that horrid night
in which Tredagh was takenin which two thousand men were
slaughtered in cold blood, or roasted wilfully to death in God's
desecrated templesin which the kennels of the city streamed
with human goreere ten o'clock of that horrid night, O'Brien
elasped to his heart the living wife, and wept with her,
unhindered
,
over the rescued corpse of the dead brother.
Years passed away. The young earl and his lovely bride
departed on the very morrow, self-exiled to the hospitable realm
of France; and there dwelt, happy and in honor, until the
restoration
of the second Charles to his hereditary crown restored
the Earl of Thomond also to his hereditary lands and honors.
Years passed away, and the gallant son of the great usurper,
early called away, went down to the grave before his mighty
sireand, dying, sealed the doom of his father's blood-bought
dynasty. Had Henry Cromwell lived to succeed Oliver, a
Cromwell might have now sat on the throne of England. The
imbecility of Richard, and not the strength of Charles,
produced
the restoration. Strange is the course of circumstances!
That was not the last revolutionary dynasty destined to fall by
the death of the energetic, able heir, while the weak should
survive, to be found wanting at the time of trial.
Years passed away, I said; but never, as they came and
went, did the O'Brien and his gentle Ellinor fail to give one
tear to the memory of Henry Cromwell, so often as they
thought upon
THE TAKING OF TREDAGH.
THE END: